Vol. I.  2
CHAPTER I.
Then, if he were my brother's,
My brother might not claim him; nor your father,
Being none of his, refuse him: This concludes
My mother's son did get your father's heir;
Your father's heir must have your father's land.
King John
.
The
events we are about to relate, occurred near the
middle of the last century, previously even to that
struggle
,
which it is the fashion of America to call the old
French War. The opening scene of our tale, however,
must be sought in the other hemisphere, and on the coast of
the mother country. In the middle of the eighteenth
century
,
the American colonies were models of loyalty; the very
war, to which there has just been allusion, causing the great
expenditure that induced the ministry to have recourse to
the system of taxation, which terminated in the revolution.
The family quarrel had not yet commenced. Intensely
occupied
with the conflict, which terminated not more
gloriously
for the British arms, than advantageously for the
British American possessions, the inhabitants of the
provinces
were perhaps never better disposed to the
metropolitan
state, than at the very period of which we are about to
write. All their early predilections seemed to be gaining
strength, instead of becoming weaker; and, as in nature,
the calm is known to succeed the tempest, the blind
attachment
of the colony to the parent country, was but a precursor
of the alienation and violent disunion that were so soon to
follow.
Although the superiority of the English seaman was well
established, in the conflicts that took place between the year
1740, and that of 1763, the naval warfare of the period by
no means possessed the very decided character with which
it became stamped, a quarter of a century later. In our
own times, the British marine appears to have improved in
quality, as its enemies' deteriorated. In the year 1812,
however
,
Greek met Greek, when, of a verity, came the
tug of war. The great change that came over the other
navies of Europe, was merely a consequence of the revolutions,
which drove experienced men into exile, and which, by
rendering
armies all-important even to the existence of the
different
states, threw nautical enterprises into the shade, and
gave an engrossing direction to courage and talent, in
another
quarter. While France was struggling, first for
independence
,
and next for the mastery of the continent, a
marine was a secondary object; for Vienna, Berlin, and
Moscow, were as easily entered without, as with its aid.
To these, and other similar causes, must be referred the
explanation
of the seeming invincibility of the English arms at
sea, during the late great conflicts of Europe; an invincibility
that was more apparent than real, however, as many well
established defeats were, even then, intermingled with her
thousand victories.
From the time when her numbers could furnish succour
of this nature, down to the day of separation, America had
her full share in the exploits of the English marine. The
gentry of the colonies willingly placed their sons in the
royal navy, and many a bit of square bunting has been
flying at the royal-mast-heads of King's ships, in the
nineteenth
century, as the distinguishing symbols of flag-officers,
who had to look for their birth-places among ourselves. In
the course of a chequered life, in which we have been brought
in collision with as great a diversity of rank, professions, and
characters, as often falls to the lot of any one individual, we
have been thrown into contact with no less than eight
English
admirals, of American birth; while, it has never yet
been our good fortune to meet with a countryman, who has
had this rank bestowed on him by his own government. On
one occasion, an Englishman, who had filled the highest
civil office connected with the marine of his nation, observed
to us, that the only man he then knew, in the British navy, in
whom he should feel an entire confidence in entrusting an
important command, was one of these translated admirals;
and the thought unavoidably passed through our mind, that
this favourite commander had done well in adhering to the
conventional, instead of clinging to his natural allegiance,
inasmuch
as he might have toiled for half-a-century, in the
service of his native land, and been rewarded with a rank
that would merely put him on a level with a colonel in the
army! How much longer this short-sighted policy, and
grievous injustice, are to continue, no man can say; but it
is safe to believe, that it is to last until some legislator of
influence learn the simple truth, that the fancied reluctance
of popular constituencies to do right, oftener exists in the
apprehensions
of their representatives, than in reality.But to
our tale.
England enjoys a wide-spread reputation for her fogs;
but little do they know how much a fog may add to natural
scenery, who never witnessed its magical effects, as it has
caused a beautiful landscape to coquette with the eye, in
playful
and capricious changes. Our opening scene is in one of
these much derided fogs; though, let it always be remembered,
it was a fog of June, and not of November. On a high
head-land
of the coast of Devonshire, stood a little station-house,
which had been erected with a view to communicate, by
signals
,
with the shipping, that sometimes lay at anchor in an
adjacent
roadstead. A little inland, was a village, or hamlet,
that it suits our purposes to call Wychecombe; and at no
great distance from the hamlet, itself, surrounded by a small
park, stood a house of the age of Henry VII., which was
the abode of Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, a baronet of the
creation of King James I., and the possessor of an
improveable
estate of some three or four thousand a year, which
had been transmitted to him, through a line of ancestors,
that ascended as far back as the time of the Plantagenets.
Neither Wychecombe, nor the head-land, nor the
anchorage
,
was a place of note; for much larger and more favoured
hamlets, villages, and towns, lay scattered about that fine
portion of England; much better roadsteads and bays could
generally be used by the coming or the parting vessel; and
far more important signal-stations were to be met with, all
along that coast. Nevertheless, the roadstead was entered,
when calms or adverse winds rendered it expedient; the
hamlet had its conveniences, and, like most English
hamlets
,
its beauties; and the Hall and park were not without
their claims to state and rural magnificence. A century
since, whatever the table of precedency, or Blackstone may
say, an English baronet, particularly one of the date of
1611, was a much greater personage than he is to-day; and
an estate of 4000 a year, more especially if not
rackrented
,
was of an extent, and necessarily of a local
consequence
,
equal to one of near, or quite three times the same
amount, in our own day. Sir Wycherly, however, enjoyed
an advantage that was of still greater importance, and which
was more common in 1745, than at the present moment.
He had no rival within fifteen miles of him, and the nearest
potentate was a nobleman of a rank and fortune that put
all competition out of the question; one who dwelt in courts,
the favourite of kings; leaving the baronet, as it might be,
in undisturbed enjoyment of all the local homage. Sir
Wycherly had once been a member of Parliament, and only
once. In his youth, he had been a fox-hunter; and a small
property in Yorkshire had long been in the family, as a
sort of foot-hold on such enjoyments; but having broken a
leg, in one of his leaps, he had taken refuge against
ennui
,
by sitting a single session in the House of Commons, as the
member of a borough that lay adjacent to his hunting-box.
This session sufficed for his whole life; the good baronet
having taken the matter so literally, as to make it a point to
be present at all the sittings; a sort of tax on his time, which,
as it came wholly unaccompanied by profit, was very likely
soon to tire out the patience of an old fox-hunter. After
resigning his seat, he retired altogether to Wychecombe,
where he had passed the last fifty years, extolling England,
and most especially that part of it in which his own estates
lay; in abusing the French, with occasional innuendoes
against Spain and Holland; and in eating and drinking.
He had never travelled; for, though Englishmen of his
station
often did visit the continent, a century ago, they oftener
did not. It was the courtly and the noble, who then chiefly
took this means of improving their minds and manners; a
class, to which a baronet by no means belonged,
ex officio
.
To conclude, Sir Wycherly was now eighty-four; hale,
2*
hearty, and a bachelor. He had been born the oldest of
five brothers; the cadets taking refuge, as usual, in the
Inns of court, the church, the army, and the navy; and
precisely
in the order named. The lawyer had actually risen
to be a judge, by the style and appellation of Baron
Wychecombe
;
had three illegitimate children by his housekeeper,
and died, leaving to the eldest thereof, all his professional
earnings, after buying commissions for the two younger in
the army. The divine broke his neck, while yet a curate,
in a fox-hunt; dying unmarried, and, so far as is generally
known, childless. This was Sir Wycherly's favourite
brother
;
who, he was accustomed to say, lost his life, in
setting
an example of field sports, to his parishioners. The
soldier was fairly killed in battle, before he was twenty; and
the name of the sailor suddenly disappeared from the list of
His Majesty's lieutenants, about half-a-century before the
time when our tale opens, by shipwreck. Between the
sailor and the head of the family, however, there had been
no great sympathy; in consequence, as it was rumoured, of
a certain beauty's preference for the latter, though this
preference
produced no
suites
, inasmuch as the lady died a
maid. Mr. Gregory Wychecombe, the lieutenant in
question
,
was what is termed a wild boy; and it was the
general impression, when his parents sent him to sea, that
the ocean would now meet with its match. The hopes of
the family centred in the judge, after the death of the curate;
and it was a great cause of regret, to those who took an
interest
in its perpetuity and renown, that this dignitary did
not marry; since the premature death of all the other sons
had left the hall, park, and goodly farms, without any known
legal heir. In a word, this branch of the family of
Wychecombe
would be extinct, when Sir Wycherly died, and the
entail become useless. Not a female inheritor, even, or a
male inheritor through females, could be traced; and it had
become imperative on Sir Wycherly to make a will, lest the
property should go off, the Lord knew where; or, what was
worse, it should escheat. It is true, Tom Wychecombe, the
judge's eldest son, often gave dark hints about a secret, and
a timely marriage between his parents, a fact that would
have superseded the necessity for all devises, as the property
was strictly tied up, so far as the lineal descendants of a
certain
old
Sir Wycherly were concerned; but the present Sir
Wycherly had seen his brother, in his last illness, on which
occasion, the following conversation had taken place.
And now, brother Thomas, said the baronet, in a
friendly and consoling manner; having, as one may say,
prepared your soul for heaven, by these prayers and
admissions
of your sins, a word may be prudently said,
concerning
the affairs of this world. You know I am childless
that is to say,
I understand you, Wycherly, interrupted the dying
man, you 're a
bachelor
.
That 's it, Thomas; and bachelors
ought
not to have
children. Had our poor brother James escaped that mishap,
he might have been sitting at your bed-side, at this moment,
and
he
could told us all about it. St. James, I used to
call him; and well did he deserve the name!
St. James the least, then, it must have been, Wycherly.
It 's a dreadful thing to have no heir, Thomas! Did you
ever know a case in your practice, in which another estate
was left so completely without an heir, as this of ours?
It does not often happen, brother; heirs are usually
more abundant than estates.
So I thought. Will the king get the title, as well as the
estate, brother, if it should escheat, as you call it?
Being the fountain of honour, he will be rather
indifferent
about the baronetcy.
I should care less, if it went to the next sovereign, who
is English born. Wychecombe has always belonged to
Englishmen!
That it has; and ever will, I trust. You have only to
select an heir, when I am gone, and by making a will, with
proper devises, the property will not escheat. Be careful to
use the full terms of perpetuity.
Every thing was so comfortable, brother, while you
were in health, said Sir Wycherly, fidgeting; you were
my natural heir
Heir of entail, interrupted the judge.
Well, well,
heir
, at all events; and
that
was a
prodigious
comfort to a man like myself, who has a sort of
religious
scruples about making a will. I have heard it
whispered
,
that you were actually married to Martha; in which
case, Tom might drop into our shoes, so readily, without
any more signing and sealing.
A
filius nullius
, returned the other, too conscientious to
lend himself to a deception of that nature.
Why, brother, Tom often seems to me to favour such
an idea, himself.
No wonder, Wycherly, for the idea would greatly
favour
him. Tom, and his brothers, are all
filii nullorum
,
God forgive me, for that same wrong.
I wonder neither Charles, nor Gregory, thought of
marrying
,
before they lost their lives for their king and country,
put in Sir Wycherly, in an upbraiding tone, as if he thought
his penniless brethren had done him an injury, in neglecting
to supply him with an heir, though he had been so forgetful
himself, of the same great duty. I did think of bringing
in a bill, for providing heirs for unmarried persons, without
the trouble and responsibility of making wills.
That would have been a great improvement on the law
of descentsI hope you wouldn't have overlooked the
ancestors
.
Not Ieverybody would have got his rights. They
tell me poor Charles never spoke after he was shot; but I
dare say, did we know the truth, he regretted sincerely that
he never married.
There, for once, Wycherly, I think you are likely to be
wrong. A
femme sole
without food, is rather a helpless sort
of a person.
Well, well, I wish he had married. What would it
have been to me, had he left a dozen widows.
It might have raised some awkward questions as to
dowry; and if each left a son, the title and estates would
have been worse off than they are at present, without
widows, or legitimate children.
Any thing would be better than having no heir. I
believe
I 'm the first baronet of Wychecombe, who has been
obliged to make a will!
Quite likely, returned the brother, drily; I
remember
to have got nothing from the last one, in that way.
Charles and Gregory fared no better. Never mind,
Wycherly
,
you behaved like a father to us all.
I don't mind signing cheques, in the least; but the wills
have an irreligious appearance, in my eyes. There are a
good many Wychecombes, in England; I wonder some of
them are not of our family! They tell me a hundredth
cousin is just as good an heir, as a first-born son.
Failing nearer of kin. But we have no hundredth
cousins of the
whole blood
.
There are the Wychecombes of Surrey, brother
Thomas
?
Descended from a bastard of the second baronet, and
out of the line of descent, altogether.
But the Wychecombes of Hertfordshire, I have always
heard were of our family, and legitimate.
True, as regards matrimonyrather too much of it, by
the way. They branched off in 1487, long before the
creation
,
and have nothing to do with the entail; the first of
their line coming from old Sir Michael Wychecombe, Kt.
and Sheriff of Devonshire, by his second wife Margery;
while we are derived from the same male ancestor, through
Wycherly, the only son by Joan, the first wife. Wycherly,
and Michael, the son of Michael and Margery, were of the
half-blood, as respects each other, and could not be heirs of
blood. What was true of the ancestors, is true of the
descendants
.
But we came of the same ancestor, and the estate is
far older than 1487.
Quite true, brother; nevertheless, the half-blood can't
take; so says the perfection of human reason.
I never could understand these niceties of the law, said
Sir Wycherly, sighing; but I suppose they are all right.
There are so many Wychecombes scattered about England,
that I should think some one among them all, might be my
heir!
Every man of them bears a bar in his arms, or is of the
half-blood.
You are quite sure, brother, that Tom is a
filius
nullus
?
for the baronet had forgotten most of the little Latin
he ever knew, and translated this legal phrase into no
son.
Filius nullius
, Sir Wycherly, the son of nobody; your
reading would literally make Tom, nobody; whereas, he is
only the son of nobody.
But, brother, he is your son, and as like you, as two
hounds of the same litter.
I am
nullus
, in the eye of the law, as regards poor
Tom; who, until he marries, and has children of his own,
is altogether without legal kindred. Nor do I know that
legitimacy would make Tom any better; for he is presuming
and confident enough for the heir apparent to the throne, as
it is.
Well, there's this young sailor, who has been so much
at the station lately, since he was left ashore for the cure of
his wounds. 'T is a most gallant lad; and the First Lord
has sent him a commission, as a reward for his good
conduct
,
in cutting out the Frenchman. I look upon him as a
credit to the name; and I make no question he is, some way
or other, of our family.
Does he claim to be so? asked the judge, a little quickly,
for he distrusted men in general, and thought, from all he
had heard, that some attempt might have been made to
practise
on his brother's simplicity. I thought you told me
that he came from the American colonies?
So he does; he's a native of Virginia, as was his father
before him.
A convict, perhaps; or a servant, quite likely, who has
found the name of his former master, more to his liking
than his own. Such things are common, they tell me,
beyond
seas.
Yes, if he were anything but an American, I might wish
he were my heir, returned Sir Wycherly, in a melancholy
tone; but it would be worse than to let the lands escheat,
as you call it, to place an American in possession of
Wychecombe
.
The manors have always had English owners,
down to the present moment, thank God!
Should they have any other, it will be your own fault,
Wycherly. When I am dead, and that will happen ere
many weeks, the human being will not be living, who can
take that property, after your demise, in any other manner
than by escheat, or by devise. There will then be neither
heir of entail, nor heir at law; and you may make whom
you please, master of Wychecombe, provided he be not an
alien.
Not an American, I suppose, brother; an American is
an alien, of course.
Humph!why, not in law, whatever he may be
according
to our English notions. Harkee, brother Wycherly;
I've never asked you, or wished you to leave the estate to
Tom, or his younger brothers; for one, and all, are
filii
nullorum
as I term 'em, though my brother Record will
have it, it ought to be
filii nullius
, as well as
filius nullius
.
Let that be as it may; no bastard should lord it at
Wychecombe
;
and rather than the king should get the lands, to
bestow
on some favourite, I would give it to the half-blood.
Can that be done without making a will, brother
Thomas
?
It cannot, Sir Wycherly; nor with a will, so long as an
heir of entail can be found.
Is there no way of making Tom a
filius somebody
, so
that
he
can succeed?
Not under our laws. By the civil law, such a thing
might have been done, and by the Scotch law; but not under
the perfection of reason.
I wish you knew this young Virginian! The lad bears
both of my names, Wycherly Wychecombe.
He is not a
filius Wycherly
is he, baronet?
Fie upon thee, brother Thomas! Do you think I have
less candour than thyself, that I would not acknowledge my
own flesh and blood. I never saw the youngster, until
within the last six months, when he was landed from the
roadstead, and brought to Wychecombe, to be cured of his
wounds; nor ever heard of him before. When they told
me his name was Wycherly Wychecombe, I could do no
less than call and see him. The poor fellow lay at death's
door for a fortnight; and it was while we had little or no
hope of saving him, that I got the few family anecdotes from
him. Now, that would be good evidence in law, I believe,
Thomas.
For certain things, had the lad really died. Surviving,
he must be heard on his
voire dire
, and under oath. But
what was his tale?
A very short one. He told me his father was a
Wycherly
Wychecombe, and that his grandfather had been a
Virginia planter. This was all he seemed to know of his
ancestry.
And probably all there was of them. My Tom is not
the only
filius nullius
that has been among us, and this
grandfather, if he has not actually stolen the name, has got
it by these doubtful means. As for the Wycherly, it should
pass for nothing. Learning that there is a line of baronets
of this name, every pretender to the family would be apt to
call a son Wycherly.
The line will shortly be ended, brother, returned Sir
Wycherly, sighing. I wish you might be mistaken; and,
after all, Tom shouldn't prove to be that
filius
you call
him.
Mr. Baron Wychecombe, as much from
esprit de corps
as from moral principle, was a man of strict integrity, in
all things that related to
meum
and
tuum
. He was
particuarly
rigid in his notions concerning the transmission of
real estate, and the rights of primogeniture. The world had
taken little interest in the private history of a lawyer, and
his sons having been born before his elevation to the bench,
he passed with the public for a widower, with a family of
promising boys. Not one in a hundred of his acquaintances
even, suspected the fact; and nothing would have been easier
for him, than to have imposed on his brother, by inducing
him to make a will under some legal mystification or other,
and to have caused Tom Wychecombe to succeed to the
property in question, by an indisputable title. There would
have been no great difficulty even, in his son's assuming
and maintaining his right to the baronetcy, inasmuch as
there would be no competitor, and the crown officers were
not particularly rigid in inquiring into the claims of those
who assumed a title that brought with it no political
privileges
.
Still, he was far from indulging in any such project.
To him it appeared that the Wychecombe estate ought to go
with the principles that usually governed such matters; and,
although he submitted to the dictum of the common law, as
regarded the provision which excluded the half-blood from
inheriting, with the deference of an English common-law
lawyer, he saw and felt, that, failing the direct line,
Wychecombe
ought to revert to the descendants of Sir Michael by
his second son, for the plain reason that they were just as
much derived from the person who had acquired the estate,
as his brother Wycherly and himself. Had there been
descendants
of females, even, to interfere, no such opinion
would have existed; but, as between an escheat, or a devise
in favour of a
filius nullius
, or of the descendant of a
filius
nullius
, the half-blood possessed every possible advantage.
In his legal eyes, legitimacy was everything, although he
had not hesitated to be the means of bringing into the world
seven illegitimate children, that being the precise number
Martha had the credit of having borne him, though three
only survived. After reflecting a moment, therefore, he
turned to the baronet, and addressed him more seriously
than he had yet done, in the present dialogue; first taking a
draught of cordial to give him strength for the occasion.
Listen to me, brother Wycherly, said the judge, with
a gravity that at once caught the attention of the other.
You know something of the family history, and I need do
no more than allude to it. Our ancestors were the knightly
possessors of Wychecombe, centuries before King James
established the rank of baronet. When our
great-grandfather
,
Sir Wycherly, accepted the patent of 1611, he
scarcely did himself honour; for, by aspiring higher, he
might have got a peerage. However, a baronet he became,
and for the first time since Wychecombe was Wychecombe,
the estate was entailed, to do credit to the new rank. Now,
the first Sir Wycherly had three sons, and no daughter.
Each of these sons succeeded; the two eldest as bachelors,
and the youngest was our grandfather. Sir Thomas, the
fourth baronet, left an only child, Wycherly, our father.
Sir Wycherly, our father, had five sons, Wycherly his
successor
,
yourself, and the sixth baronet; myself; James;
Charles; and Gregory. James broke his neck at your side.
The two last lost their lives in the king's service, unmarried;
and neither you, nor I, have entered into the holy state of
matrimony. I cannot survive a month, and the hopes of
perpetuating the direct line of the family, rest with
yourself
.
This accounts for all the descendants of Sir
Wycherly
,
the first baronet; and it also settles the question of
heirs of entail, of whom there are none after myself. To
go back beyond the time of King James I.: Twice did the
elder lines of the Wychecombes fail, between the reign of
Vol. I.  3
King Richard II. and King Henry VII., when Sir Michael
succeeded. Now, in each of these cases, the law disposed
of the succession; the youngest branches of the family, in
both instances, getting the estate. It follows that agreeably
to legal decisions had at the time, when the facts must have
been known, that the Wychecombes were reduced to these
younger lines. Sir Michael had two wives. From the
first
we
are derived  from the last, the Wychecombes of
Hertfordshiresince known as baronets of that county, by
the style and title of Sir Reginald Wychecome of
Wychecombe-Regis
,
Herts.
The present Sir Reginald can have no claim, being of
the half-blood, put in Sir Wycherly, with a brevity of
manner
that denoted feeling. The half-blood is as bad as a
nullius
, as you call Tom.
Not quite. A person of the half-blood is as legitimate
as the king's majesty; whereas, a nullius is of
no
blood.
Now, suppose for a moment, Sir Wycherly, that you had
been a son by a first wife, and I had been a son by a second
would there have been no relationship between us?
What a question, Tom, to put to your own brother!
But I should not be your
own
brother, my good sir;
only your
half
brother; of the
half
, and not of the
whole
blood.
What of thatwhat of that?your father would have
been my fatherwe would have had the same namethe
same family historythe same family
feelings
poh! poh!
we should have been both Wychecombes, exactly as we
are to-day.
Quite true, and yet I could not have been your heir, nor
you mine. The estate would escheat to the king,
Hanoverian
or Scotchman, before it came to me. Indeed, to
me
it
could never come.
Thomas, you are trifling with my ignorance, and making
matters worse than they really are. Certainly, as long as
you lived, you would be
my
heir!
Very true, as to the 20,000 in the funds, but not as to
the baronetcy and Wychecombe. So far as the two last
are concerned, I am heir of blood, and of entail, of the body
of Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, the first baronet, and the
maker of the entail.
Had there been no entail, and had I died a child, who
would have succeeded our father, supposing there had been
two mothers?
I, as the next surviving son.
There!  I knew it must be so! exclaimed Sir
Wycherly
,
in triumph; and all this time you have been joking
with me!
Not so fast, brother of minenot so fast. I should be
of the
whole
blood, as respected our father, and all the
Wychecombes that have gone before him; but of the
half
-blood
,
as respected
you
. From our father I might have
taken, as his heir-at-law: but from
you
, never, having been
of the
half
-blood.
I would have made a will, in that case, Thomas, and
left you every farthing, said Sir Wycherly, with feeling.
That is just what I wish you to do with Sir Reginald
Wychecombe. You must take him; a
filius nullius
, in the
person of my son Tom; a stranger; or let the property
escheat
;
for, we are so peculiarly placed as not to have a
known relative, by either the male or female lines; the
maternal
ancestors being just as barren of heirs as the paternal.
Our good mother was the natural daughter of the third
Earl of Prolific; our grandmother was the last of her race,
so far as human ken can discover; our great-grandmother
is said to have had semi-royal blood in her veins, without
the aid of the church, and beyond that it would be hopeless
to attempt tracing consanguinity on that side of the house.
No, Wycherly; it is Sir Reginald who has the best right to
the land; Tom, or one of his brothers, an utter stranger, or
His Majesty, follow. Remember that estates of 4000 a
year, don't often escheat, now-a-days.
If you 'll draw up a will, brother, I 'll leave it all to
Tom, cried the baronet, with sudden energy. Nothing
need be said about the
nullius;
and when I 'm gone, he 'll
step quietly into my place.
Nature triumphed a moment in the bosom of the father;
but habit, and the stern sense of right, soon overcame the
feeling. Perhaps certain doubts, and a knowledge of his
son's real character, contributed their share towards the
reply.
It ought not to be, Sir Wycherly, returned the judge,
musing; Tom has no right to Wychecombe, and Sir
Reginald has the best moral right possible, though the law
cuts him off. Had Sir Michael made the entail, instead of
our great-grandfather, he would have come in, as a matter
of course.
I never liked Sir Reginald Wychecombe, said the
baronet, stubbornly.
What of that?  He will not trouble you while living,
and when dead it will be all the same. ComecomeI
will draw the will myself, leaving blanks for the name; and
when it is once done, you will sign it, cheerfully. It is the last
legal act I shall ever perform, and it will be a suitable one,
death being constantly before me.
This ended the dialogue. The will was drawn
according
to promise; Sir Wycherly took it to his room to read,
carefully inserted the name of Tom Wychecombe in all the
blank spaces, brought it back, duly executed the
instrument
in his brother's presence, and then gave the paper to
his nephew to preserve, with a strong injunction on him to
keep the secret, until the instrument should have force by
his own death. Mr. Baron Wychecombe died in six weeks,
and the baronet returned to his residence, a sincere mourner
for the loss of an only brother. A more unfortunate
selection
of an heir could not have been made, as Tom
Wychecombe
was, in reality, the son of a barrister in the Temple;
the fancied likeness to the reputed father existing only in
the imagination of his credulous uncle.
CHAPTER II.
How fearful
And dizzy 't is, to cast one's eyes so low!
The crows, and choughs, that wing the midway air,
Show scarce so gross as beetles: Half-way down
Hangs one that gathers samphire: dreadful trade!
King Lear
.
This
digression on the family of Wychecombe has led us
far from the signal-station, the head-land, and the fog, with
which the tale opened. The little dwelling connected with
the station stood at a short distance from the staff, sheltered,
by the formation of the ground, from the bleak winds of the
channel, and fairly embowered in shrubs and flowers. It
was a humble cottage, that had been ornamented with more
taste than was usual in England at that day. Its whitened
walls, thatched roof, picketed garden, and trellised porch,
bespoke care, and a mental improvement in the inmates,
that were scarcely to be expected in persons so humbly
employed
as the keeper of the signal-staff, and his family.
All near the house, too, was in the same excellent condition;
for while the headland itself lay in common, this portion of
it was enclosed in two or three pretty little fields, that were
grazed by a single horse, and a couple of cows. There were
no hedges, however, the thorn not growing willingly in a
situation so exposed; but the fields were divided by fences,
neatly enough made of wood, that declared its own origin,
having in fact been part of the timbers and planks of a
wreck. As the whole was whitewashed, it had a rustic, and
in a climate where the sun is seldom oppressive, by no means
a disagreeable appearance.
The scene with which we desire to commence the tale,
opens about seven o'clock on a July morning. On a bench
at the foot of the signal-staff, was seated one of a frame
that was naturally large and robust, but which was sensibly
beginning to give way, either by age or disease. A glance
at the red, bloated face, would suffice to tell a medical man,
that the habits had more to do with the growing failure of
3 *
the system, than any natural derangement of the physical
organs. The face too, was singularly manly, and had once
been handsome, even; nay, it was not altogether without
claims to be so considered still; though intemperance was
making sad inroads on its comeliness. This person was
about fifty years old, and his air, as well as his attire,
denoted
a mariner; not a common seaman, nor yet altogether
an officer; but one of those of a middle station, who in
navies
used to form a class by themselves; being of a rank
that entitled them to the honours of the quarter-deck, though
out of the regular line of promotion. In a word, he wore
the unpretending uniform of a master. A century ago,
the dress of the English naval officer was exceedingly
simple
,
though more appropriate to the profession perhaps, than
the more showy attire that has since been introduced.
Epaulettes were not used by any, and the anchor button,
with the tint that is called navy blue, and which is meant to
represent the deep hue of the ocean, with white facings,
composed the principal peculiarities of the dress. The
person
introduced to the reader, whose name was Dutton, and
who was simply the officer in charge of the signal-station,
had a certain neatness about his well-worn uniform, his
linen, and all of his attire, which showed that some person
more interested in such matters than one of his habits was
likely to be, had the care of his wardrobe. In this respect,
indeed, his appearance was unexceptionable; and there was
an air about the whole man which showed that nature, if
not education, had intended him for something far better
than the being he actually was.
Dutton was waiting, at that early hour, to ascertain, as
the veil of mist was raised from the face of the sea, whether
a sail might be in sight, that required of him the execution
of any of his simple functions. That some one was near
by, on the head-land, too, was quite evident, by the
occasional
interchange of speech; though no person but himself
was visible. The direction of the sounds would seem to
indicate
that a man was actually over the brow of the cliff,
perhaps a hundred feet removed from the seat occupied by
the master.
Recollect the sailor's maxim, Mr. Wychecombe, called
out Dutton, in a warning voice; one hand for the king,
and the other for self! Those cliffs are ticklish places; and
really it does seem a little unnatural that a sea-faring person
like yourself, should have so great a passion for flowers, as
to risk his neck in order to make a posy!
Never fear for me, Mr. Dutton, answered a full, manly
voice, that one could have sworn issued from the chest of
youth; never fear for me; we sailors are used to hanging
in the air.
Ay, with good three-stranded ropes to hold on by, young
gentleman. Now His Majesty's government has just made
you an officer, there is a sort of obligation to take care of
your life, in order that it may be used, and, at need, given
away, in his service.
Quite truequite true, Mr. Duttonso true, I wonder
you think it necessary to remind me of it. I am very
grateful
to His Majesty's government, and
While speaking the voice seemed to descend, getting at
each instant less and less distinct, until, in the end, it became
quite inaudible. Dutton looked uneasy, for at that instant
a noise was heard, and then it was quite clear some heavy
object was falling down the face of the cliff. Now it was
that the mariner felt the want of good nerves, and
experienced
the sense of humiliation which accompanied the
consciousness
of having destroyed them by his excesses. He
trembled in every limb, and, for the moment, was actually
unable to rise. A light step at his side, however, drew a
glance in that direction, and his eye fell on the form of a
lovely girl of nineteen, his own daughter, Mildred.
I heard you calling to some one, father, said the latter,
looking wistfully but distrustfully at her parent, as if
wondering
at his yielding to his infirmity so early in the day;
can I be of service to you?
Poor Wychecombe? exclaimed Dutton. He went over
the cliff in search of a nosegay to offer to yourself, and
andI feargreatly fear
What, father? demanded Mildred, in a voice of horror,
the rich colour disappearing from a face which it left of the
hue of death. Nononohe
cannot
have fallen.
Dutton bent his head down, drew a long breath, and then
seemed to gain more command of his nerves. He was about
to rise, when the sound of a horse's feet was heard, and then
Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, mounted on a quiet pony, rode
slowly up to the signal-staff. It was a common thing for
the baronet to appear on the cliffs early in the morning, but
it was not usual for him to come unattended. The instant
her eyes fell on the fine form of the venerable old man,
Mildred, who seemed to know him well, and to use the
familiarity
of one confident of being a favourite, exclaimed
Oh! Sir Wycherly, how fortunatewhere is Richard?
Good morrow, my pretty Milly, answered the baronet,
cheerfully; fortunate or not, here I am, and not a bit
flattered
that your first question should be after the groom,
instead
of his master. I have sent Dick on a message to the
vicar's. Now my poor brother, the judge, is dead and gone,
I find Mr. Rotherham more and more necessary to me.
Oh! dear Sir WycherlyMr. Wychecombe
Lieutenant
Wychecombe, I meanthe young officer from Virginia
he who was so desperately woundedin whose recovery
we all took so deep an interest
Wellwhat of him, child?you surely do not mean to
put him on a level with Mr. Rotherham, in the way of
religious
consolationand, as for anything else, there is no
consanguinity between the Wychecombes of Virginia and
my family. He may be a
filius nullius
of the
Wychecombes
of Wychecombe-Regis, Herts, but has no connection
with those of Wychecombe-Hall, Devonshire.
Theretherethe cliff!the cliff! added Mildred,
unable, for the moment, to be more explicit.
As the girl pointed towards the precipice, and looked the
very image of horror, the good-hearted old baronet began to
get some glimpses of the truth; and, by means of a few words
with Dutton, soon knew quite as much as his two
companions
.
Descending from his pony with surprising activity
for one of his years, Sir Wycherly was soon on his feet, and
a sort of confused consultation between the three succeeded.
Neither liked to approach the cliff, which was nearly
perpendicular
at the extremity of the headland, and was always
a trial to the nerves of those who shrunk from standing on
the verge of precipices. They stood like persons paralyzed,
until Dutton, ashamed of his weakness, and recalling the
thousand lessons in coolness and courage, he had received
in his own manly profession, made a movement towards
advancing
to the edge of the cliff, in order to ascertain the real
state of the case. The blood returned to the cheeks of
Mildred
,
too, and she again found a portion of her natural spirit
raising her courage.
Stop, father, she said, hastily; you are infirm, and
are in a tremour, at this moment. My head is steadierlet
me go to the verge of the hill, and learn what has
happened
.
This was uttered with a forced calmness that deceived her
auditors, both of whom, the one from age, and the other
from shattered nerves, were certainly in no condition to
assume
the same office. It required the all-seeing eye, which
alone can scan the heart, to read all the agonized suspense
with which that young and beautiful creature approached the
spot, where she might command a view of the whole of the
side of the fearful declivity, from its giddy summit to the
base where it was washed by the sea. The latter, indeed,
could not literally be seen from above, the waves having so
far undermined the cliff, as to leave a projection that
concealed
the point where the rocks and the water came
absolutely
in contact; the upper portion of the weather-worn rocks
falling a little inwards, so as to leave a ragged surface that
was sufficiently broken to contain patches of earth, and
verdure, sprinkled with the flowers peculiar to such an
exposure
.
The fog, also, intercepted the sight, giving to the
descent the appearance of a fathomless abyss. Had the life
of the most indifferent person been in jeopardy, under the
circumstances named, Mildred would have been filled with
deep awe; but a gush of tender sensations, which had
hitherto
been pent in the sacred privacy of her virgin affections,
struggled with natural horror, as she trod lightly on the very
verge of the declivity, and cast a timid but eager glance
beneath
.
Then she recoiled a step, raised her hands in alarm,
and hid her face, as if to shut out some frightful spectacle.
By this time, Dutton's practical knowledge and
recollection
had returned. As is common with seamen, whose
minds contain vivid pictures of the intricate tracery of their
vessel's rigging in the darkest nights, his thoughts had
flashed athwart all the probable circumstances, and presented
a just image of the facts.
The boy could not be seen had he absolutely fallen, and
were there no fog; for the cliff tumbles home, Sir
Wycherly
,
he said, eagerly, unconsciously using a familiar
nautical phrase to express his meaning. He must be
clinging
to the side of the precipice, and that, too, above the
swell of the rocks.
Stimulated by a common feeling, the two men now
advanced
hastily to the brow of the hill, and there, indeed, as
with Mildred herself, a single look sufficed to tell them the
whole truth. Young Wychecombe, in leaning forward to
pluck a flower, had pressed so hard upon the bit of rock
on which a foot rested, as to cause it to break, thereby
losing his balance. A presence of mind that amounted
almost
to inspiration, and a high resolution, alone saved him
from being dashed to pieces. Perceiving the rock to give
way, he threw himself forward, and alighted on a narrow
shelf, a few feet beneath the place where he had just stood,
and at least ten feet removed from it, laterally. The shelf
on which he alighted was ragged, and but two or three feet
wide. It would have afforded only a check to his fall, had
there not fortunately been some shrubs among the rocks
above it. By these shrubs the young man caught, actually
swinging off in the air, under the impetus of his leap.
Happily, the shrubs were too well rooted to give way; and,
swinging himself round, with the address of a sailor, the
youthful lieutenant was immediately on his feet, in
comparative
safety. The silence that succeeded was the consequence
of the shock he felt, in finding him so suddenly thrown into
this perilous situation. The summit of the cliff was now
about six fathoms above his head, and the shelf on which he
stood, impended over a portion of the cliff that was
absolutely
perpendicular, and which might be said to be out of
the line of those projections along which he had so lately
been idly gathering flowers. It was physically impossible
for any human being to extricate himself from such a
situation
,
without assistance. This Wychecombe understood at
a glance, and he had passed the few minutes that intervened
between his fall and the appearance of the party above him,
in devising the means necessary to his liberation. As it
was, few men, unaccustomed to the giddy elevations of the
mast, could have mustered a sufficient command of nerve to
maintain a position on the ledge where he stood. Even
he could not have continued there, without steadying his
form by the aid of the bushes.
As soon as the baronet and Dutton got a glimpse of the
perilous position of young Wychecombe, each recoiled in
horror from the sight, as if fearful of being precipitated on
top of him. Both, then, actually lay down on the grass,
and approached the edge of the cliff again, in that humble
attitude, even trembling as they lay at length, with their
chins projecting over the rocks, staring downwards at the
victim. The young man could see nothing of all this; for,
as he stood with his back against the cliff, he had not room
to turn, with safety, or even to look upwards. Mildred,
however, seemed to lose all sense of self and of danger, in
view of the extremity in which the youth beneath was placed.
She stood on the very verge of the precipice, and looked
down with a steadiness and impunity that would have been
utterly impossible for her to attain under less exciting
circumstances
;
even allowing the young man to catch a
glimpse of her rich locks, as they hung about her beautiful
face.
For God's sake, Mildred, called out the youth, keep
further from the cliffI see you, and we can now hear each
other without so much risk.
What can we do to rescue you, Wychecombe? eagerly
asked the girl. Tell me, I entreat you; for Sir Wycherly
and my father are both unnerved!
Blessed creature! and
you
are mindful of my danger!
But, be not uneasy, Mildred; do as I tell you, and all will
yet be well. I hope you hear and understand what I say,
dearest girl?
Perfectly, returned Mildred, nearly choked by the effort
to be calm. I hear every syllablespeak on.
Go you then to the signal-halyardslet one end fly
loose, and pull upon the other, until the whole line has come
downwhen that is done, return here, and I will tell you
morebut, for heaven's sake, keep farther from the cliff.
The thought that the rope, small and frail as it seemed,
might be of use, flashed on the brain of the girl; and in a
moment she was at the staff. Time and again, when liquor
incapacitated her father to perform his duty, had Mildred
bent-on, and hoisted the signals for him; and thus, happily,
she was expert in the use of the halyards. In a minute she
had unrove them, and the long line lay in a little pile at her
feet.
'T is done, Wycherly, she said, again looking over the
cliff; shall I throw you down one end of the rope?but,
alas! I have not strength to raise you; and Sir Wycherly
and father seem unable to assist me!
Do not hurry yourself, Mildred, and all will be well.
Go, and put one end of the line around the signal-staff, then
put the two ends together, tie them in a knot, and drop them
down over my head. Be careful not to come too near the
cliff, for
The last injunction was useless, Mildred having flown to
execute her commission. Her quick mind readily
comprehended
what was expected of her, and her nimble fingers
soon performed their task. Tying a knot in the ends
of the line, she did as desired, and the small rope was soon
dangling within reach of Wychecombe's arm. It is not easy
to make a landsman understand the confidence which a
sailor feels in a rope. Place but a frail and rotten piece of
twisted hemp in his hand, and he will risk his person in
situations from which he would otherwise recoil in dread.
Accustomed to hang suspended in the air, with ropes only
for his foothold, or with ropes to grasp with his hand, his
eye gets an intuitive knowledge of what will sustain him,
and he unhesitatingly trusts his person to a few seemingly
slight strands, that, to one unpractised, appear wholly
unworthy
of his confidence. Signal-halyards are ropes smaller
than the little finger of a man of any size; but they are
usually made with care, and every rope-yarn tells.
Wychecombe
,
too, was aware that these particular halyards were
new, for he had assisted in reeving them himself, only the
week before. It was owing to this circumstance that they
were long enough to reach him; a large allowance for wear
and tear having been made in cutting them from the coil.
As it was, the ends dropped some twenty feet below the
ledge on which he stood.
All safe, now, Mildred! cried the young man, in a
voice of exultation, the moment his hand caught the two
ends of the line, which he immediately passed around his
body, beneath the arms, as a precaution against accidents.
All safe, now, dearest girl; have no further concern about
me.
Mildred drew back, for worlds could not have tempted her
to witness the desperate effort that she knew must follow.
By this time, Sir Wycherly, who had been an interested
witness of all that passed, found his voice, and assumed the
office of director.
Stop, my young namesake, he eagerly cried, when he
found that the sailor was about to make an effort to drag his
own body up the cliff; stop; that will never do; let
Dutton
and me do that much for you, at least. We have seen
all that has passed, and are now able to do something.
Nono, Sir Wycherlyon no account touch the
halyards
.
By hauling them over the top of the rocks you will
probably cut them, or part them, and then I 'm lost,
without
hope!
Oh! Sir Wycherly, said Mildred, earnestly, clasping
her hands together, as if to enforce the request with prayer;
do notdo not touch the line.
We had better let the lad manage the matter in his own
way, put in Dutton; he is active, resolute, and a seaman,
and will do better for himself than I fear we can do for him.
He has got a turn round his body, and is tolerably safe
against any slip, or mishap.
As the words were uttered, the whole three drew back a
short distance and watched the result, in intense anxiety.
Dutton, however, so far recollected himself, as to take an
end of the old halyards, which were kept in a chest at the
foot of the staff, and to make an attempt to stopper together
the two parts of the little rope on which the youth depended,
for should one of the parts of it break, without this
precaution
,
there was nothing to prevent the halyards from
running
round the staff, and destroying the hold. The size of
the halyards rendered this expedient very difficult of
attainment
,
but enough was done to give the arrangement a little
more of the air of security. All this time young
Wychecombe
was making his own preparations on the ledge, and
quite out of view; but the tension on the halyards soon
announced
that his weight was now pendent from them.
Mildred's
heart seemed ready to leap from her mouth, as she
noted each jerk on the lines; and her father watched every
Vol. I.  4
new pull, as if he expected the next moment would produce
the final catastophe. It required a prodigious effort in the
young man to raise his own weight for such a distance, by
lines so small. Had the rope been of any size, the
achievement would have been trifling for one of the frame
and habits of the sailor, more especially as he could slightly
avail himself of his feet, by pressing them against the rocks;
but, as it was, he felt as if he were dragging the mountain
up after him. At length, his head appeared a few inches
above the rocks, but with his feet pressed against the cliff,
and his body inclining outward, at an angle of forty-five
degrees.
Help himhelp him, father! exclaimed Mildred,
covering
her face with her hands, to exclude the sight of
Wychecombe's
desperate struggles. If he fall now, he will be
destroyed. Oh! save him, save him, Sir Wycherly!
But neither of those to whom she appealed, could be of
any use. The nervous trembling again came over the
father
;
and as for the baronet, age and inexperience rendered
him helpless.
Have you no rope, Mr. Dutton, to throw over my
shoulders, cried Wychecombe, suspending his exertions in
pure exhaustion, still keeping all he had gained, with his
head projecting outward, over the abyss beneath, and his
face turned towards heaven. Throw a rope over my
shoulders, and drag my body in to the cliff.
Dutton showed an eager desire to comply, but his nerves
had not yet been excited by the usual potations, and his
hands shook in a way to render it questionable whether he
could perform even this simple service. But for his
daughter
,
indeed, he would hardly have set about it intelligently.
Mildred, accustomed to using the signal-halyards, procured
the old line, and handed it to her father, who discovered
some of his professional knowledge in his manner of using
it. Doubling the halyards twice, he threw the bight over
Wychecombe's shoulders, and aided by Mildred, endeavoured
to draw the body of the young man upwards and towards
the cliff. But their united strength was unequal to the task,
and wearied with holding on, and, indeed, unable to support
his own weight any longer by so small a rope, Wychecombe
felt compelled to suffer his feet to drop beneath him, and slid
down again upon the ledge. Here, even his vigorous frame
shook with its prodigious exertions; and he was compelled
to seat himself on the shelf, and rest with his back against
the cliff, to recover his self-command and strength.
Mildred
uttered a faint shriek as he disappeared, but was too
much horror-stricken to approach the verge of the precipice
to ascertain his fate.
Be composed, Milly, said her father, he is safe, as
you may see by the halyards; and to say the truth, the stuff
holds on well. So long as the line proves true, the boy
can't fall; he has taken a double turn with the end of it round
his body. Make your mind easy, girl, for I feel better now,
and see my way clear. Don't be uneasy, Sir Wycherly;
we'll have the lad safe on
terra firma
again, in ten minutes.
I scarce know what has come over me, this morning; but
I've not had the command of my limbs as in common. It
cannot be fright, for I've seen too many men in danger to be
disabled by
that;
and I think, Milly, it must be the
rheumatism
,
of which I've so often spoken, and which I've
inherited
from my poor mother, dear old soul. Do you know,
Sir Wycherly, that rheumatism can be inherited like gout?
I dare say it mayI dare say it may, Duttonbut
never mind the disease, now; get my young namesake back
here on the grass, and I will hear all about it. I would give
the world that I had not sent Dick to Mr. Rotherham's this
morning. Can't we contrive to make the pony pull the
boy up?
The traces are hardly strong enough for such work, Sir
Wycherly. Have a little patience, and I will manage the
whole thing, `ship-shape, and Brister-fashion,' as we say at
sea. Halloo there, Master Wychecombeanswer my hail,
and I will soon get you into deep water.
I'm safe on the ledge, returned the voice of
Wychecombe
,
from below; I wish you would look to the
signal-halyards
,
and see they do not chafe against the rocks, Mr.
Dutton.
All right, sir; all right. Slack up, if you please, and
let me have all the line you can, without casting off from
your body. Keep fast the end, for fear of accidents.
In an instant the halyards slackened, and Dutton, who by
this time had gained his self-command, though still weak
and unnerved by the habits of the last fifteen years, forced
the bight along the edge of the cliff, until he had brought it
over a projection of the rocks, where it fastened itself. This
arrangement caused the line to lead down to the part of the
cliffs from which the young man had fallen, and where it was
by no means difficult for a steady head and active limbs to
move about and pluck flowers. It consequently remained
for Wychecombe merely to regain a footing on that part of
the hill-side, to ascend to the summit without difficulty. It
is true he was now below the point from which he had fallen;
but by swinging himself off laterally, or even by springing,
aided by the line, it was not a difficult achievement to reach
it, and he no sooner understood the nature of the change
that had been made, than he set about attempting it. The
confident manner of Dutton encouraged both the baronet
and Mildred, and they drew to the cliff, again; standing near
the verge, though on the part where the rocks might be
descended
,
with less apprehension of consequences.
As soon as Wychecombe had made all his preparations,
he stood on the end of the ledge, tightened the line, looked
carefully for a foothold on the other side of the chasm, and
made his leap. As a matter of course, the body of the
young man swung readily across the space, until the line
became perpendicular, and then he found a surface so
broken, as to render his ascent by no means difficult, aided
as he was by the halyards. Scrambling upwards, he soon
rejected the aid of the line, and sprang upon the head-land.
At the same instant, Mildred fell senseless on the grass.
CHAPTER III.
I want a hero:an uncommon want,
When every year and month send forth a new one;
'Till, after cloying the gazettes with cant,
The age discovers he is not the true one;
Byron
.
In
consequence of the unsteadiness of the father's nerves,
the duty of raising Mildred in his arms, and of carrying her
to the cottage, devolved on the young man. This he did
with a readiness and concern which proved how deep an
interest he took in her situation, and with a power of arm
which showed that his strength was increased rather than
lessened by the condition into which she had fallen. So
rapid was his movement, that no one saw the kiss he
impressed
on the pallid cheek of the sweet girl, or the tender
pressure with which he grasped the lifeless form. By the
time he reached the door, the motion and air had begun to
revive her, and Wychecombe committed her to the care of
her alarmed mother, with a few hurried words of
explanation
.
He did not leave the house, however, for a quarter of
an hour, except to call out to Dutton that Mildred was
reviving
,
and that he need be under no uneasiness on her
account
.
Why he remained so long, we leave the reader to
imagine, for the girl had been immediately taken to her
own little chamber, and he saw her no more for several
hours.
When our young sailor came out upon the head-land
again, he found the party near the flag-staff increased to
four. Dick, the groom, had returned from his errand, and
Tom Wychecombe, the intended heir of the baronet, was
also there, in mourning for his reputed father, the judge.
This young man had become a frequent visiter to the
station
,
of late, affecting to imbibe his uncle's taste for sea
air, and a view of the ocean. There had been several
meetings
between himself and his namesake, and each interview
was becoming less amicable than the preceding, for a reason
that was sufficiently known to the parties. When they met
4 *
on the present occasion, therefore, the bows they exchanged
were haughty and distant, and the glances cast at each other
might have been termed hostile, were it not that a sinister
irony was blended with that of Tom Wychecombe. Still,
the feelings that were uppermost did not prevent the latter
from speaking in an apparently friendly manner.
They tell me, Mr. Wychecombe, observed the judge's
heir, (for this Tom Wychecombe might legally claim to be;)
they tell me, Mr. Wychecombe, that you have been taking
a lesson in your trade this morning, by swinging over the
cliffs at the end of a rope? Now, that is an exploit, more
to the taste of an American than to that of an Englishman,
I should think. But, I dare say one is compelled to do many
things in the colonies, that we never dream of at home.
This was said with seeming indifference, though with
great art. Sir Wycherly's principal weakness was an
over-weening
and an ignorant admiration of his own country, and
all it contained. He was also strongly addicted to that
feeling
of contempt for the dependencies of the empire, which
seems to be inseparable from the political connection
between
the people of the metropolitan country and their
colonies
.
There must be entire equality, for perfect respect, in
any situation in life; and, as a rule, men always appropriate
to their own shares, any admitted superiority that may
happen
to exist on the part of the communities to which they
belong. It is on this principle, that the tenant of a
cock-loft
in Paris or London, is so apt to feel a high claim to
superiority
over the occupant of a comfortable abode in a
village. As between England and her North American
colonies in particular, this feeling was stronger than is the
case usually, on account of the early democratical tendencies
of the latter; not, that these tendencies had already become
the subject of political jealousies, but that they left social
impressions
,
which were singularly adapted to bringing the
colonists into contempt among a people predominant for
their own factitious habits, and who are so strongly inclined
to view every thing, even to principles, through the medium
of arbitrary, conventional customs. It must be confessed
that the Americans, in the middle of the eighteenth century,
were an exceedingly provincial, and in many particulars a
narrow-minded people, as well in their opinions as in their
habits; nor is the reproach altogether removed at the
present
day; but the country from which they are derived had
not then made the vast strides in civilization, for which it
has latterly become so distinguished. The indifference, too,
with which all Europe regarded the whole American
continent
,
and to which England, herself, though she possessed
so large a stake on this side of the Atlantic, formed no
material
exception, constantly led that quarter of the world into
profound mistakes in all its reasoning that was connected
with this quarter of the world, and aided in producing the
state of feeling to which we have alluded. Sir Wycherly
felt and reasoned on the subject of America much as the
great bulk of his countrymen felt and reasoned in 1745;
the exceptions existing only among the enlightened, and
those whose particular duties rendered more correct
knowledge
necessary, and not always among them. It is said
that the English minister conceived the idea of taxing
America, from the circumstance of seeing a wealthy
Virginian
lose a large sum at play, a sort of
argumentum
ad hominem
that brought with it a very dangerous
conclusion
to apply to the sort of people with whom he had to
deal. Let this be as it might, there is no more question, that
at the period of our tale, the profoundest ignorance
concerning
America existed generally in the mother country, than
there is that the profoundest respect existed in America for
nearly every thing English. Truth compels us to add, that
in despite of all that has passed, the cis-atlantic portion of
the weakness has longest endured the assaults of time and
of an increased intercourse.
Young Wycherly, as is ever the case, was keenly
alive to any insinuations that might be supposed to reflect
on the portion of the empire of which he was a native. He
considered himself an Englishman, it is true; was thoroughly
loyal; and was every way disposed to sustain the honour
and interests of the seat of authority; but when questions
were raised between Europe and America, he was an
American
;
as, in America itself, he regarded himself as purely a
Virginian, in contradistinction to all the other colonies. He
understood the intended sarcasm of Tom Wychecombe, but
smothered his resentment, out of respect to the baronet, and
perhaps a little influenced by the feelings in which he had
been so lately indulging.
Those gentlemen who are disposed to fancy such things
of the colonies, would do well to visit that part of the world,
he answered, calmly, before they express their opinions too
loudly, lest they should say something that future
observation
might make them wish to recall.
True, my young friendquite true, put in the baronet,
with the kindest possible intentions. True as gospel. We
never know any thing of matters about which we know
nothing
;
that we old men must admit, Master Dutton; and I
should think Tom must see its force. It would be
unreasonable
to expect to find every thing as comfortable in
America as we have it here, in England; nor do I
suppose
the Americans, in general, would be as likely to get
over a cliff as an Englishman. However, there are
exceptions
to all general rules, as my poor brother James used to
say, when he saw occasion to find fault with the sermon of
a prelate. I believe you did not know my poor brother,
Dutton; he must have been killed about the time you were
born  St. James, I used to call him, although my brother
Thomas, the judge that was, Tom's father, there  said he
was St. James the less.
I believe the Rev. Mr. Wychecombe was dead before I
was of an age to remember his virtues, Sir Wycherly, said
Dutton, respectfully; though I have often heard my own
father speak of all your honoured family.
Yes, your father, Dutton, was the attorney of the next
town, and we all knew him well. You have done quite
right to come back among us to spend the close of your own
days. A man is never as well off, as when he is thriving
in his native soil; more especially when that soil is old
England
,
and Devonshire. You are not one of us, young
gentleman
,
though your name happens to be Wychecombe;
but, then we are none of us accountable for our own births,
or birth-places.
This truism, which is in the mouths of thousands while it
is in the hearts of scarcely any, was well meant by Sir
Wycherly, however plainly expressed. It merely drew from
the youth the simple answer that  he was born in the
colonies, and had colonists for his parents; a fact that the
others had heard already, some ten or a dozen times.
It is a little singular, Mr. Wychecombe, that you should
bear both of my names, and yet be no relative, continued
the baronet. Now, Wycherly came into our family from
old Sir Hildebrand Wycherly, who was slain at Bosworth
Field, and whose only daughter, my ancestor, and Tom's
ancestor, there, married. Since that day, Wycherly has
been a favourite name among us. I do not think that the
Wychecombes of Herts, ever thought of calling a son
Wycherly
,
although, as my poor brother the judge used to say,
they
were related, but of the half-blood, only. I suppose
your father taught you what is meant by being of the
half-blood
,
Thomas?
Tom Wychecombe's face became the colour of scarlet,
and he cast an uneasy glance at all present; expecting in
particular, to meet with a look of exultation in the eyes
of the lieutenant. He was greatly relieved, however, at
finding that neither of the three meant or understood more
than was simply expressed. As for his uncle, he had not
the smallest intention of making any allusion to the
peculiarity
of his nephew's birth; and the other two, in common
with the world, supposed the reputed heir to be legitimate.
Gathering courage from the looks of those around him, Tom
answered with a steadiness that prevented his agitation from
being detected:
Certainly, my dear sir; my excellent parent forgot
nothing
that he thought might be useful to me, in maintaining
my rights, and the honour of the family, hereafter. I very
well understand that the Wychecombes of Hertfordshire
have no claims on us; nor, indeed, any Wychecombe who
is not descended from my respectable grandfather, the late
Sir Wycherly.
He must have been an
early
, instead of a
late
Sir
Wycherly
,
rather, Mr. Thomas, put in Dutton, laughing at his
own conceit; for I can remember no other than the
honourable baronet before us, in the last fifty years.
Quite true, Duttonvery true, rejoined the person last
alluded to. As true as that `time and tide wait for no
man.' We understand the meaning of such things on the
coast here. It was half a century, last October, since I
succeeded my respected parent; but, it will not be another
half century before some one will succeed me!
Sir Wycherly was a hale, hearty man for his years, but
he had no unmanly dread of his end. Still he felt it could
not be very distant, having already numbered fourscore and
four years. Nevertheless, there were certain phrases of
usage, that Dutton did not see fit to forget on such an
occasion
,
and he answered accordingly, turning to look at and
admire the still ruddy countenance of the baronet, by way
of giving emphasis to his words.
You will yet see half of us into our graves, Sir Wycherly,
he said, and still remain an active man. Though I dare
say another half century will bring most of us up. Even
Mr. Thomas, here, and your young namesake can hardly
hope to run out more line than that. Well, as for myself,
I only desire to live through this war, that I may again see
His Majesty's arms triumphant; though they do tell me that
we are in for a good thirty years' struggle. Wars
have
lasted as long as
that
, Sir Wycherly, and I don't see why
this may not, as well as another.
Very true, Dutton; it is not only possible, but
probable
;
and I trust both you and I may live to see our
flower-hunter
here, a post-captain, at least  though it would be
wishing almost too much to expect to see him an admiral.
There has been
one
admiral of the name, and I confess I
should like to see another!
Has not Mr. Thomas a brother in the service?
demanded
the master; I had thought that my lord, the judge,
had given us one of his young gentlemen.
He thought of it; but the army got both of the boys, as
it turned out. Gregory was to be the midshipman; my
poor brother intending him for a sailor from the first, and so
giving him the name that was once borne by the unfortunate
relative we lost by shipwreck. I wished him to call one of the
lads James, after St. James; but, somehow, I never could
persuade Thomas to see all the excellence of that pious
young man.
Dutton was a little embarrassed, for St. James had left
anything but a godly savour behind him; and he was about
to fabricate a tolerably bold assertion to the contrary, rather
than incur the risk of offending the lord of the manor, when,
luckily, a change in the state of the fog afforded him a
favourable
opportunity of bringing about an apposite change
in the subject. During the whole of the morning the sea
had been invisible from the head-land, a dense body of
vapour
resting on it, far as eye could reach; veiling the whole
expanse with a single white cloud. The lighter portions of
the vapour had at first floated around the head-land, which
could not have been seen at any material distance; but all
had been gradually settling down into a single mass, that
now rose within twenty feet of the summit of the cliffs. The
hour was still quite early, but the sun was gaining force,
and it speedily drank up all the lighter particles of the mist,
leaving a clear, bright atmosphere above the feathery bank,
through which objects might be seen for miles. There was
what seamen call a fanning breeze, or just wind enough
to cause the light sails of a ship to swell and collapse, under
the double influence of the air and the motion of the hull,
imitating in a slight degree the vibrations of that familiar
appliance of the female toilet. Dutton's eye had caught a
glance of the loftiest sail of a vessel, above the fog, going
through this very movement; and it afforded him the release
he desired, by enabling him to draw the attention of his
companions to the same object.
See, Sir Wycherlysee, Mr. Wychecombe, he cried,
eagerly, pointing in the direction of the sail; yonder is
some of the king's canvass coming into our roadstead, or I
am no judge of the set of a man-of-war's royal. It is a
large bit of cloth, too, Mr. Lieutenant, for a sail so lofty!
It is a two-decker's royal, Master Dutton, returned the
young sailor; and now you see the fore and main,
separately
,
as the ship keeps away.
Well, put in Sir Wycherly, in a resigned manner;
here have I lived fourscore years on this coast, and, for
the life of me, I have never been able to tell a fore-royal
from a back-royal; or a mizzen head-stay from a head
mizzen-stay. They are the most puzzling things
imaginable
;
and now I cannot discover how you know that yonder
sail, which I see plain enough, is a royal, any more than
that it is a jib!
Dutton and the lieutenant smiled, but Sir Wycherly's
simplicity had a cast of truth and nature about it, that
deterred
most people from wishing to ridicule him. Then, the
rank, fortune, and local interest of the baronet, counted for
a good deal on all such occasions.
Here is another fellow, farther east, cried Dutton, still
pointing with a finger; and every inch as big as his
consort
!
Ah! it does my eyes good to see our roadstead come
into notice, in this manner, after all I have said and done in
its behalf  But, who have we here  a brother chip, by
his appearance; I dare say some idler who has been sent
ashore with despatches.
There is another fellow further east, and every inch as
big as his consort, said Wychecombe, as we shall call our
lieutenant, in order to distinguish him from Tom of the same
name, repeating the very words of Dutton, with an
application
and readiness that almost amounted to wit, pointing, in
his turn, at two strangers who were ascending to the station
by a path that led from the beach. Certainly both these
gentlemen are in His Majesty's service, and they have
probably
just landed from the ships in the offing.
The truth of this conjecture was apparent to Dutton at a
glance. As the strangers joined each other, the one last
seen proceeded in advance; and there was something in his
years, the confident manner in which he approached, and
his general appearance, that induced both the sailors to
believe
he might be the commander of one of the ships that had
just come in view.
Good-morrow, gentlemen, commenced this person, as
soon as near enough to salute the party at the foot of the
flag-staff; good-morrow to ye all. I 'm glad to meet you,
for it 's but a Jacob's ladder, this path of yours, through the
ravine in the cliffs. Hey! why Atwood, looking around
him at the sea of vapour, in surprise, what the devil has
become of the fleet?
It is lost in the fog, sir; we are above it, here; when
more on a level with the ships, we could see, or fancy we
saw, more of them than we do now.
Here are the upper sails of two heavy ships, sir,
observed
Wychecombe, pointing in the direction of the vessels
already seen; ay, and yonder are two morenothing but
the royals are visible.
Two more!I left eleven two-deckers, three frigates, a
sloop, and a cutter in sight, when I got into the boat. You
might have covered 'em all with a pocket-handkerchief, hey!
Atwood?
They were certainly in close order, sir, but I 'll not take
it on myself to say quite as near together as that.
Ay, you 're a dissenter by trade, and never will believe
in a miracle. Sharp work, gentlemen, to get up such a
hill as this, after fifty.
It is, indeed, sir, answered Sir Wycherly, kindly.
Will you do us the favour to take a seat among us, and
rest yourself after so violent an exertion? The cliff is hard
enough to ascend, even when one keeps the path; though
here is a young gentleman who had a fancy just now to go
down it, without a path; and that, too, merely that a pretty
girl might have a nosegay on her breakfast-table.
The stranger looked intently at Sir Wycherly for a
moment
,
then glanced his eye at the groom and the pony, after
which he took a survey of Tom Wychecombe, the lieutenant,
and the master. He was a man accustomed to look about
him, and he understood, by that rapid glance, the characters
of all he surveyed, with perhaps the exception of that of
Tom Wychecombe; and even of that he formed a tolerably
shrewd conjecture. Sir Wycherly he immediately set down
as the squire of the adjacent estate; Dutton's situation he
hit exactly, conceiving him to be a worn-out master, who
was employed to keep the signal-station; while he
understood
Wychecombe, by his undress, and air, to be a
sea-lieutenant
in the king's service. Tom Wychecombe he
thought it quite likely might be the son and heir of the lord
of the manor, both being in mourning; though he decided
in his own mind that there was not the smallest family
likeness
between them. Bowing with the courtesy of a man
who knew how to acknowledge a civility, he took the
proffered
seat at Sir Wycherly's side without farther ceremony.
We must carry the young fellow to sea with us, sir,
rejoined
the stranger, and that will cure him of looking for
flowers in such ticklish places. His Majesty has need of us
all, in this war; and I trust, young gentleman, you have
not been long ashore, among the girls.
Only long enough to make a cure of a pretty smart
burt, received in cutting out a lugger from the opposite
Vol. I.  5
coast, answered Wychecombe, with sufficient modesty, and
yet with sufficient spirit.
Lugger!ha! what Atwood? You surely do not mean,
young gentleman, la Voltigeuse?
That was the name of the craft, sir  we found her in
the roads of Groix.
And then I 've the pleasure of seeing Mr. Wychecombe,
the young officer who led in that gallant attack?
This was said with a most flattering warmth of manner,
the stranger even rising and removing his hat, as he uttered
the words with a heartiness that showed how much his
feelings
were in unison with what he said.
I am Mr. Wychecombe, sir, answered the other,
blushing
to the temples, and returning the salute; though I had
not the honour of leading; one of the lieutenants of our ship
being in another boat.
YesI know all thatbut he was beaten off, while you
boarded and did the work. What have my lords
commissioners
done in the matter?
All that is necessary, so far as I am concerned, sir, I do
assure you; having sent me a commission the very next
week. I only wish they had been equally generous to Mr.
Walton, who received a severe wound also, and behaved as
well as man could behave.
That would not be so wise, Mr. Wychecombe, since it
would be rewarding a failure, returned the stranger, coldly.
Success is all in all, in war. Ah! There the fellows begin
to show themselves, Atwood.
This remark drew all eyes, again, towards the sea, where
a sight now presented itself that was really worthy of a
passing notice. The vapour appeared to have become
packed into a mass of some eighty or a hundred feet in
height, leaving a perfectly clear atmosphere above it. In
the clear air, were visible the upper spars and canvass of the
entire fleet mentioned by the stranger; sixteen sail in all.
There were the eleven two-deckers, and the three frigates,
rising in pyramids of canvass, still fanning in towards the
anchorage, which in that roadstead was within pistol-shot of
the shore; while the royals and upper part of the top-gallant
sails of the sloop seemed to stand on the surface of the fog,
like a monument. After a moment's pause, Wychecombe
discovered even the head of the cutter's royal-mast, with the
pennant lazily fluttering ahead of it, partly concealed in
vapour
.
The fog seemed to settle, instead of rising, though it
evidently rolled along the face of the waters, putting the
whole scene in motion. It was not long ere the tops of the
ships of the line became visible, and then living beings were
for the first time seen in the moving masses.
I suppose we offer just such a sight to the top-men of
the ships, as they offer to us, observed the stranger. They
must
see this head-land and flag-staff, Mr. Wychecombe;
and there can be no danger of their standing in too far!
I should think not, sir; certainly the men aloft can see
the cliffs above the fog, as we see the vessels' spars. Ha!
Mr. Dutton, there is a rear-admiral's flag flying on board
the ship farthest to the eastward.
So I see, sir; and by looking at the third vessel on the
western side of the line, you will find a bit of square bunting
at the fore, which will tell you there is a vice-admiral
beneath
it.
Quite true! exclaimed Wychecombe, who was ever
enthusiastic on matters relating to his profession; a
vice-admiral
of the red, too; which is the next step to being a full
admiral. This must be the fleet of Sir Digby Downes!
No, young gentleman, returned the stranger, who
perceived
by the glance of the other's eye, that a question was
indirectly put to himself; it is the southern squadron; and
the vice-admiral's flag you see, belongs to Sir Gervaise
Oakes. Admiral Bluewater is on board the ship that carries
a flag at the mizzen.
Those two officers always go together, Sir Wycherly,
added the young man. Whenever we hear the name of
Sir Gervaise, that of Bluewater is certain to accompany it.
Such a union in service is delightful to witness.
Well may they go in company, Mr. Wychecombe,
returned
the stranger, betraying a little emotion. Oakes
and Bluewater were reefers together, under old Breasthook,
in the Mermaid; and when the first was made a lieutenant
into the Squid, the last followed as a mate. Oakes was first
of the Briton, in her action with the Spanish frigates, and
Bluewater third. For that affair Oakes got a sloop, and his
friend went with him as his first. The next year they had
the luck to capture a heavier ship than their own, when, for
the first time in their service, the two young men were
separated
;
Oakes getting a frigate, and Bluewater getting the
Squid. Still they cruised in company, until the senior was
sent in command of a flying squadron, with a broad
pennant
,
when the junior, who by this time was post, received
his old messmate on board his own frigate. In that manner
they served together, down to the hour when the first hoisted
his flag. From that time, the two old seamen have never
been parted; Bluewater acting as the admiral's captain, until
he got the square bunting himself. The vice-admiral has
never led the van of a fleet, that the rear-admiral did not
lead the rear-division; and, now that Sir Gervaise is a
commander-in-chief
,
you see his friend, Dick Bluewater, is
cruising in his company.
While the stranger was giving this account of the Two
Admirals, in a half-serious, half-jocular manner, the eyes
of his companions were on him. He was a middle-sized,
red-faced man, with an aquiline nose, a light-blue animated
eye, and a mouth, which denoted more of the habits and care
of refinement than either his dress or his ordinarily careless
mien. A great deal is said about the aristocracy of the ears,
and the hands, and the feet; but of all the features, or other
appliances
of the human frame, the mouth and the nose have
the greatest influence in producing an impression of gentility.
This was peculiarly the case with the stranger, whose
beak, like that of an ancient galley, gave the promise of a
stately movement, and whose beautiful teeth and winning
smile, often relieved the expression of a countenance that
was not unfrequently stern. As he ceased speaking, Dutton
rose, in a studied manner, raised his hat entirely from his
head, bowed his body nearly to a right angle, and said,
Unless my memory is treacherous, I believe I have the
honour to see Rear-Admiral Bluewater, himself; I was a mate
in the Medway, when he commanded the Chloe; and unless
five-and-twenty years have made more changes than I think
probable, he is now on this hill.
Your memory is a bad one, Mr. Dutton, and your hill
has on it a much worse man, in all respects, than Admiral
Bluewater. They say that man and wife, from living
together
,
and thinking alike, having the same affections, loving
the same objects, or sometimes hating them, get in time to
look alike; hey! Atwood? It may be that I am growing
like Bluewater, on the same principle; but this is the first
time I ever heard the thing suggested. I am Sir Gervaise
Oakes, at your service, sir.
The bow of Dutton was now much lower than before,
while young Wychecombe uncovered himself, and Sir
Wycherly
arose and paid his compliments cordially, introducing
himself, and offering the admiral and all his officers the
hospitality of the Hall.
Ay, this is straight-forward and hearty, and in the good
old English manner! exclaimed the admiral, when he had
returned the salutes, and cordially thanked the baronet.
One might land in Scotland, now, anywhere between the
Tweed and John a'Groat's house, and not be asked so much
as to eat an oaten cake; hey! Atwood?always excepting
the mountain dew.
You will have your fling at my poor countrymen, Sir
Gervaise, and so there is no more to be said on the subject,
returned the secretary, for such was the rank of the
admiral's
companion. I might feel hurt, at times, did I not
know that you get as many Scotsmen about you, in your
own ship, as you can; and that a fleet is all the better in
your judgment, for having every other captain from the land
o' cakes.
Did you ever hear the like of that, Sir Wycherly?
Because
I stick to a man I like, he accuses me of having a
predilection for his whole country. Here's Atwood, now;
he was my clerk, when in a sloop; and he has followed me
to the Plantagenet, and because I do not throw him
over-board
,
he wishes to make it appear half Scotland is in her
hold.
Well, there are the surgeon, the purser, one of the
mates, one of the marine officers, and the fourth lieutenant,
to keep me company, Sir Gervaise, answered the secretary,
smiling like one accustomed to his superior's jokes, and who
cared very little about them. When you send us all back
to Scotland, I'm thinking there will be many a good vacancy
to fill.
The Scotch make themselves very useful, Sir Gervaise,
put in Sir Wycherly, by way of smoothing the matter over;
5 *
and now we have a Brunswick prince on the throne, we
Englishmen have less jealousy of them than formerly. I
am sure I should be happy to see all the gentlemen
mentioned
by Mr. Atwood, at Wychecombe Hall.
There, you're all well berthed, while the fleet lies in
these roads. Sir Wycherly, in the name of Scotland, I
thank you.But what an extr'ornary (for so admirals
pronounced
the word a hundred years ago,) scene this is, hey!
Atwood? Many a time have I seen the hulls of ships when
their spars were hid in the fog; but I do not remember ever
to have seen before sixteen sets of masts and sails, moving
about on vapour, without a single hull to uphold them. The
tops of all the two-decked ships are as plainly to be seen, as
if the air were without a particle of vapour, while all below
the cat-harpings is hid in a cloud as thick as the smoke of
a battle. I do not half like Bluewater's standing in so far;
perhaps, Mr. Dutton, they cannot see the cliffs, for I assure
you we did not, until quite close under them. We went
altogether
by the lead, the masters feeling their way like so
many blind beggars!
We always keep that nine-pounder loaded, Sir
Gervaise
,
returned the master, in order to warn vessels when
they are getting near enough in; and if Mr. Wychecombe,
who is younger than I, will run to the house and light this
match, I will prime, and we may give 'em warning where
they are, in less than a minute.
The admiral gave a ready assent to this proposition, and
the respective parties immediately set about putting it in
execution
.
Wychecombe hastened to the house to light the
match, glad of an opportunity to inquire after Mildred;
while Dutton produced a priming-horn from a sort of
armchest
,
that stood near the gun, and put the latter in a
condition
to be discharged. The young man was absent but a
minute, and when all was ready he turned towards the
admiral
,
in order to get the signal to proceed.
Let'em have it, Mr. Wychecombe, cried Sir Gervaise,
smiling; it will wake Bluewater up; perhaps he may
favour us with a broadside, by way of retort.
The match was applied, and the report of the gun
succeeded
.
Then followed a pause of more than a minute;
when the fog lifted around the Csar, the ship that wore
a rear-admiral's flag, a flash like lightning was seen
glancing
in the mist, and then came the bellowing of a piece of
heavy ordnance. Almost at the same instant, three little
flags appeared at the mast-head of the Csar, for
previously
to quitting his own ship, Sir Gervaise had sent a
message
to his friend, requesting him to take care of the fleet.
This was the signal to anchor. The effect of all this, as
seen from the height, was exceedingly striking. As yet
not a single hull had become visible, the fog remaining
packed upon the water, in a way to conceal even the lower
yards of the two-deckers. All above was bright, distinct,
and so near as almost to render it possible to distinguish
persons
.
There everything was vivid, while a sort of
supernatural
mystery veiled all beneath. Each ship had an officer
aloft to look out for signals, and no sooner had the Csar
opened her three little flags, which had long been suspended
in black balls, in readiness for this service, than the answers
were seen floating at the mast-head of each of the vessels.
Then commenced a spectacle still more curious than that
which those on the cliff had so long been regarding with
interest
.
Ropes began to move, and the sails were drawn up
in festoons, apparently without the agency of hands. Cut
off from a seeming communication with the ocean, or the
hulls, the spars of the different ships appeared to be instinct
with life; each machine playing its own part independently
of the others, but all having the same object in view. In a
very few minutes, the canvass was hauled up, and the whole
fleet was swinging to the anchors. Presently head after
head was thrown out of the fog, the upper yards were alive
with men, and the sails were handed. Next came the
squaring of the yards, though this was imperfectly done,
and a good deal by guess-work. The men came down,
and there lay a noble fleet at anchor, with nothing visible to
those on the cliffs, but their top-hamper, and upper spars.
Sir Gervaise Oakes had been so much struck and amused
with a sight that to him happened to be entirely novel, that
he did not speak during the whole process of anchoring.
Indeed many a man might pass his life at sea, and never
witness such a scene; but those who have, know that it is
one of the most beautiful and striking spectacles connected
with the wonders of the great deep.
By this time the sun had got so high, as to begin to stir
the fog, and streams of vapour were shooting up from the beach,
like smoke rising from coal-pits. The wind increased, too,
and rolled the vapour before it, and in less than ten minutes,
the veil was removed; ship after ship coming out in plain
view, until the entire fleet was seen riding in the roadstead,
in its naked and distinct proportions.
Now, Bluewater is a happy fellow, exclaimed Sir
Gervaise
.
He sees his great enemy, the land, and knows how
to deal with it.
I thought the French were the great and natural enemies
of every British sailor, observed Sir Wycherly, simply, but
quite to the point.
Humthere's truth in that too. But the land is an
enemy to be feared, while the Frenchman is nothey!
Atwood
?
It was indeed a goodly sight to view the fine fleet that
now lay anchored beneath the cliffs of Wychecombe. Sir
Gervaise Oakes was, in that period, considered a successful
naval commander, and was a favourite both at the
admiralty
and with the nation. His popularity extended to the
most distant colonies of England, in nearly all of which he
had served with zeal and credit. But we are not writing of
an age of nautical wonders, like that which succeeded, at
the close of the century. The French, and Dutch, and even
the Spaniards, were then all formidable as naval powers;
for revolutions and changes had not destroyed their
maritime
corps, nor had the consequent naval ascendency of
England annihilated their navigation; the two great causes
of the subsequent apparent invincibility of the latter power.
Battles at sea, in that day, were warmly contested, and were
frequently fruitless; more especially when fleets were brought
in opposition. The single combats were usually more
decisive
,
though the absolute success of the British flag, was
far from being as much a matter of course as it subsequently
became. In a word, the science of naval warfare had not
made those great strides, which marked the career of
England
in the end, nor had it retrograded among her enemies,
to the point which appears to have rendered their defeat
nearly certain. Still Sir Gervaise was a successful officer;
having captured several single ships, in bloody encounters,
and having actually led fleets with credit, in four or five of
the great battles of the times; besides being second and
third in command, on various similar occasions. His own
ship was certain to be engaged, let what would happen to
the others. Equally as captains and as flag-officers, the
nation had become familiar with the names of Oakes and
Bluewater, as men ever to be found sustaining each other in
the thickest of the fight. It may be well to add here, that
both these favourite seamen were men of family, or at least
what was considered men of family among the mere gentry
of England; Sir Gervaise being a baronet by inheritance,
while his friend actually belonged to one of those naval lines
which furnishes admirals for generations; his father having
worn a white flag at the main; and his grandfather having
been actually ennobled for his services, dying vice-admiral
of England. These fortuitous circumstances perhaps
rendered
both so much the greater favourites at court.
CHAPTER IV.
All with you; except three
On duty, and our leader Israel,
Who is expected momently.
Marino Faliero
.
As his fleet was safely anchored, and that too, in
beautiful
order, in spite of the fog, Sir Gervaise Oakes showed a
disposition to pursue what are termed ulterior views.
This has been a fine sightcertainly a very fine sight;
such as an old seaman loves; but there must be an end to
it, he said. You will excuse me, Sir Wycherly, but the
movements of a fleet always have interest in my eyes, and
it is seldom that I get such a bird's-eye view of those of my
own; no wonder it has made me a somewhat unreflecting
intruder.
Make no apologies, Sir Gervaise, I beg of you; for none
are needed, on any account. Though this head-land does
belong to the Wychecombe property, it is fairly leased to
the crown, and none have a better right to occupy it than
His Majesty's servants. The Hall is a little more private,
it is true, but even that has no door that will close upon our
gallant naval defenders. It is but a short walk, and nothing
will make me happier than to show you the way to my poor
dwelling, and to see you as much at home under its roof, as
you could be in the cabin of the Plantagenet.
If anything could make me as much at home in a
house as in a ship, it would be so hearty a welcome; and I
intend to accept your hospitality in the very spirit in which
it is offered. Atwood and I have landed to send off some
important despatches to the First Lord, and we will thank
you for putting us in the way of doing it, in the safest
and most expeditious manner. Curiosity and surprise have
already occasioned the loss of half an hour; while a soldier,
or a sailor, should never lose half a minute.
Is a courier who knows the country well, needed, Sir
Gervaise? the lieutenant demanded, modestly, though with
an interest that showed he was influenced only by zeal for
the service.
The admiral looked at him, intently, for a moment, and
seemed pleased with the hint implied in the question.
Can you ride? asked Sir Gervaise, smiling. I could
have brought half-a-dozen youngsters ashore with me; but,
besides the doubts about getting a horsea chaise I take it
is out of the question hereI was afraid the lads might
disgrace
themselves on horseback.
This must be said in pleasantry, Sir Gervaise, returned
Wychecombe; he would be a strange Virginian at least,
who does not know how to ride!
And a strange Englishman, too, Bluewater would say;
and yet I never see the fellow straddle a horse that I do not
wish it were a studding-sail-boom run out to leeward! We
sailors
fancy
we ride, Mr. Wychecombe, but it is some such
fancy as a marine has for the fore-topmast-cross-trees. Can
a horse be had, to go as far as the nearest post-office that
sends off a daily mail?
That can it, Sir Gervaise, put in Sir Wycherly.
Here is Dick mounted on as good a hunter as is to be
found in England; and I'll answer for my young
namesake's
willingness to put the animal's mettle to the proof.
Our little mail has just left Wychecombe for the next
twenty-four
hours, but, by pushing the beast, there will be time to
reach the high road in season for the great London mail,
which passes the nearest market-town at noon. It is but a
gallop of ten miles and back, and that I 'll answer for Mr.
Wychecombe's ability to do, and to join us at dinner by
four.
Young Wychecombe expressing his readiness to perform
all this, and even more at need, the arrangement was soon
made. Dick was dismounted, the lieutenant got his
despatches
and his instructions, took his leave, and had
galloped
out of sight, in the next five minutes. The admiral
then declared himself at liberty for the day, accepting the
invitation of Sir Wycherly to breakfast and dine at the
Hall, in the same spirit of frankness as that in which it
had been given. Sir Wycherly was so spirited as to refuse
the aid of his pony, but insisted on walking through the
village
and park to his dwelling, though the distance was more
than a mile. Just as they were quitting the signal-station,
the old man took the admiral aside, and in an earnest, but
respectful manner, disburthened his mind to the following
effect.
Sir Gervaise, he said, I am no sailor, as you know,
and least of all do I bear His Majesty's commission in the
navy, though I am in the county commission as a justice
of the peace; so, if I make any little mistake you will have
the goodness to overlook it, for I know that the etiquette of
the quarter-deck is a very serious matter, and is not to be
trifled with;but here is Dutton, as good a fellow in his
way as liveshis father was a sort of a gentleman too,
having
been the attorney of the neighbourhood, and the old man
was accustomed to dine with me forty years ago
I believe I understand you, Sir Wycherly, interrupted
the admiral; and I thank you for the attention you wish
to pay my prejudices; but, you are master of Wychecombe,
and I should feel myself a troublesome intruder, indeed, did
you not ask whom you please to dine at your own table.
That's not quite it, Sir Gervaise, though you have not
gone far wide of the mark. Dutton is only a master, you
know; and it seems that a master on board ship is a very
different thing from a master on shore; so Dutton, himself,
has often told me.
Ay, Dutton is right enough as regards a king's ship,
though the two offices are pretty much the same, when other
craft are alluded to. But, my dear Sir Wycherly, an
admiral
is not disgraced by keeping company with a
boatswain
,
if the latter is an honest man. It is true we have
our customs, and what we call our quarter-deck and forward
officers; which is court end and city, on board ship; but a
master belongs to the first, and the master of the
Plantagenet
,
Sandy McYarn, dines with me once a month, as
regularly
as he enters a new word at the top of his log-book. I
beg, therefore, you will extend your hospitality to whom you
pleaseor the admiral hesitated, as he cast a
good-natured
glance at the master, who stood still uncovered,
waiting
for his superior to move away; or, perhaps, Sir
Wycherly
,
you would permit
me
to ask a friend to make one of
our party.
That's just it, Sir Gervaise, returned the kind-hearted
baronet; and Dutton will be one of the happiest fellows in
Devonshire. I wish we could have Mrs. Dutton and Milly,
and then the table would look what my poor brother James
St. James I used to call him  what the Rev. James
Wychecombe was accustomed to term, mathematical. He
said a table should have all its sides and angles duly filled.
James was a most agreeable companion, Sir Gervaise, and,
in divinity, he would not have turned his back on one of the
apostles, I do verily believe!
The admiral bowed, and turning to the master, he invited
him to be of the party at the Hall, in the manner which one
long accustomed to render his civilities agreeable by a sort
of professional off-handed way, well knew how to assume.
Sir Wycherly has insisted that I shall consider his table
as set in my own cabin, he continued; and I know of no
better manner of proving my gratitude, than by taking him
at his word, and filling it with guests that will be agreeable
to us both. I believe there is a Mrs. Dutton, and a Miss
aaa
Milly, put in the baronet, eagerly; Miss Mildred
Duttonthe daughter of our good friend Dutton, here, and a
young lady who would do credit to the gayest
drawing-room
in London.
You perceive, sir, that our kind host anticipates the
wishes of an old bachelor, as it might be by instinct, and
desires the company of the ladies, also. Miss Mildred will,
at least, have two young men to do homage to her beauty,
and
three
old ones to sigh in the distancehey! Atwood?
Mildred, as Sir Wycherly knows, sir, has been a little
disturbed this morning, returned Dutton, putting on his
best manner for the occasion; but, I feel no doubt, will
be too grateful for this honour, not to exert herself to make
a suitable return. As for my wife, gentlemen
And what is to prevent Mrs. Dutton from being one of
the party, interrupted Sir Wycherly, as he observed the
husband to hesitate; she sometimes favours me with her
company.
I rather think she will to-day, Sir Wycherly, if Mildred
is well enough to go; the good woman seldom lets her
daughter stray far from her apron-strings. She keeps her,
as I tell her, within the sweep of her own hawse, Sir
Gervaise
.
So much the wiser she, Master Dutton, returned the
admiral, pointedly. The best pilot for a young woman is
a good mother; and now you have a fleet in your
road-stead
,
I need not tell a seaman of your experience that you
are on pilot-ground;hey! Atwood?
Here the parties separated, Dutton remaining uncovered
until his superior had turned the corner of his little cottage,
and was fairly out of sight. Then the master entered his
dwelling to prepare his wife and daughter for the honours
they had in perspective. Before he executed this duty,
however
,
the unfortunate man opened what he called a locker
what a housewife would term a cupboardand fortified his
nerves with a strong draught of pure Nantes; a liquor that
no hostilities, custom-house duties, or national antipathies,
has ever been able to bring into general disrepute in the
British Islands. In the mean time the party of the two
baronets
pursued its way towards the Hall.
The village, or hamlet of Wychecombe, lay about
halfway
between the station and the residence of the lord of the
manor. It was an exceedingly rural and retired collection
Vol. I.  6
of mean houses, possessing neither physician, apothecary,
nor attorney, to give it importance. A small inn, two or
three shops of the humblest kind, and some twenty cottages
of labourers and mechanics, composed the place, which, at
that early day, had not even a chapel, or a conventicle;
dissent not having made much progress then in England.
The parish church, one of the old edifices of the time of
the Henrys, stood quite alone, in a field, more than a mile
from the place; and the vicarage, a respectable abode,
was just on the edge of the park, fully half a mile more
distant
.
In short, Wychecombe was one of those places which
was so far on the decline, that few or no traces of any little
importance it may have once possessed, were any longer to
be discovered; and it had sunk entirely into a hamlet that
owed its allowed claims to be marked on the maps, and to
be noted in the gazetteers, altogether to its antiquity, and
the name it had given to one of the oldest knightly families
in England.
No wonder then, that the arrival of a fleet under the head,
produced a great excitement in the little village. The
anchorage
was excellent, so far as the bottom was concerned,
but it could scarcely be called a roadstead in any other point
of view, since there was shelter against no wind but that
which blew directly off shore, which happened to be a wind
that did not prevail in that part of the island. Occasionally,
a small cruiser would come-to, in the offing, and a few
frigates
had lain at single anchors in the roads, for a tide or
so, in waiting for a change of weather; but this was the first
fleet that had been known to moor under the cliffs within
the memory of man. The fog had prevented the honest
villagers
from ascertaining the unexpected honour that had
been done them, until the reports of the two guns reached
their ears, when the important intelligence spread with due
rapidity over the entire adjacent country. Although
Wychecombe
did not lie in actual view of the sea, by the time the
party of Sir Wycherly entered the hamlet, its little street
was already crowded with visiters from the fleet; every
vessel
having sent at least one boat ashore, and many of them
some three or four. Captain's and gun-room stewards,
midshipmen's
foragers, loblolly boys, and other similar harpies,
were out in scores; for this was a part of the world in which
bum-boats were unknown; and if the mountain would not
come to Mahomet, Mahomet must fain go to the mountain.
Half an hour had sufficed to exhaust all the unsophisticated
simplicity of the hamlet; and milk, eggs, fresh butter,
soft-tommy
,
vegetables, and such fruits as were ripe, had already
risen quite one hundred per cent. in the market.
Sir Gervaise had called his force the southern squadron,
from the circumstance of its having been cruising in the Bay
of Biscay, for the last six months. This was a wild
winter-station
,
the danger from the elements greatly surpassing
any that could well be anticipated from the enemy. The
duty notwithstanding had been well and closely performed;
several West India, and one valuable East India convoy
having been effectually protected, as well as a few straggling
frigates of the enemy picked up; but the service had been
excessively laborious to all engaged in it, and replete with
privations. Most of those who now landed, had not trod
terra firma for half a year, and it was not wonderful that all
the officers whose duties did not confine them to the vessels,
gladly seized the occasion to feast their senses with the
verdure and odours of their native island. Quite a
hundred
guests of this character were also pouring into the street
of Wychecombe, or spreading themselves among the
surrounding
farm-houses; flirting with the awkward and
blushing
girls, and keeping an eye at the same time to the main
chance of the mess-table.
Our boys have already found out your village, Sir
Wycherly
,
in spite of the fog, the vice-admiral remarked,
good-humouredly
,
as he cast his eyes around at the movement of
the street; and the locusts of Egypt will not come nearer
to breeding a famine. One would think there was a great
dinner
in petto
, in every cabin of the fleet, by the number
of the captain's stewards that are ashore, hey! Atwood? I
have seen nine of the harpies, myself, and the other seven
can't be far off.
Here is Galleygo, Sir Gervaise, returned the secretary,
smiling; though
he
can scarcely be called a captain's
steward, having the honour to serve a vice-admiral and a
commander-in-chief.
Ay, but
we
feed the whole fleet at times, and have some
excuse for being a little exactingharkee, Galleygoget a
horse-cart, and push off at once, four or five miles further
into the country; you might as well expect to find real
pearls in fishes' eyes, as hope to pick up anything nice
among so many gun-room and cock-pit boys. I dine ashore
to-day, but Captain Greenly is fond of mutton-chops, you 'll
remember.
This was said kindly, and in the manner of a man
accustomed
to treat his domestics with the familiarity of humble
friends. Galleygo was as unpromising a looking butler as
any gentleman ashore would be at all likely to tolerate; but
he had been with his present master, and in his present
capacity
,
ever since the latter had commanded a sloop of war.
All his youth had been passed as a top-man, and he was
really a prime seaman; but accident having temporarily
placed him in his present station, Captain Oakes was so
much pleased with his attention to his duty, and particularly
with his order, that he ever afterwards retained him in his
cabin, notwithstanding the strong desire the honest fellow
himself had felt to remain aloft. Time and familiarity, at
length reconciled the steward to his station, though he did
not formally accept it, until a clear agreement had been
made that he was not to be considered an idler on any
occasion
that called for the services of the best men. In this
manner David, for such was his Christian name, had
become
a sort of nondescript on board of a man-of-war; being
foremost in all the cuttings out, a captain of a gun, and was
frequently seen on a yard in moments of difficulty, just to
keep his hand in, as he expressed it, while he descended to
the duties of the cabin in peaceable times and good weather.
Near thirty years had he thus been half-steward,
half-seaman
when afloat, while on land he was rather a counsellor
and minister of the closet, than a servant; for out of a ship he
was utterly useless, though he never left his master for a
week at a time, ashore or afloat. The name of Galleygo
was a
sobriquet
conferred by his brother top-men, but had
been so generally used, that for the last twenty years most
of his shipmates believed it to be his patronymic. When
this compound of cabin and forecastle received the order
just related, he touched the lock of hair on his forehead, a
ceremony he always used before he spoke to Sir Gervaise,
the hat being removed at some three or four yards' distance,
and made his customary answer of
Ay-ay-siryour honour has been a young gentleman
yourself, and knows what a young gentleman's stomach gets
to be, a'ter a six months' fast in the Bay of Biscay; and a
young gentleman's
boy's
stomach, too. I always thinks
there 's but a small chance for us, sir, when I sees six or
eight of them light cruisers in my neighbourhood. They 're
som'mat like the sloops and cutters of a fleet, which picks
up all the prizes.
Quite true, Master Galleygo; but if the light cruisers
get the prizes, you should recollect that the admiral always
has his share of the prize-money.
Yes sir, I knows we has our share, but that 's accordin'
to law, and because the commanders of the light craft can't
help it. Let 'em once get the law on their side, and not a
ha'pence would bless our pockets! No, sir, what we gets,
we gets by the law; and as there is no law to fetch up young
gentlemen or their boys, that pays as they goes, we never
gets anything they or their boys puts hands on.
I dare say you are right, David, as you always are. It
wouldn't be a bad thing to have an Act of Parliament to give
an admiral his twentieth in the reefers' foragings. The old
fellows would sometimes get back some of their own poultry
and fruit in that way, hey! Atwood?
The secretary smiled his assent, and then Sir Gervaise
apologized to his host, repeated the order to the steward, and
the party proceeded.
This fellow of mine, Sir Wycherly, is no respecter of
persons, beyond the etiquette of a man-of-war, the admiral
continued, by way of further excuse. I believe His
Majesty himself would be favoured with an essay on some
part of the economy of the cabin, were Galleygo to get an
opportunity of speaking his mind to him. Nor is the fool
without his expectations of some day enjoying this privilege;
for the last time I went to court, I found honest David
rigged
,
from stem to stern, in a full suit of claret and steel,
under the idea that he was `to sail in company with me,'
as he called it, `with or without signal!'
There was nothing surprising in that, Sir Gervaise,
observed the secretary. Galleygo has sailed in company
6 *
with you so long, and to so many strange lands; has been
through so many dangers at your side, and has got so
completely
to consider himself as part of the family, that it was
the most natural thing in the world he should expect to go
to court with you.
True enough. The fellow would face the devil, at my
side, and I don't see why he should hesitate to face the king.
I sometimes call him Lady Oakes, Sir Wycherly, for he
appears to think he has a right of dower, or some other
lawyer-like
claim on my estate; and as for the fleet, he always
speaks of
that
, as if we commanded it in common. I wonder
how Bluewater tolerates the blackguard; for he never
scruples
to allude to him as under
our
orders! If anything
should befal me, Dick and David would have a civil war for
the succession, hey! Atwood?
I think military subordination would bring Galleygo to
his senses, Sir Gervaise, should such an unfortunate
accident
occurwhich Heaven avert for many years to come!
There is Admiral Bluewater coming up the street, at this
very moment, sir.
At this sudden announcement, the whole party turned to
look in the direction intimated by the secretary. It was by
this time at one end of the short street, and all saw a man
just entering the other, who, in his walk, air, attire, and
manner, formed a striking contrast to the active, merry,
bustling, youthful young sailors who thronged the hamlet.
In person, Admiral Bluewater was exceedingly tall and
exceedingly
thin. Like most seamen who have that physical
formation, he stooped; a circumstance that gave his years
a greater apparent command over his frame, than they
possessed
in reality. While this bend in his figure deprived it,
in a great measure, of the sturdy martial air that his
superior
presented to the observer, it lent to his carriage a quiet
and dignity that it might otherwise have wanted. Certainly,
were this officer attired like an ordinary civilian, no one
would have taken him for one of England's bravest and
most efficient sea-captains; he would have passed rather as
some thoughtful, well-educated, and refined gentleman, of
retired habits, diffident of himself, and a stranger to
ambition
.
He wore an undress rear-admiral's uniform, as a
matter of course; but he wore it carelessly, as if from a
sense of duty only; or conscious that no arrangement could
give him a military air. Still all about his person was
faultlessly
neat, and perfectly respectable. In a word, no one
but a man accustomed to the sea, were it not for his uniform,
would suspect the rear-admiral of being a sailor; and even
the seaman himself might be often puzzled to detect any
other signs of the profession about him, than were to be
found in a face, which, fair, gentlemanly, handsome, and
even courtly as it was, in expression and outline, wore the
tint that exposure invariably stamps on the mariner's
countenance
.
Here, however, his unseaman-like character
ceased. Admiral Oakes had often declared that Dick
Bluewater knew more about a ship than any man in
England
;
and as for a fleet, his mode of manuvring one had
got to be standard in the service.
As soon as Sir Gervaise recognised his friend, he expressed
a wish to wait for him, which was courteously converted by
Sir Wycherly into a proposition to return and meet him.
So abstracted was Admiral Bluewater, however, that he did
not see the party that was approaching him, until he was
fairly accosted by Sir Gervaise, who led the advance by a
few yards.
Good-day to you, Bluewater, commenced the latter, in
his familiar, off-hand way; I 'm glad you have torn
yourself
away from your ship; though I must say the manner
in which you came-to, in that fog, was more like instinct,
than anything human! I determined to tell you as much,
the moment we met; for I don't think there is a ship, half
her length out of mathematical order, notwithstanding the
tide runs, here, like a race-horse.
That is owing to your captains, Sir Gervaise, returned
the other, observing the respect of manner, that the inferior
never loses with his superior, on service, and in a navy; let
their relative rank and intimacy be what they may on all
other occasions; good captains make handy ships. Our
gentlemen have now been together so long, that they
understand
each other's movements; and every vessel in the
fleet has her character as well as her commander!
Very true, Admiral Bluewater, and yet there is not
another
officer in His Majesty's service, that could have brought
a fleet to anchor, in so much order, and in such a fog; and
I ask your leave, sir, most particularly to thank you for the
lesson you have given, not only to the captains, but to the
commander-in-chief. I presume I may admire that which I
cannot exactly imitate.
The rear-admiral merely smiled and touched his hat in
acknowledgment of the compliment, but he made no direct
answer in words. By this time Sir Wycherly and the others
had approached, and the customary introductions took place.
Sir Wycherly now pressed his new acquaintance to join his
guests, with so much heartiness, that there was no such
thing as refusing.
Since you and Sir Gervaise both insist on it so
earnestly
,
Sir Wycherly, returned the rear-admiral, I must
consent
;
but as it is contrary to our practice, when on foreign
serviceand I call this roadstead a foreign station, as to
anything
we know about itas it is contrary to our practice for
both flag-officers to sleep out of the fleet, I shall claim the
privilege to be allowed to go off to my ship before midnight.
I think the weather looks settled, Sir Gervaise, and we may
trust that many hours, without apprehension.
PoohpoohBluewater, you are always fancying the
ships in a gale, and clawing off a lee-shore. Put your heart
at rest, and let us go and take a comfortable dinner with Sir
Wycherly, who has a London paper, I dare to say, that may
let us into some of the secrets of state. Are there any tidings
from our people in Flanders?
Things remain pretty much as they have been,
returned
Sir Wycherly, since that last terrible affair, in
which the Duke got the better of the French at  I never
can remember an outlandish name; but it sounds something
like a Christian baptism. If my poor brother, St. James,
were living, now, he could tell us all about it.
Christian baptism! That 's an odd allusion for a field
of battle. The armies can't have got to Jerusalem; hey!
Atwood?
I rather think, Sir Gervaise, the secretary coolly
remarked
,
that Sir Wycherly Wychecombe refers to the battle that
took place last spring  it was fought at Font-something;
and a font certainly has something to do with Christian
baptism
.
That 's it  that 's it, cried Sir Wycherly, with some
eagerness; Fonteno was the name of the place, where the
Duke would have carried all before him, and brought
Marshal
Saxe, and all his frog-eaters prisoners to England, had
our Dutch and German allies behaved better than they did.
So it is with poor old England, gentlemen; whatever
she
gains, her allies always
lose
for her  the Germans, or the
colonists, are constantly getting us into trouble!
Both Sir Gervaise and his friend were practical men, and
well knew that they never fought the Dutch or the French,
without meeting with something that was pretty nearly their
match. They had no faith in general national superiority.
The courts-martial that so often succeeded general actions,
had taught them that there were all degrees of spirit, as well
as all degrees of a want of spirit; and they knew too much,
to be the dupes of flourishes of the pen, or of vapid
declamation
at dinner-speeches, and in the House of Commons.
Men, well led and commanded, they had ascertained by
experience
,
were worth twice as much as the same men when
ill led and ill commanded; and they were not to be told
that the moral tone of an army or a fleet, from which all its
success was derived, depended more on the conventional
feeling that had been got up through moral agencies, than
on birth-place, origin, or colour. Each glanced his eye
significantly
at the other, and a sarcastic smile passed over the
face of Sir Gervaise, though his friend maintained his
customary
appearance of gravity.
I believe le Grand Monarque and Marshal Saxe give a
different account of that matter, Sir Wycherly, drily
observed
the former; and it may be well to remember that
there are two sides to every story. Whatever may be said
of Dettingen, I fancy history will set down Fonteno as
anything but a feather in His Royal Highness' cap.
You surely do not consider it possible for the French
arms to overthrow a British army, Sir Gervaise Oakes!
exclaimed the simple-minded provincialfor such was Sir
Wycherly Wychecombe, though he had sat in parliament,
had four thousand a year, and was of one of the oldest
families
in EnglandIt sounds like treason to admit the
possibility
of such a thing.
God bless us, my dear sir, I am as far from supposing
any such thing, as the Duke of Cumberland himself; who,
by the way, has as much English blood in his veins, as the
Baltic may have of the water of the Mediterraneanhey!
Atwood? By the way, Sir Wycherly, I must ask a little
tenderness of you in behalf of my friend the secretary, here,
who has a national weakness in favour of the Pretender, and
all of the clan Stuart.
I hope not  I sincerely hope not, Sir Gervaise!
exclaimed
Sir Wycherly, with a warmth that was not entirely
free from alarm; his own loyalty to the new house being
altogether without reproach. Mr. Atwood has the air of a
gentleman of too good principles not to see on which side
real religious and political liberty lie. I am sure you are
pleased to be jocular, Sir Gervaise; the very circumstance
that he is in your company is a pledge of his loyalty.
Well, well, Sir Wycherly, I would not give you a false
idea of my friend Atwood, if possible; and so I may as well
confess, that, while his Scotch blood inclines him to
toryism
,
his English reason makes him a whig. If Charles
Stuart never gets the throne until Stephen Atwood helps him
to a seat on it, he may take leave of ambition for ever.
I thought as much, Sir GervaiseI thought
your
secretary
could never lean to the doctrine of `passive obedience
and non-resistance.' That 's a principle which would hardly
suit sailors, Admiral Bluewater.
Admiral Bluewater's fine, full, blue eye lighted with an
expression approaching irony; but he made no other answer
than a slight inclination of the head. In point of fact,
he
was a Jacobite; though no one was acquainted with the
circumstance
but his immediate commanding officer. As a
seaman, he was called on only to serve his country; and,
as often happens to military men, he was willing to do this
under any superior whom circumstances might place over
his head, let his private sentiments be what they might.
During the civil war of 1715, he was too young in years,
and too low in rank, to render his opinions of much
importance
;
and, kept on foreign stations, his services could
only affect the general interests of the nation, without
producing
any influence on the contest at home. Since that
period, nothing had occurred to require one, whose duty
kept him on the ocean, to come to a very positive decision
between the two masters that claimed his allegiance. Sir
Gervaise had always been able to persuade him that he was
sustaining the honour and interests of his country, and that
ought to be sufficient to a patriot, let who would rule.
Notwithstanding
this wide difference in political feeling between
the two admiralsSir Gervaise being as decided a whig, as
his friend was a tory  their personal harmony had been
without a shade. As to confidence, the superior knew the
inferior so well, that he believed the surest way to prevent his
taking sides openly with the Jacobites, or of doing them secret
service, was to put it in his power to commit a great breach
of trust. So long as faith were put in his integrity, Sir
Gervaise
felt certain his friend Bluewater might be relied on;
and he also knew that, should the moment ever come when
the other really intended to abandon the service of the house
of Hanover, he would frankly throw up his employments,
and join the hostile standard, without profiting, in any
manner
,
by the trusts he had previously enjoyed. It is also
necessary
that the reader should understand that Admiral
Bluewater had never communicated his political opinions to
any person but his friend; the Pretender and his counsellors
being as ignorant of them, as George II. and his ministers.
The only practical effect, therefore, that they had ever
produced
was to induce him to decline separate commands,
several of which had been offered to him; one, quite equal
to that enjoyed by Sir Gervaise Oakes, himself.
No, the latter answered to Sir Wycherly's remark;
though the grave, thoughtful expression of his face, showed
how little his feelings chimed in, at the moment, with the
ironical language of his tongue. NoSir Wycherly, a
man-of-war's man, in particular, has not the slightest idea
of `passive obedience and non-resistance,'that is a doctrine
which is intelligible only to papists and tories. Bluewater
is in a brown study; thinking no doubt of the manner in
which he intends to lead down on Monsieur de Gravelin,
should we ever have the luck to meet that gentleman again;
so we will, if it's agreeable to all parties, change the
subject
.
With all my heart, Sir Gervaise, answered the baronet,
cordially; and, after all, there is little use in discussing
the affair of the Pretender any longer, for he appears to be
quite out of men's minds, since that last failure of King
Louis XV.
Yes, Norris rather crushed the young viper in its shell,
and we may consider the thing at an end.
So my late brother, Baron Wychecombe, always treated
it, Sir Gervaise. He once assured me that the twelve
judges were clearly against the claim, and that the Stuarts
had nothing to expect from
them
.
Did he tell you, sir, on what ground these learned
gentlemen
had come to this decision? quietly asked Admiral
Bluewater.
He did, indeed; for he knew my strong desire to make
out a good case against the tories so well, that he laid all
the law before me. I am a bad hand, however, to repeat
even what I hear; though my poor brother, the late Rev.
James Wychecombe  St. James as I used to call him
could go over a discourse half an hour long, and not miss a
word. Thomas and James appear to have run away with
the memories of the rest of the family. Nevertheless, I
recollect
it all depended on an act of Parliament, which is
supreme; and the house of Hanover reigning by an act of
Parliament, no court could set aside the claim.
Very clearly explained, sir, continued Bluewater;
and you will permit me to say that there was no necessity
for an apology on account of the memory. Your brother,
however, might not have exactly explained what an act of
Parliament is. King, Lords, and Commons, are all
necessary
to an act of Parliament.
Certainlywe all know that, my dear admiral; we poor
fellows ashore here, as well as you mariners at sea. The
Hanoverian succession had all three to authorize it.
Had it a king?
A king! Out of disputeor what we bachelors ought
to consider as much better, it had a
queen
. Queen Anne
approved of the act, and that made it an act of Parliament.
I assure you, I learned a good deal of law in the Baron's
visits to Wychecombe; and in the pleasant hours we used
to chat together in his chambers!
And who signed the act of Parliament that made Anne
a queen? or did she ascend the throne by regular
succession
?
Both Mary and Anne were sovereigns by acts of
Parliament, and we must look back until we get the
approval
of a prince who took the crown by legal descent.
Comecome, Bluewater, put in Sir Gervaise, gravely;
we may persuade Sir Wycherly, in this manner, that he
has a couple of furious Jacobites in company. The Stuarts
were dethroned by a revolution, which is a law of nature,
and enacted by God, and which of course overshadows all
other laws when it gets into the ascendant, as it clearly has
done in this case. I take it, Sir Wycherly, these are your
park-gates, and that yonder is the Hall.
This remark changed the discourse, and the whole party
proceeded towards the house, discussing the beauty of its
position, its history, and its advantages, until they reached
its door.
CHAPTER V.
Monarch and ministers, are awful names:
Whoever wear them, challenge our devoir.
Young
.
Our
plan does not require an elaborate description of the
residence
of Sir Wycherly. The house had been neither priory,
abbey, nor castle; but it was erected as a dwelling for
himself and his posterity, by a Sir Michael Wychecombe,
two or three centuries before, and had been kept in good
serviceable condition ever since. It had the usual long,
narrow
windows, a suitable hall, wainscoted rooms,
battlemented
walls, and turreted angles. It was neither large,
nor small; handsome, nor ugly; grand, nor mean; but it
was quaint, respectable in appearance, and comfortable as
an abode.
The admirals were put each in possession of
bed-chambers
and dressing-rooms, as soon as they arrived; and
Atwood
was
berthed
not far from his commanding-officer, in
readiness for service, if required. Sir Wycherly was
naturally
hospitable; but his retired situation had given him a
Vol. I.  7
zest for company, that greatly increased the inborn
disposition
.
Sir Gervaise, it was understood, was to pass the night
with him, and he entertained strong hopes of including his
friend in the same arrangement. Beds were ordered, too,
for Dutton, his wife, and daughter; and his namesake, the
lieutenant, was expected also to sleep under his roof, that
night.
The day passed in the customary manner; the party
having
breakfasted, and then separated to attend to their several
occupations, agreeably to the usages of all country houses,
in all parts of the world, and, we believe, in all time. Sir
Gervaise, who had sent a messenger off to the Plantagenet
for certain papers, spent the morning in writing; Admiral
Bluewater walked in the park, by himself; Atwood was
occupied
with his superior; Sir Wycherly rode among his
labourers; and Tom Wychecombe took a rod, and pretended
to go forth to fish, though he actually held his way back to
the head-land, lingering in and around the cottage until it
was time to return home. At the proper hour, Sir
Wycherly
sent his chariot for the ladies; and a few minutes
before the appointed moment, the party began to assemble
in the drawing-room.
When Sir Wycherly appeared, he found the Duttons
already
in possession, with Tom doing the honours of the
house. Of the sailing-master and his daughter, it is
unnecessary
to say more than that the former was in his best
uniform
an
exceedingly plain one, as was then the case with
the whole naval wardrobeand that the last had recovered
from her illness, as was evident by the bloom that the
sensitive
blushes constantly cast athwart her lovely face. Her
attire was exactly what it ought to have been; neat, simple,
and becoming. In honour of the host, she wore her best;
but this was what became her station, though a little jewelry
that rather surpassed what might have been expected in a
girl of her rank of life, threw around her person an air of
modest elegance. Mrs. Dutton was a plain, matronly
woman
the
daughter of a land-steward of a nobleman in the
same countywith an air of great mental suffering, from
griefs she had never yet exposed to the heartless sympathy
of the world.
The baronet was so much in the habit of seeing his
humble
neighbours, that an intimacy had grown up between
them. Sir Wycherly, who was anything but an acute
observer
,
felt an interest in the melancholy-looking, and almost
heart-broken mother, without knowing why; or certainly
without suspecting the real character of her habitual
sadness
;
while Mildred's youth and beauty had not failed of
producing the customary effect of making a friend of the
old bachelor. He shook hands all round, therefore, with
great cordiality; expressing his joy at meeting Mrs. Dutton,
and congratulating the daughter on her complete recovery.
I see Tom has been attentive to his duty, he added,
while I've been detained by a silly fellow about a
complaint
against a poacher. My namesake, young Wycherly,
has not got back yet, though it is quite two hours past his
time; and Mr. Atwood tells me the admiral is a little uneasy
about his despatches. I tell him Mr. Wycherly
Wychecombe
,
though I have not the honour of ranking him among
my relatives, and he is only a Virginian by birth, is a young
man to be relied on; and that the despatches are safe, let
what may detain the courier.
And why should not a Virginian be every way as
trustworthy
and prompt as an Englishman, Sir Wycherly?
asked Mrs. Dutton. He
is
an Englishman, merely
separated
from us by the water.
This was said mildly, or in the manner of one accustomed
to speak under a rebuked feeling; but it was said earnestly,
and perhaps a little reproachfully, while the speaker's eye
glanced with natural interest towards the beautiful face of
her daughter.
Why not, sure enough, my dear Mrs. Dutton! echoed the
baronet. They
are
Englishmen, like ourselves, only born
out of the realm, as it might be, and no doubt a little
different
on that account. They are fellow-subjects, Mrs.
Dutton, and that is a great deal. Then they are miracles
of loyalty, there being scarcely a Jacobite, as they tell me,
in all the colonies.
Mr. Wycherly Wychecombe is a very respectable young
gentleman, said Dutton; and I hear he is a prime seaman
for his years. He has not the honour of being related to
this distinguished family, like Mr. Thomas, here, it is true;
but he is likely to make a name for himself. Should he
get a ship, and do as handsome things in her, as he has
done already, His Majesty would probably knight him; and
then we should have
two
Sir Wycherly Wychecombes!
I hope not  I hope not! exclaimed the baronet; I
think there must be a law against
that
. As it is, I shall be
obliged to put Bart, after my name, as my worthy
grandfather
used to do, in order to prevent confusion; but England
can't bear two Sir Wycherlys, any more than the world
can bear two suns. Is not that your opinion, Miss Mildred?
The baronet had laughed at his own allusion, showing he
spoke half jocularly; but, as his question was put in too
direct
a manner to escape general attention, the confused girl
was obliged to answer.
I dare say Mr. Wychecombe will never reach a rank
high enough to cause any such difficulty, she said; and it
was said in all sincerity; for, unconsciously perhaps, she
secretly hoped that no difference so wide might ever be
created between the youth and herself. If he should, I
suppose his rights would be as good as another's, and he
must keep his name.
In such a case, which is improbable enough, as Miss
Mildred has so well observed, put in Tom Wychecombe,
we should have to submit to the
knighthood
, for that
comes from the king, who might knight a chimney-sweep,
if he see fit; but a question might be raised as to the
name
.
It is bad enough as it is; but if it really got to be
two
Sir
Wycherlys, I think my dear uncle would be wrong to
submit
to such an invasion of what one might call his
individuality
,
without making some inquiry as to the right of the
gentleman to one or both his names. The result might show
that the king had made a Sir Something Nobody.
The sneer and spite with which this was uttered, were too
marked to escape notice; and both Dutton and his wife felt it
would be unpleasant to mingle farther in the discourse.
Still the last, submissive, rebuked, and heart-broken as she
was, felt a glow on her own pale cheek, as she saw the
colour mount in the face of Mildred, and she detected the
strong impulses that urged the generous girl herself to
answer.
We have now known Mr. Wychecombe several months,
observed Mildred, fastening her full, blue eye calmly on
Tom's sinister-looking face; and we have never known
anything to cause us to think he would bear a nameor
namesthat he does not at least think he has a right to.
This was said gently, but so distinctly, that every word
entered fairly into Tom Wychecombe's soul; who threw a
quick, suspicious glance at the lovely speaker, as if to
ascertain
how far she intended any allusion to himself.
Meeting
with no other expression than that of generous interest,
he recovered his self-command, and made his reply with
sufficient coolness.
Upon my word, Mrs. Dutton, he cried, laughing; we
young men will all of us have to get over the cliff, and hang
dangling at the end of a rope, in order to awaken an interest
in Miss Mildred, to defend us when our backs are turned.
So eloquentand most especially, so lovely, so charming
an advocate, is almost certain of success; and my uncle and
myself must admit the absent gentleman's right to our
name; though, heaven be praised, he has not yet got either
the title or the estate.
I hope I have said nothing, Sir Wycherly, to displease
you
, returned Mildred, with emphasis; though her face was
a thousand times handsomer than ever, with the blushes
that suffused it. Nothing would pain me more, than to
suppose I had done so improper a thing. I merely meant
that we cannot believe Mr. Wycherly Wychecombe would
willingly take a name he had no right to.
My little dear, said the baronet, taking the hand of the
distressed girl, and kissing her cheek, as he had often done
before, with fatherly tenderness; it is not an easy matter
for
you
to offend
me;
and I'm sure the young fellow is quite
welcome to both my names, if you wish him to have 'em.
And I merely meant, Miss Mildred, resumed Tom, who
feared he might have gone too far; that the young
gentleman
quite
without any fault of his ownis probably
ignorant
how he came by two names that have so long pertained
to the head of an ancient and honourable family. There is
many a young man born, who is worthy of being an earl,
but whom the law considershere Tom paused to choose
terms suitable for his auditor, when the baronet added,
A
filius nullius
that's the phrase, TomI had it from
your own father's mouth.
7 *
Tom Wychecombe started, and looked furtively around
him, as if to ascertain who suspected the truth. Then he
continued, anxious to regain the ground he feared he had
lost in Mildred's favour.
Filius nullius
means, Miss Mildred, exactly what I
wish to express; a family without any legal origin. They
tell me, however, that in the colonies, nothing is more
common
than for people to take the names of the great families
at home, and after a while they fancy themselves related.
I never heard Mr. Wycherly Wychecombe say a word
to lead us to suppose that he was, in any manner, connected
with this family, sir, returned Mildred, calmly, but quite
distinctly.
Did you ever hear him say he was
not
, Miss Mildred?
I cannot say I ever did, Mr. Wychecombe. It is a
subject
that has seldom been introduced in in my hearing.
But it has often been introduced in his! I declare, Sir
Wycherly, it has struck me as singular, that while you and
I have so very frequently stated in the presence of this
gentleman
,
that our families are in no way connected, he has
never, in any manner, not even by a nod or a look of
approbation
,
assented to what he must certainly know to be
the case. But I suppose, like a true colonist, he was
unwilling
to give up his hold on the old stock.
Here the entrance of Sir Gervaise Oakes changed the
discourse. The vice-admiral joined the party in good
spirits, as is apt to be the case with men who have been
much occupied with affairs of moment, and who meet
relaxation
with a consciousness of having done their duty.
If one could take with him to sea, the comforts of such
a house as this, Sir Wycherly, and such handsome faces as
your own, young lady, cried Sir Gervaise, cheerfully, after
he had made his salutations; there would be an end of
our exclusiveness, for every
petit maitre
of Paris and
London
would turn sailor, as a matter of course. Six months
in the Bay of Biscay gives an old fellow, like myself, a keen
relish for these enjoyments, as hunger makes any meat
palatable; though I am far, very far, indeed, from putting
this house or this company, on a level with an indifferent
feast, even for an epicure.
Such as it is, Sir Gervaise, the first is quite at your
service, in all things, rejoined the host; and the last will
do all in its power to make itself agreeable.
Ahhere comes Bluewater to echo all I have said and
feel. I am telling Sir Wycherly and the ladies, of the
satisfaction
we grampuses experience when we get berthed under
such a roof as this, with woman's sweet face to throw a
gleam of happiness around her.
Admiral Bluewater had already saluted the mother, but
when his eye fell on the face and person of Mildred, it was
riveted, for an instant, with an earnestness and intentness
of surprise and admiration that all noted, though no one saw
fit to comment on it.
Sir Gervaise is so established an admirer of the sex,
said the rear-admiral, recovering himself, after a pause; that
I am never astonished at any of his raptures. Salt water
has the usual effect on him, however; for I have now known
him longer than he might wish to be reminded of, and yet
the only mistress who can keep him true, is his ship.
And to that I believe I may be said to be constant. I
don't know how it is with you, Sir Wycherly, but
everything
I am accustomed to I like. Now, here I have sailed
with both these gentlemen, until I should as soon think of
going to sea without a binnacle, as to go to sea without 'em
bothhey! Atwood?Then, as to the ship, my flag has
been flying in the Plantagenet these ten years, and I can't
bear to give the old craft up, though Bluewater, here, would
have turned her over to an inferior after three year's
service
.
I tell all the young men they don't stay long enough
in any one vessel to find out her good qualities. I never
was in a slow ship yet.
For the simple reason that you never get into a fast
one, that you do not wear her fairly out, before you give her
up. The Plantagenet, Sir Wycherly, is the fastest
two-decker
in His Majesty's service, and the vice-admiral knows
it too well to let any of us get foot in her, while her timbers
will hang together.
Let it be so, if you will; it only shows, Sir Wycherly,
that I do not choose my friends for their bad qualities. But,
allow me to ask, young lady, if you happen to know a
certain
Mr. Wycherly Wychecombea namesake, but no
relative
,
I understand, of our respectable hostand one who
holds a commission in His Majesty's service?
Certainly, Sir Gervaise, answered Mildred, dropping
her eyes to the floor, and trembling, though she scarce knew
why; Mr. Wychecombe has been about here, now, for
some months, and we all know something of him.
Then, perhaps you can tell me whether he is generally
a loiterer on duty. I do not inquire whether he is a laggard
in his duty to you, but whether, mounted on a good hunter,
he could get over twenty miles, in eight or ten hours, for
instance?
I think Sir Wycherly would tell you that he could, sir.
He may be a Wychecombe, Sir Wycherly, but he is
no Plantagenet, in the way of sailing. Surely the young
gentleman ought to have returned some hours since!
It's quite surprising to me that he is not back before
this, returned the kind-hearted baronet. He is active,
and understands himself, and there is not a better horseman
in the countyis there, Miss Mildred?
Mildred did not think it necessary to reply to this direct
appeal; but spite of the manner in which she had been
endeavouring
to school her feelings, since the accident on the
cliff, she could not prevent the deadly paleness that dread
of some accident had produced, or the rush of colour to her
cheeks that followed from the unexpected question of Sir
Wycherly. Turning to conceal her confusion, she met the
eye of Tom Wychecombe riveted on her face, with an
expression
so sinister, that it caused her to tremble.
Fortunately
,
at this moment, Sir Gervaise turned away, and
drawing near his friend, on the other side of the large
apartment
,
he said in an under tone
Luckily, Atwood has brought ashore a duplicate of my
despatches, Bluewater, and if this dilatory gentleman does not
return by the time we have dined, I will send off a second
courier. The intelligence is too important to be trifled with;
and after having brought the fleet north, to be in readiness
to serve the state in this emergency, it would be rare folly
to leave the ministry in ignorance of the reasons why I have
done it.
Nevertheless, they would be almost as well-informed,
as I am myself, returned the rear-admiral, with a little
point, but quite without any bitterness of manner. The
only advantage I have over them is that I
do
know where
the fleet is, which is more than the First Lord can boast of.
TrueI had forgot, my friendbut you must feel that
there
is
a subject on which I had better not consult you. I
have received some important intelligence, that my duty, as
a commander-in-chief, renders it necessary I shouldkeep
to myself.
Sir Gervaise laughed as he concluded, though he seemed
vexed and embarrassed. Admiral Bluewater betrayed neither
chargin, nor disappointment; but strong, nearly
ungovernable
curiosity, a feeling from which he was singularly
exempt
in general, glowed in his eyes, and lighted his whole
countenance. Still, habitual submission to his superior, and
the self-command of discipline, enabled him to wait for
anything
more that his friend might communicate. At this
moment
,
the door opened, and Wycherly entered the room, in
the state in which he had just dismounted. It was necessary
to throw but a single glance at his hurried manner, and
general appearance, to know that he had something of
importance
to communicate, and Sir Gervaise made a sign for
him not to speak,
This is public service, Sir Wycherly, said the
vice-admiral
,
and I hope you will excuse us for a few minutes.
I beg this good company will be seated at table, as soon as
dinner is served, and that you will treat us as old friends
as I should treat you, if we were on board the Plantagenet,
Admiral Bluewater, will you be of our conference?
Nothing more was said until the two admirals and the
young lieutenant were in the dressing-room of Sir Gervaise
Oakes. Then the latter turned, and addressed Wycherly,
with the manner of a superior.
I should have met you with a reproof, for this delay,
young gentleman, he commenced, did I not suspect, from
your appearance, that something of moment has occurred to
produce it. Had the mail passed the market-town, before
you reached it, sir?
It had not, Admiral Oakes; and I have the satisfaction
of knowing that your despatches are now several hours on
their way to London. I reached the office just in season to
see them mailed.
Humph! On board the Plantagenet, it is the custom for
an officer to report any important duty done, as soon as it is
in a condition to be thus laid before the superior!
I presume that is the usage in all His Majesty's ships,
Sir Gervaise Oakes; but I have been taught that a proper
discretion, when it does not interfere with positive orders,
and sometimes when it does, is a surer sign of a useful
officer
,
than even the most slavish attention to rules.
That is a just distinction, young gentleman, though safer
in the hands of a captain, perhaps, than in those of a
lieutenant
,
returned the vice-admiral, glancing at his friend,
though he secretly admired the youth's spirit. Discretion
is a comparative term; meaning different things with
different
persons. May I presume to ask what Mr. Wycherly
Wychecombe calls discretion, in the present instance?
You have every right, sir, to know, and I only wanted
your permission to tell my whole story. While waiting to
see the London mail start with your despatches, and to rest
my horse, a post-chaise arrived that was carrying a
gentleman
,
who is suspected of being a Jacobite, to his
country-seat
,
some thirty miles further west. This gentleman held
a secret conference with another person of the same way of
thinking as himself; and there was so much running and
sending of messages, that I could not avoid suspecting
something
was in the wind. Going to the stable to look after
Sir Wycherly's hunter, for I knew how much he values the
animal, I found one of the stranger's servants in discourse
with the ostler. The latter told me, when the chaise had
gone, that great tidings had reached Exeter, before the
travellers
quitted the town. These tidings he described as
news that `Charley was no longer over the water.' It was
useless, Sir Gervaise, to question one so stupid; and, at the
inn, though all observed the manner of the traveller and his
visiter, no one could tell me anything positive. Under the
circumstances, therefore, I threw myself into the return
chaise, and went as far as Fowey, where I met the important
intelligence that Prince Charles has actually landed, and is
at this moment up, in Scotland!
The Pretender is then really once more among us!
exclaimed
Sir Gervaise, like one who had half suspected the
truth.
Not the Pretender, Sir Gervaise, as I understand the
news; but his young son, Prince Charles Edward, one much
more likely to give the kingdom trouble. The fact is
certain
,
I believe; and as it struck me that it might be important
to the commander of so fine a fleet as this which lies under
Wychecombe Head, to know it, I lost no time in getting
back with the intelligence.
You have done well, young gentleman, and have proved
that discretion
is
quite as useful and respectable in a
lieutenant
,
as it can possibly prove to be in a full admiral of the
white. Go, now, and make yourself fit to take a seat by
the side of one of the sweetest girls in England, where I
shall expect to see you, in fifteen minutes. Well,
Bluewater
,
he continued, as soon as the door closed on Wycherly;
this
is
news, of a certainty!
It is, indeed; and I take it to be the news, or connected
with the news, that you have sent to the First Lord, in the
late despatches. It has not taken you altogether by
surprise
,
if the truth were said?
It has not, I confess. You know what excellent
intelligence
we have had, the past season, from the Bordeaux
agent; he sent me off such proofs of this intended
expedition
,
that I thought it advisable to bring the fleet north on
the strength of it, that the ships might be used as the
exigency
should require.
Thank God, it is a long way to Scotland, and it is not
probable we can reach the coast of that country until all is
over! I wish we had inquired of this young man with what
sort of, and how large a naval force the prince was
accompanied
with. Shall I send for him, that we may put the
question?
It is better that you remain passive, Admiral Bluewater.
I now promise you that you shall learn all I hear; and that,
under the circumstances, I think ought to content you.
The two admirals now separated, though neither returned
to the company for some little time. The intelligence they
had just learned was too important to be lightly received,
and each of these veteran seamen paced his room, for near
a quarter of an hour, reflecting on what might be the probable
consequences to the country and to himself. Sir Gervaise
Oakes expected some event of this nature, and was less taken
by surprise than his friend; still he viewed the crisis as
exceedingly
serious, and as one likely to destroy the prosperity
of the nation, as well as the peace of families. There was
then in England, as there is to-day, and as there probably
will be throughout all time, two parties; one of which clung
to the past with its hereditary and exclusive privileges,
while the other looked more towards change for anticipated
advantages, and created honours. Religion, in that age,
was made the stalking-horse of politicians; as is liberty on
one side, and order on the other, in our own times; and men
just as blindly, as vehemently, and as regardlessly of
principle
,
submitted to party in the middle of the eighteenth
century, as we know they do in the middle of the nineteenth.
The mode of acting was a little changed, and the
watchwords
and rallying points were not exactly the same, it is
true; but, in all that relates to ignorant confidence, ferocious
denunciation, and selfishness but half concealed under the
cloak of patriotism, the England of the original whigs and
tories, was the England of conservatism and reform, and
the America of 1776, and the America of 1841.
Still thousands always act, in political struggles, with the
fairest intentions, though they act in bitter opposition to each
other. When prejudice becomes the stimulant of ignorance,
no other result may be hoped for; and the experience of the
world, in the management of human affairs, has left the
upright
and intelligent, but one conclusion as the reward of all
the pains and penalties with which political revolutions have
been effectedthe conviction that no institutions can be
invented
,
which a short working does not show will be perverted
from their original intention, by the ingenuity of those
entrusted
with power. In a word, the physical constitution of man
does not more infallibly tend to decrepitude and imbecility,
imperiously requiring a new being, and a new existence, to
fulfil the objects of his creation, than the moral constitutions
which are the fruits of his wisdom, contain the seeds of
abuses and decay, that human selfishness will be as certain
to cultivate, as human indulgence is to aid the course of
nature
,
in hastening the approaches of death. Thus, while on
the one hand, there exists the constant incentive of abuses
and hopes to induce us to wish for modifications of the social
structure, on the other there stands the experience of ages
to demonstrate their insufficiency to produce the happiness
we aim at. If the world advances in civilization and
humanity
,
it is because knowledge will produce its fruits in
every soil, and under every condition of cultivation and
improvement
.
Both Sir Gervaise Oakes and Admiral Bluewater believed
themselves to be purely governed by principles, in
submitting
to the bias that each felt towards the conflicting claims
of the houses of Brunswick and Stuart. Perhaps no two
men in England were in fact less influenced by motives that
they ought to feel ashamed to own; and yet, as has been
seen, while they thought so much alike on most other things,
on this they were diametrically opposed to each other.
During the many years of arduous and delicate duties that
they had served together, jealousy, distrust, and discontent
had been equally strangers to their bosoms; for each had
ever felt the assurance that his own honour, happiness, and
interests were as much ruling motives with his friend, as
they could well be with himself. Their lives had been
constant
scenes of mutual but unpretending kindnesses; and
this under circumstances that naturally awakened all the
most generous and manly sentiments of their natures. When
young men, their laughing messmates had nick-named them
Pylades and Orestes; and later in life, on account of their
cruising so much in company, they were generally known
in the navy as the twin captains. On several occasions
had they fought enemies' frigates, and captured them; on
these occasions, as a matter of course, the senior of the two
became most known to the nation; but Sir Gervaise had
made the most generous efforts to give his junior a full share
of the credit, while Captain Bluewater never spoke of the
affairs without mentioning them as victories of the
commodore
.
In a word, on all occasions, and under all
circumstances
,
it appeared to be the aim of these generous-minded
and gallant seamen, to serve each other; nor was this
attempted
with any effort, or striving for effect; all that was
said, or done, coming naturally and spontaneously from the
heart. But, for the first time in their lives, events had now
occurred which threatened a jarring of the feelings between
Vol. I.  8
them, if they did not lead to acts which must inevitably place
them in open and declared hostility to each other. No
wonder, then, that both looked at the future with gloomy
forebodings, and a distrust, which, if it did not render them
unhappy, at least produced uneasiness.
CHAPTER VI.
The circle form'd, we sit in silent state,
Like figures drawn upon a dial-plate;
Yes ma'am, and no ma'am, uttered softly show,
Every five minutes, how the minutes go.
Cowper
.
It
is scarcely necessary to tell the reader that England,
as regarded material civilization, was a very different country
a hundred years since, from what it is to-day. We are writing
of an age of heavy wagons, coaches and six, post-chaises
and four; and not of an era of MacAdam-roads, or of cars
flying along by steam. A man may now post down to a
country-house, some sixty or eighty miles, to dinner; and
this, too, by the aid of only a pair of horses; but, in 1745
such an engagement would have required at least a start on
the previous day; and, in many parts of the island, it would
have been safer to have taken two days' grace. Scotland
was then farther from Devonshire, in effect, than Geneva is
now; and news travelled slowly, and with the usual
exaggerations
and uncertainties of delay. It was no wonder,
then, that a Jacobite who was posting off to his
country-house
the
focus of an English landlord's influence and
authorityfilled with intelligence that had reached him
through the activity of zealous political partisans, preceded
the more regular tidings of the mail, by several hours.
The little that had escaped this individual, or his servants
rather, for the gentleman was tolerably discreet himself,
confiding
in only one or two particular friends at each relay,
had not got out to the world, either very fully, or very
clearly. Wycherly had used intelligence in making his
inquiries, and he had observed an officer's prudence in
keeping
his news for the ears of his superior alone. When Sir
Gervaise joined the party in the drawing-room, therefore, he
saw that Sir Wycherly knew nothing of what had occurred
at the north; and he intended the glance which he directed
at the lieutenant to convey a hearty approval of his
discretion
.
This forbearance did more to raise the young officer
in the opinion of the practised and thoughtful admiral, than
the gallantry with which the youth had so recently
purchased
his commission; for while many were brave, few
had the self-command, and prudence, under circumstances
like the present, that alone can make a man safe in the
management of important public interests. The approbation
that Sir Gervaise felt, and which he desired to manifest, for
Wycherly's prudence, was altogether a principle, however;
since there existed no sufficient reason for keeping the secret
from as confirmed a whig as his host. On the contrary,
the sooner those opinions, which both of them would be apt to
term sound, were promulgated in the neighbourhood, the better
it might prove for the good cause. The vice-admiral,
therefore
,
determined to communicate himself, as soon as the
party was seated at table, the very secret which he so much
commended the youth for keeping. Admiral Bluewater
joining the company, at this instant, Sir Wycherly led Mrs.
Dutton to the table. No alteration had taken place among
the guests, except that Sir Gervaise wore the red riband;
a change in his dress that his friend considered to be openly
hoisting the standard of the house of Hanover.
One would not think, Sir Wycherly, commenced the
vice-admiral, glancing his eyes around him, as soon as all
were seated; that this good company has taken its place
at your hospitable table, in the midst of a threatened civil
war, if not of an actual revolution.
Every hand was arrested, and every eye turned towards
the speaker; even Admiral Bluewater earnestly regarding
his friend, anxious to know what would come next.
I believe my household is in due subjection, answered
Sir Wycherly, gazing to the right and left, as if he expected
to see his butler heading a revolt; and I fancy the only
change we shall see to-day, will be the removal of the
courses, and the appearance of their successors.
Ay, so says the hearty, comfortable Devonshire
baronet
,
while seated at his own board, favoured by abundance
and warm friends. But it would seem the snake was only
scotched; not killed.
Sir Gervaise Oakes has grown figurative; with his
snakes
and
scotch
ings, observed the rear-admiral, a little
drily.
It is
Scotch
-ing, as you say with so much emphasis,
Bluewater. I suppose, Sir WycherlyI suppose, Mr.
Dutton
,
and you, my pretty young ladyI presume all of you
have heard of such a person as the Pretender;some of you
may possibly have
seen
him.
Sir Wycherly now dropt his knife and fork, and sat
gazing
at the speaker in amazement. To him the Christian
religion
,
the liberties of the subject  more especially of the
baronet and lord of the manor, who had four thousand a
yearand the protestant succession, all seemed to be in
sudden
danger.
I always told my brother, the judgeMr. Baron
Wychecombe
,
who is dead and gone  that what between the
French, that rogue the Pope, and the spurious offspring of
King James II., we should yet see troublesome times in
England! And now, sir, my predictions are verified!
Not as to England, yet, my good sir. Of Scotland I
have not quite so good news to tell you; as your namesake,
here, brings us the tidings that the son of the Pretender has
landed in that kingdom, and is rallying the clans. He has
come unattended by any Frenchmen, it would seem, and has
thrown himself altogether on the misguided nobles and
followers
of his house.
'T is, at least, a chivalrous and princely act! exclaimed
Admiral Bluewater.
Yesinasmuch as it is a heedless and mad one.
England
is not to be conquered by a rabble of half-dressed
Scotchmen.
True; but England may be conquered by England,
notwithstanding
.
Sir Gervaise now chose to remain silent, for never before
had Bluewater come so near betraying his political bias, in
the presence of third persons. This pause enabled Sir
Wycherly
to find his voice.
Let me see, Tom, said the baronet, fifteen and ten
are twenty-five, and ten are thirty, and ten are forty-five
it is just thirty years since the Jacobites were up before! It
would seem that half a human life is not sufficient to fill the
cravings of a Scotchman's maw, for English gold.
Twice thirty years would hardly quell the promptings
of a noble spirit, when his notions of justice showed him the
way to the English throne, observed Bluewater, coolly.
For my part, I like the spirit of this young prince, for he
who nobly dares, nobly deserves. What say you, my
beautiful
neighbour?
If you mean to address me, sir, by that compliment,
answered Mildred, modestly, but with the emphasis that the
gentlest of her sex are apt to use when they feel strongly;
I must be suffered to say that I hope every Englishman
will dare as nobly, and deserve as well in defence of his
liberties.
Comecome, Bluewater, interrupted Sir Gervaise, with
a gravity that almost amounted to reproof; I cannot
permit
such innuendoes before one so young and unpractised.
The young lady might really suppose that His Majesty's
fleet was entrusted to men unworthy to enjoy his confidence,
by the cool way in which you carry on the joke. I propose,
now, Sir Wycherly, that we eat our dinner in peace, and
say no more about this mad expedition, until the cloth is
drawn, at least. It's a long road to Scotland, and there is
little danger that this adventurer will find his way into
Devonshire
before the nuts are placed before us.
It would be nuts to us, if he did, Sir Gervaise, put in
Tom Wycherly, laughing heartily at his own wit. My
uncle would enjoy nothing more than to see the spurious
sovereign on his own estate, here, and in the hands of his
own tenants. I think, sir, that Wychecombe and one or
two of the adjoining manors, would dispose of him.
That might depend on circumstances, the admiral
answered, a little drily. These Scots have such a thing as
a claymore, and are desperate fellows, they tell me, at a
charge. The very fact of arming a soldier with a short
sword, shows a most bloody-minded disposition.
8 *
You forget, Sir Gervaise, that we have our Cornish hug,
here in the west of England; and I will put our fellows
against any Scotch regiment that ever charged an enemy.
Tom laughed again at his own allusion to a proverbial mode
of grappling, familiar to the adjoining county.
This is all very well, Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, so
long as Devonshire is in the west of England, and Scotland
lies north of the Tweed. Sir Wycherly might as well leave
the matter in the hands of the Duke and his regulars, if it
were only in the way of letting every man follow his own
trade.
It strikes me as so singularly insolent in a base-born
boy like this, pretending to the English crown, that I can
barely speak of him with patience! We all know that his
father was a changeling, and the son of a changeling can
have no more right than the father himself. I do not
remember
what the law terms such pretenders; but I dare say
it is something sufficiently odious.
Filius nullius
, Thomas, said Sir Wycherly, with a
little eagerness to show his learning. That 's the very
phrase. I have it from the first authority; my late brother,
Baron Wychecombe, giving it to me with his own mouth, on
an occasion that called for an understanding of such
matters
.
The judge was a most accurate lawyer, particularly
in all that related to names; and I 'll engage, if he were
living
at this moment, he would tell you the legal appellation
of a changeling ought to be
filius nullius
.
In spite of his native impudence, and an innate
determination
to make his way in the world, without much regard to
truth, Tom Wychecombe felt his cheek burn so much, at
this innocent allusion of his reputed uncle, that he was
actually
obliged to turn away his face, in order to conceal his
confusion. Had any moral delinquency of his own been
implicated in the remark, he might have found means to
steel himself against its consequences; but, as is only too
often the case, he was far more ashamed of a misfortune over
which he had no possible control, than he would have been
of a crime for which he was strictly responsible in morals.
Sir Gervaise smiled at Sir Wycherly's knowledge of law
terms, not to say of Latin; and turning good-humouredly
to his friend the rear-admiral, anxious to re-establish friendly
relations with him, he said with well-concealed irony
Sir Wycherly must be right, Bluewater. A changeling
is
nobody
that is to say, he is not the
body
he pretends to
be, which is substantially being nobody  and the son of
nobody, is clearly a
filius nullius
. And now having settled
what may be called the law of the case, I demand a truce,
until we get our nutsfor as to Mr. Thomas Wychecombe's
having
his
nut to crack, at least to-day, I take it there are
too many loyal subjects in the north.
When men know each other as well as was the case with
our two admirals, there are a thousand secret means of
annoyance
,
as well as of establishing amity. Admiral
Bluewater
was well aware that Sir Gervaise was greatly superior
to the vulgar whig notion of the day, which believed in the
fabricated tale of the Pretender's spurious birth; and the
secret
and ironical allusion he had made to his impression on
that subject, acted as oil to his own chafed spirit, disposing
him to moderation. This had been the intention of the
other; and the smiles they exchanged, sufficiently proved
that their usual mental intercourse was temporarily restored
at least.
Deference to his guests made Sir Wycherly consent to
change the subject, though he was a little mystified with the
obvious reluctance of the two admirals to speak of an
enterprise
that ought to be uppermost, according to his notion of
the matter, in every Englishman's mind. Tom had
received
a rebuke that kept him silent during the rest of the
dinner; while the others were content to eat and drink, as if
nothing had happened.
It is seldom that a party takes its seat at table without
some secret manuvring, as to the neighbourhood, when
the claims of rank and character do not interfere with personal
wishes. Sir Wycherly had placed Sir Gervaise on his right
and Mrs. Dutton on his left. But Admiral Bluewater had
escaped from his control, and taken his seat next to
Mildred
,
who had been placed by Tom Wychecombe close to
himself, at the foot of the table. Wycherly occupied the seat
opposite, and this compolled Dutton, and Mr. Rotherham,
the vicar, to fill the other two chairs. The good baronet
had made a wry face, at seeing a rear-admiral so
unworthily
bestowed; but Sir Gervaise assuring him that his
friend was never so happy as when in the service of beauty,
he was fain to submit to the arrangement.
That Admiral Bluewater was struck with Mildred's beauty,
and pleased with her natural and feminine manner, one
altogether
superior to what might have been expected from
her station in life, was very apparent to all at table; though
it was quite impossible to mistake his parental and frank air
for any other admiration than that which was suitable to
the difference in years, and in unison with their respective
conditions and experience. Mrs. Dutton, so far from taking
the alarm at the rear-admiral's attentions, felt gratification
in observing them; and perhaps she experienced a secret
pride in the consciousness of their being so well merited. It
has been said, already, that she was, herself, the daughter
of a land-steward of a nobleman, in an adjoining county;
but it may be well to add, here, that she had been so great
a favourite with the daughters of her father's employer, as
to have been admitted, in a measure, to their society; and
to have enjoyed some of the advantages of their education.
Lady Wilmeter, the mother of the young ladies, to whom
she was admitted as a sort of humble companion, had formed
the opinion it might be an advantage to the girl to educate
her for a governess; little conceiving, in her own situation,
that she was preparing a course of life for Martha Ray, for
such was Mrs. Dutton's maiden name, that was perhaps the
least enviable of all the careers that a virtuous and
intelligent
female can run. This was, as education and
governesses
were appreciated a century ago; the world, with all
its faults and sophisms, having unquestionably made a vast
stride towards real civilization, and moral truths, in a
thousand
important interests, since that time. Nevertheless, the
education was received, together with a good many tastes, and
sentiments, and opinions, which it may well be questioned,
whether they contributed most to the happiness or
unhappiness
of the pupil, in her future life. Frank Dutton, then a
handsome, though far from polished young sea-lieutenant,
interfered with the arrangement, by making Martha Ray
his wife, when she was two-and-twenty. This match was
suitable, in all respects, with the important exception of the
educations and characters of the parties. Still, as a woman
may well be more refined, and in some things, even more
intelligent
than her husband; and as sailors, in the
commencement
of the eighteenth century, formed a class of society much
more distinct than they do to-day, there would have been
nothing absolutely incompatible with the future well-being
of the young couple, had each pursued his, or her own
career, in a manner suitable to their respective duties.
Young Dutton had taken away his bride, with the two
thousand
pounds she had received from her father, and for a long
time he was seen no more in his native county. After an
absence of some twenty years, however, he returned, broken
in constitution, and degraded in rank, to occupy the station
he filled at the opening of this tale. Mrs. Dutton brought
with her one child, the beautiful girl introduced to the reader,
and to whom she was studiously imparting all she had
herself
acquired, in the adventitious manner mentioned. Such
were the means, by which Mildred, like her mother, had
been educated above her condition in life; and it had been
remarked that, though Mrs. Dutton had probably no cause
to felicitate herself on the possession of manners and
sentiments
that met with so little sympathy, or appreciation, in
her actual situation, she assiduously cultivated the same
manners and opinions in her daughter; frequently
manifesting
a sort of sickly fastidiousness on the subject of
Mildred's deportment and tastes. It is probable the girl
owed her improvement in both, however, more to the
circumstance
of her being left so much alone with her mother,
than to any positive lessons she received; the influence of
example, for years, producing its usual effects.
No one in Wychecombe positively knew the history of
Dutton's professional degradation. He had never risen
higher than to be a lieutenant; and from this station he had
fallen by the sentence of a court-martial. His restoration
to the service, in the humbler and almost hopeless rank of
a master, was believed to have been brought about by Mrs.
Dutton's influence with the present Lord Wilmeter, who was
the brother of her youthful companions. That the husband
had wasted his means, was as certain as that his habits, on
the score of temperance at least, were bad, and that his
wife, if not positively broken-hearted, was an unhappy
woman
;
one to be pitied, and admired. Sir Wycherly was
little addicted to analysis, but he could not fail to discover
the superiority of the wife and daughter, over the husband
and father; and it is due to his young namesake to add,
that his obvious admiration of Mildred was quite as much
owing to her mind, deportment, character, and tastes, as to
her exceeding personal charms.
This little digression may perhaps, in the reader's eyes,
excuse the interest Admiral Bluewater took in our heroine.
With the indulgence of years and station, and the tact of a
man of the world, he succeeded in drawing Mildred out,
without alarming her timidity; and he was surprised at
discovering
the delicacy of her sentiments, and the accuracy
of her knowledge. He was too conversant with society, and
had too much good taste, to make any deliberate parade of
opinions; but in the quiet manner that is so easy to those
who are accustomed to deal with truths and tastes as familiar
things, he succeeded in inducing her to answer his own
remarks
,
to sympathize with his feelings, to laugh when he
laughed, and to assume a look of disapproval, when he felt
that disapprobation was just. To all this Wycherly was a
delighted witness, and in some respects he participated in
the conversation; for there was evidently no wish on the
part of the rear-admiral to monopolize his beautiful
companion
to himself. Perhaps the position of the young man,
directly opposite to her, aided in inducing Mildred to
bestow
so many grateful looks and sweet smiles, on the older
officer; for she could not glance across the table, without
meeting the admiring gaze of Wycherly, fastened on her
own blushing face.
It is certain, if our heroine did not, during this repast,
make a conquest of Admiral Bluewater, in the ordinary
meaning of the term, that she made him a friend. Sir
Gervaise
,
even, was struck with the singular and devoted
manner
in which his old messmate gave all his attention to the
beautiful girl at his side; and, once or twice, he caught
himself conjecturing whether it were possible, that one as
practised, as sensible, and as much accustomed to the
beauties
of the court, as Bluewater, had actually been caught, by
the pretty face of a country girl, when so well turned of
fifty, himself! Then discarding the notion as preposterous,
he gave his attention to the discourse of Sir Wycherly; a
dissertation on rabbits, and rabbit-warrens. In this manner
the dinner passed away.
Mrs. Dutton asked her host's permission to retire, with her
daughter, at the earliest moment permitted by propriety. In
quitting the room she cast an anxious glance at the face of
her husband, which was already becoming flushed with his
frequent applications of port; and spite of an effort to look
smiling and cheerful, her lips quivered, and by the time she
and Mildred reached the drawing-room, tears were fast
falling
down her cheeks. No explanation was asked, or needed,
by the daughter, who threw herself into her mother's arms,
and for several minutes they wept together, in silence.
Never had Mrs. Dutton spoken, even to Mildred, of the
besetting
and degrading vice of her husband; but it had been
impossible to conceal its painful consequences from the
world; much less from one who lived in the bosom of her
family. On that failing which the wife treated so tenderly,
the daughter of course could not touch; but the silent
communion
of tears had got to be so sweet to both, that, within
the last year, it was of very frequent occurrence.
Really, Mildred, said the mother, at length, after
having
succeeded in suppressing her emotion, and in drying her
eyes, while she smiled fondly in the face of the lovely and
affectionate girl; this Admiral Bluewater is getting to be
so particular, I hardly know how to treat the matter.
Oh! mother, he is a delightful old gentleman! and he is
so gentle, while he is so frank, that he wins your confidence
almost before you know it. I wonder if he could have been
serious in what he said about the noble daring and noble
deserving of Prince Edward!
That must pass for trifling, of course; the ministry
would scarcely employ any but a true whig, in command
of a fleet. I saw several of his family, when a girl, and
have always heard them spoken of with esteem and respect.
Lord Bluewater, this gentleman's cousin, was very intimate
with the present Lord Wilmeter, and was often at the castle.
I remember to have heard that he had a disappointment in
love, when quite a young man, and that he has ever since
been considered a confirmed bachelor. So you will take
heed, my love.
The warning was unnecessary, dear mother, returned
Mildred, laughing; I could dote on the admiral as a father,
but must be excused from considering him young enough
for a nearer tie.
And yet he has the much-admired profession, Mildred,
said the mother, smiling fondly, and yet a little archly. I
have often heard you speak of your passion for the sea.
That was formerly, mother, when I spoke as a sailor's
daughter, and as girls are apt to speak, without much
reflection
.
I do not know that I think better of a seaman's
profession, now, than I do of any other. I fear there is
often much misery in store for soldiers' and sailors' wives.
Mrs. Dutton's lip quivered again; but hearing a foot at
the door, she made an effort to be composed, just as Admiral
Bluewater entered.
I have run away from the bottle, Mrs. Dutton, to join
you and your fair daughter, as I would run from an enemy
of twice my force, he said, giving each lady a hand, in a
manner so friendly, as to render the act more than gracious;
for it was kind. Oakes is bowsing up his jib with his
brother baronet, as we sailors say, and I have hauled out
of the line, without a signal.
I hope Sir Gervaise Oakes does not consider it
necessary
to drink more wine than is good for the mind and
body, observed Mrs. Dutton, with a haste that she
immediately
regretted.
Not he. Gervaise Oakes is as discreet a man, in all
that relates to the table, as an anchorite; and yet he has a
faculty of
seeming
to drink, that makes him a boon
companion
for a four-bottle man. How the deuce he does it, is
more than I can tell you; but he does it so well, that he
does not more thoroughly get the better of the king's
enemies
,
on the high seas, than he floors his friends under the
table. Sir Wycherly has begun his libations in honour of
the house of Hanover, and they will be likely to make a
long sitting.
Mrs. Dutton sighed, and walked away to a window, to
conceal the paleness of her cheeks. Admiral Bluewater,
though perfectly abstemious himself, regarded license with
the bottle after dinner, like most men of that age, as a very
venial weakness, and he quietly took a seat by the side of
Mildred, and began to converse.
I hope, young lady, as a sailor's child, you feel an
hereditary
indulgence for a seaman's gossip, he said. We,
who are so much shut up in our ships, have a poverty of
ideas on most subjects; and as to always talking of the
winds and waves, that would fatigue even a poet.
As a sailor's daughter, I honour my father's calling,
sir; and as an English girl, I venerate the brave defenders
of the island. Nor do I know that seamen have less to say,
than other men.
I am glad to hear you confess this, forshall I be frank
with you, and take a liberty that would better become a
friend of a dozen years, than an acquaintance of a day;
and, yet, I know not why it is so, my dear child, but I feel
as if I had long known you, though I am certain we never
met before.
Perhaps, sir, it is an omen that we are long to know
each other, in future, said Mildred, with the winning
confidence
of unsuspecting and innocent girlhood. I hope you
will use no reserve.
Well, then, at the risk of making a sad blunder, I will
just say, that `my nephew Tom' is anything but a
prepossessing
youth; and that I hope all eyes regard him exactly
as he appears to a sailor of fifty-five.
I cannot answer for more than those of a girl of
nineteen
,
Admiral Bluewater, said Mildred, laughing; but,
for her, I think I may say that she does not look on him as
either an Adonis, or a Crichton.
Upon my soul! I am right glad to hear this, for the
fellow has accidental advantages enough to render him
formidable
.
He is the heir to the baronetcy, and this estate, I
believe?
I presume he is. Sir Wycherly has no other nephew
or at least this is the eldest of three brothers, I am told
and, being childless himself, it
must
be so. My father tells
me Sir Wycherly speaks of Mr. Thomas Wychecombe as
his future-heir.
Your father!Ay, fathers look on these matters with
eyes very different from their daughters!
There is one thing about seamen that renders them at
least safe acquaintances, said Mildred, smiling; I mean
their frankness.
Vol. I.9
That is a failing of mine, as I have heard. But you
will pardon an indiscretion that arises in the interest I feel
in yourself. The eldest of three brothersis the lieutenant,
then, a younger son?
He
does not belong to the family at all, I believe,
Mildred
answered, colouring slightly, in spite of a resolute
determination
to appear unconcerned. Mr. Wycherly
Wychecombe
is no relative of our host, I hear; though he bears
both of his names. He is from the colonies; born in
Virginia
.
He is a noble, and a noble-looking fellow! Were I the
baronet, I would break the entail, rather than the acres
should go to that sinister-looking nephew, and bestow them
on the namesake. From Virginia, and not even a relative,
at all?
That is what Mr. Thomas Wychecombe says; and even
Sir Wycherly confirms it. I have never heard Mr.
Wycherly
Wychecombe speak on the subject, himself.
A weakness of poor human nature! The lad finds an
honourable, ancient, and affluent family here, and has not
the courage to declare his want of affinity to it; happening
to bear the same name.
Mildred hesitated about replying; but a generous feeling
got the better of her diffidence. I have never seen
anything
in the conduct of Mr. Wycherly Wychecombe to
induce me to think that he feels any such weakness, she
said, earnestly. He seems rather to take pride in, than
to feel ashamed of, his being a colonial; and you know, we,
in England, hardly look on the people of the colonies as
our equals.
And have you, young lady, any of that overweening
prejudice in favour of your own island?
I hope not; but I think most persons have. Mr.
Wycherly Wychecombe admits that Virginia is inferior to
England, in a thousand things; and yet he seems to take
pride in his birth-place.
Every sentiment of this nature is to be traced to self.
We know that the fact is irretrievable, and struggle to be
proud of what we cannot help. The Turk will tell you he
has the honour to be a native of Stamboul; the Parisian
will boast of his Faubourg; and the cockney exults in
Wapping
.
Personal conceit lies at the bottom of all; for we
fancy that places to which
we
belong, are not places to be
ashamed of.
And yet I do not think Mr. Wycherly at all
remarkable
for conceit. On the contrary, he is rather diffident and
unassuming.
This was said simply, but so sincerely, as to induce the
listener to fasten his penetrating blue eye on the speaker,
who now first took the alarm, and felt that she might have said
too much. At this moment the two young men entered, and
a servant appeared to request that Admiral Bluewater would
do Sir Gervaise Oakes the favour to join him, in the
dressing-room
of the latter.
Tom Wychecombe reported the condition of the
dinner-table
to be such, as to render it desirable for all but three
and four-bottle men to retire. Hanoverian toasts and
sentiments
were in the ascendant, and there was every
appearance
that those who remained intended to make a night of
it. This was sad intelligence for Mrs. Dutton, who had
come forward eagerly to hear the report, but who now
returned
to the window, apparently irresolute as to the course
she ought to take. As both the young men remained near
Mildred to converse, she had sufficient opportunity to come
to her decision, without interruption, or hindrance.
CHAPTER VII.
Somewhat we will do.
And, look, when I am king, claim thou of me
The earldom of Hereford, and all the moveables
Whereof the king my brother was possessed.
Richard
III.
Rear-Admiral Bluewater
found Sir Gervaise Oakes
pacing a large dressing-room, quarter-deck fashion, with as
much zeal, as if just released from a long sitting, on official
duty, in his own cabin. As the two officers were perfectly
familiar with each other's personal habits, neither deviated
from his particular mode of indulging his ease; but the last
comer quietly took his seat in a large chair, disposing of his
person in a way to show he intended to consult his comfort,
let what would happen.
Bluewater, commenced Sir Gervaise, this is a very
foolish affair of the Pretender's son, and can only lead to his
destruction. I look upon it as altogether unfortunate.
That, as it may terminate. No man can tell what a
day, or an hour, may bring forth. I am sure, such a rising
was one of the last things
I
have been anticipating, down
yonder, in the Bay of Biscay.
I wish, with all my heart, we had never left it,
muttered
Sir Gervaise, so low that his companion did not hear
him. Then he added, in a louder tone,
Our
duty,
however
,
is very simple. We have only to obey orders; and it
seems that the young man has no naval force to sustain
him. We shall probably be sent to watch Brest, or l'Orient,
or some other port. Monsieur must be kept in, let what
will happen.
I rather think it would be better to let him out, our
chances on the high seas being at least as good as his own.
I am no friend to blockades, which strike me as an
un-English
mode of carrying on a war.
You are right enough, Dick, in the main, returned Sir
Gervaise, laughing.
Ay, and
on
the main, Oakes. I sincerely hope the
First Lord will not send a man like you, who are every way
so capable of giving an account of your enemy with plenty
of sea-room, on duty so scurvy as a blockade.
A man like
me!
Why a man like
me
, in particular?
I trust I am to have the pleasure of Admiral Bluewater's
company, advice, and assistance?
An inferior never can know, Sir Gervaise, where it may
suit the pleasure of his superiors to order him.
That distinction of superior and inferior, Bluewater, will
one day lead you into a confounded scrape, I fear. If you
consider Charles Stuart your sovereign, it is not probable
that orders issued by a servant of King George will be much
respected. I hope you will do nothing hastily, or without
consulting your oldest and truest friend!
You know my sentiments, and there is little use in
dwelling on them, now. So long as the quarrel was between
my own country and a foreign land, I have been content to
serve; but when my lawful prince, or his son and heir,
comes in this gallant and chivalrous manner, throwing
himself
,
as it might be, into the very arms of his subjects,
confiding
all to their loyalty and spirit; it makes such an appeal
to every nobler feeling, that the heart finds it difficult to
repulse
.
I could have joined Norris, with right good will, in
dispersing and destroying the armament that Louis XV. was
sending against us, in this very cause; but here every thing
is English, and Englishmen have the quarrel entirely to
themselves. I do not see how, as a loyal subject of my
hereditary prince, I can well refrain from joining his
standard
.
And would
you
, Dick Bluewater, who, to my certain
knowledge, were sent on board ship at twelve years of age,
and who, for more than forty years, have been a
man-of-war's-man
,
body and soul; would you now strip your old
hulk of the sea-blue that has so long covered and become it,
rig yourself out like a soldier, with a feather in your hat,
ay, de, and a camp-kettle on your arm, and follow a
drummer, like one of your kinsmen, Lord Bluewater's
fellows
of the guards?for of sailors, your lawful prince, as
you call him, hasn't enough to stopper his conscience, or to
whip the tail of his coat, to keep it from being torn to
tatters
by the heather of Scotland. If you
do
follow the
adventurer
,
it must be in some such character, since I question
if he can muster a seaman, to tell him the bearings of
London
from Perth.
When I join him, he will be better off.
And what could even
you
do alone, among a parcel of
Scotchmen, running about their hills under bare poles? Your
signals will not manuvre regiments, and as for manuvring
in any other manner, you know nothing. Nono; stay
where you are, and help an old friend with knowledge that
is useful to him.I should be afraid to do a dashing thing,
unless I felt the certainty of having you in my van, to strike
the first blow; or in my rear, to bring me off, handsomely.
You would be afraid of nothing, Gervaise Oakes,
9 *
whether I stood at your elbow, or were off in Scotland.
Fear is not your failing, though temerity may be.
Then I want your presence to keep me within the bounds
of reason, said Sir Gervaise, stopping short in his walk,
and looking his friend smilingly in the face. In some
mode, or other, I always need your aid.
I understand the meaning of your words, Sir Gervaise,
and appreciate the feeling that dictates them. You must
have a perfect conviction that I will do nothing hastily, and
that I will betray no trust. When I turn my back on King
George, it will be loyally, in one sense, whatever he may
think of it in another; and when I join Prince Charles
Edward
,
it will be with a conscience that he need not be
ashamed to probe. What names he bears! They are the
designations of ancient English sovereigns, and ought of
themselves, to awaken the sensibilities of Englishmen.
Ay, Charles in particular, returned the vice-admiral,
with something like a sneer. There's the second Charles,
for instanceSt. Charles, as our good host, Sir Wycherly,
might call him  he is a pattern prince for Englishmen to
admire. Then his father was of the school of the
Star-Chamber
martyrs!
Both were lineal descendants of the Conqueror, and of
the Saxon princes; and both united the double titles to the
throne, in their sacred persons. I have always considered
Charles II. as the victim of the rebellious conduct of his
subjects, rather than vicious. He was driven abroad into a
most corrupt state of society, and was perverted by our
wickedness. As to the father, he was the real St. Charles,
and a martyred saint he was; dying for true religion, as
well as for his legal rights. Then the Edwardsglorious
fellows!  remember that they were all but one
Plantagenets
;
a name, of itself, to rouse an Englishman's fire!
And yet the only difference between the right of these
very Plantagenets to the throne, and that of the reigning
prince, is, that one produced a revolution by the strong hand,
and the other was produced by a revolution that came from
the nation. I do not know that your Plantagenets ever did
any thing for a navy; the only real source of England's
power and glory. De, Dick, if I think so much of
your Plantagenets, after all!
And yet the name of Oakes is to be met with among
their bravest knights, and most faithful followers.
The Oakes, like the pines, have been timbers in every
ship that has floated, returned the vice-admiral,
half-unconscious
himself, of the pun he was making.
For more than a minute Sir Gervaise continued his walk,
his head a little inclined forward, like a man who pondered
deeply on some matter of interest. Then, suddenly
stopping
,
he turned towards his friend, whom he regarded for
near another minute, ere he resumed the discourse.
I wish I could fairly get you to exercise your excellent
reason on this matter, Dick, he said, after the pause; then
I should be certain of having secured you on the side of
liberty.
Admiral Bluewater merely shook his head, but he continued
silent, as if he deemed discussion altogether
supererogatory
.
During this pause, a gentle tap at the door announced
a visiter; and, at the request to enter, Atwood made his
appearance
.
He held in his hand a large package, which
bore on the envelope the usual stamp that indicated it was
sent on public service.
I beg pardon, Sir Gervaise, commenced the secretary,
who always proceeded at once to business, when business
was to be done; but His Majesty's service will not admit
of delay. This packet has just come to hand, by the arrival
of an express, which left the admiralty only yesterday noon.
And how the devil did he know where to find me!
exclaimed
the vice-admiral, holding out a hand to receive the
communication.
It is all owing to this young lieutenant's forethought in
following up the Jacobite intelligence to a market-town.
The courier was bound to Falmouth, as fast as post-horses
could carry him, when he heard, luckily, that the fleet lay
at anchor, under Wychecombe Head; and, quite as luckily,
he is an officer who had the intelligence to know that you
would sooner get the despatches, if he turned aside, and
came hither by land, than if he went on to Falmouth, got
aboard the sloop that was to sail with him, for the Bay of
Biscay, and came round here by water.
Sir Gervaise smiled at this sally, which was one in
keeping
with all Atwood's feelings; for the secretary had
matured
a system of expresses, which, to his great mortification,
his patron laughed at, and the admiralty entirely overlooked.
No time was lost, however, in the way of business; the
secretary having placed the candles on a table, where Sir
Gervaise took a chair, and had already broken a seal. The
process of reading, nevertheless, was suddenly interrupted
by the vice-admiral's looking up, and exclaiming
Why, you are not about to leave us, Bluewater?
You may have private business with Mr. Atwood, Sir
Gervaise, and perhaps I had better retire.
Now, it so happened, that while Sir Gervaise Oakes had
never, by look or syllable, as he confidently believed,
betrayed
the secret of his friend's Jacobite propensities,
Atwood was perfectly aware of their existence. Nor had
the latter obtained his knowledge by any unworthy means.
He had been neither an eavesdropper, nor an inquirer into
private communications, as so often happens around the
persons
of men in high trusts; all his knowledge having been
obtained through native sagacity and unavoidable
opportunities
.
On the present occasion, the secretary, with the tact
of a man of experience, felt that his presence might be
dispensed
with; and he cut short the discussion between the
two admirals, by a very timely remark of his own.
I have left the letters uncopied, Sir Gervaise, he said,
and will go and finish them. A message by Locker
this was Sir Gervaise's body-servantwill bring me back
at a moment's notice, should you need me again to-night.
That Atwood has a surprising instinct, for a
Scotchman
!
exclaimed the vice-admiral, as soon as the door was
closed on the secretary. He not only knows when he
is
wanted, but when he is
not
wanted. The last is an
extraordinary
attainment, for one of his nation.
And one that an Englishman may do well to emulate,
returned Bluewater. It is possible my company may be
dispensed with, also, just at this important moment.
You are not so much afraid of the Hanoverians, Dick,
as to run away from their hand-writing, are ye! Ha
what's this?As I live, a packet for yourself, and directed
to `Rear-Admiral Sir Richard Bluewater, K. B.' By the
Lord, my old boy, they 've given you the red riband at
last! This is an honour well earned, and which may be
fitly worn.
'Tis rather unexpected, I must own. The letter,
however
,
cannot be addressed to me, as I am not a knight of
the Bath.
This is rank nonsense. Open the packet, at once, or I
will do it for you. Are there two Dick Bluewaters in the
world, or another rear-admiral of the same name?
I would rather not receive a letter that does not strictly
bear my address, returned the other, coldly.
As I 'll be sworn this does. But hand it to me, since
you are so scrupulous, and I will do that small service for
you.
As this was said, Sir Gervaise tore aside the seals; and,
as he proceeded rather summarily, a red riband was soon
uncased and fell upon the carpet. The other usual insignia
of the Bath made their appearance, and a letter was found
among them, to explain the meaning of all. Every thing
was in due form, and went to acquaint Rear-Admiral
Bluewater
,
that His Majesty had been graciously pleased to
confer
on him one of the vacant red ribands of the day, as a
reward for his eminent services on different occasions.
There was even a short communication from the premier,
expressing the great satisfaction of the ministry in thus being
able to second the royal pleasure, with hearty good will.
Well, what do you think of that, Richard Bluewater?
asked Sir Gervaise, triumphantly. Did I not always tell
you, that sooner or later, it
must
come.
It has come too late, then, coldly returned the other,
laying the riband, jewels, and letters quietly on the table.
This is an honour, I can receive,
now
, only from my
rightful prince. None other can legally create a knight of
the Bath.
And pray, Mr. Richard Bluewater, who made you a
captain, a commander, a rear-admiral? Do you believe me
an impostor, because I wear this riband on authority no
better than that of the house of Hanover? Am I, or am I
not, in your judgment, a vice-admiral of the red?
I make a great distinction, Oakes, between rank in the
navy, and a mere personal dignity. In the one case, you
serve your country, and give quite as much as you receive;
whereas, in the other, it is a grace to confer consideration
on the person honoured, without such an equivalent as can
find an apology for accepting a rank illegally conferred.
The devil take your distinctions, which would unsettle
every thing, and render the service a Babel. If I am a
vice-admiral of the red, I am a knight of the Bath; and, if
you are a rear-admiral of the white, you are also a knight
of that honourable order. All comes from the same source
of authority, and the same fountain of honour.
I do not view it thus. Our commissions are from the
admiralty, which represents the country; but dignities come
from the prince who happens to reign, let
his
title be what
it may.
Do you happen to think Richard III. a usurper, or a
lawful prince?
A usurper, out of all question; and a murderer to boot.
His name should be struck from the list of English kings.
I never hear it, without execrating him, and his deeds.
Poohpooh, Dick, this is talking more like a poet, than
a seaman. If only one-half the sovereigns who deserve to
be execrated had their names erased, the list of even our
English kings would be rather short; and some countries
would be without historical kings at all. However much
Richard III. may deserve cashiering in this summary
manner
,
his peers and laws are just as good as any other
prince's peers and laws. Witness the Duke of Norfolk, for
instance.
Ay, that cannot be helped by me; but it
is
in my power
to prevent Richard Bluewater's being made a knight of the
Bath, by George II.; and the power shall be used.
It would seem not, as he is already created; and I dare
to say, gazetted.
The oaths are not yet taken, and it is, at least, an
Englishman's
birth-right, to decline an honour; if, indeed, this
can be esteemed an honour, at all.
Upon my word, Rear-Admiral Sir Richard Bluewater,
you are disposed to be complimentary, to-night! The
unworthy
knight present, and all the rest of the order, are
infinitely indebted to you!
Your case and mine, Oakes, are essentially different,
returned the other, with some emotion in his voice and
manner
.
Your riband was fairly won, fighting the battles
of England, and can be worn with credit to yourself and to
your country; but these baubles are sent to me, at a
moment
when a rising was foreseen, and as a sop to keep me
in good-humour, as well as to propitiate the whole
Bluewater
interest.
That is pure conjecture, and I dare say will prove to be
altogether a mistake. Here are the despatches to speak for
themselves; and, as it is scarcely possible that the ministry
should have known of this rash movement of the Pretender's
son, more than a few days, my life on it, the dates will show
that your riband was bestowed before the enterprise was
even suspected.
As Sir Gervaise commenced, with his constitutional ardour,
to turn over the letters, as soon as his mind was directed to
this particular object, Admiral Bluewater resumed his seat,
awaiting the result, with not a little curiosity; though, at
the same time, with a smile of incredulity. The
examination
disappointed Sir Gervaise Oakes. The dates proved
that the ministers were better informed than he had
supposed
;
for it appeared they had been apprised about the
time he was himself of the intended movement. His orders
were to bring the fleet north, and in substance to do the very
thing his own sagacity had dictated. So far every thing
was well; and he could not entertain a doubt about
receiving
the hearty approbation of his superiors, for the course
he had taken. But here his gratification ended; for, on
looking at the dates of the different communications, it was
evident that the red riband was bestowed after the
intelligence
of the Pretender's movement had reached London. A
private letter, from a friend at the Board of Admiralty, too,
spoke of his own probable promotion to the rank of admiral
of the blue; and mentioned several other similar
preferments
,
in a way to show that the government was
fortifying
itself, in the present crisis, as much as possible, by
favours. This was a politic mode of procedure, with
ordinary
men, it is true; but with officers of the elevation of
mind, and of the independence of character of our two
admirals
,
it was most likely to produce disgust.
Dn 'em, Dick, cried Sir Gervaise, as he threw
down the last letter of the package, with no little sign of
feeling; you might take St. Paul, or even Wychecombe's
dead brother, St. James the less, and put him at court, and
he would come out a thorough blackguard, in a week!
That is not the common opinion concerning a court
education, quietly replied the friend; most people
fancying
that the place gives refinement of manners, if not of
sentiment.
Pohpohyou and I have no need of a dictionary to
understand each other. I call a man who never trusts to a
generous motivewho thinks it always necessary to bribe
or cajolewho has no idea of anything's being done
without
its direct
quid pro quo
, a scurvy blackguard, though he
has the airs and graces of Phil. Stanhope, or Chesterfield,
as he is now. What do you think them chaps at the Board,
talk of doing, by way of clinching my loyalty, at this blessed
juncture?
No doubt to get you raised to the peerage. I see
nothing
so much out of the way in the thing. You are of one
of the oldest families of England, are the sixth baronet by
inheritance, and have a noble landed estate, which is none
the worse for prize-money. Sir Gervaise Oakes of
Bowldero
,
would make a very suitable Lord Bowldero.
If it were only that, I shouldn't mind it; for nothing is
easier than to refuse a peerage. I've done
that
twice
already
,
and can do it a third time, at need. But one can't
very well refuse promotion in his regular profession; and,
here, just as a true gentleman would depend on the
principles
of an officer, the hackneyed consciences of your
courtiers
have suggested the expediency of making Gervaise
Oakes an admiral of the blue, by way of sop!  me, who
was made vice-admiral of the red, only six months since,
and who take an honest pride in boasting that every
commission
,
from the lowest to the highest, has been fairly
earned in battle!
They think it a more delicate service, perhaps, for a
gentleman to be true to the reigning house, when so loud an
appeal is made to his natural loyalty; and therefore class
the self-conquest with a victory at sea!
They are so many court-lubbers, and I should like to
have an opportunity of speaking my mind to them. I 'll
not take the new commission; for every one must see, Dick,
that it is a sop.
Ay, that 's just my notion, too, about the red riband;
and I 'll not take
that
. You have had the riband these ten
years, have declined the peerage twice, and their only
chance is the promotion. Take it you ought, and must,
however, as it will be the means of pushing on some four or
five poor devils, who have been wedged up to honours, in
this manner, ever since they were captains. I am glad they
do not talk of promoting
me
, for I should hardly know how
to refuse such a grace. There is great virtue in parchment,
with all us military men.
Still it must be parchment fairly won. I think you are
wrong, notwithstanding, Bluewater, in talking of refusing
the riband, which is so justly your due, for a dozen
different
acts. There is not a man in the service, who has
been less rewarded for what he has done, than yourself.
I am sorry to hear you give this as your opinion; for
just at this moment, I would rather think that I have no
cause of complaint, in this way, against the reigning family,
or its ministers. I 'm sure I was posted when quite a young
man, and since that time, no one has been lifted over my
head.
The vice-admiral looked intently at his friend; for never
before had he detected a feeling which betrayed, as he
fancied
,
so settled a determination in him to quit the service of
the powers that were. Acquainted from boyhood with all
the workings of the other's mind, he perceived that the
rear-admiral
had been endeavouring to persuade himself that no
selfish or unworthy motive could be assigned to an act
which he felt to proceed from disinterested chivalry, just as
he himself broke out with his expression of an opinion that
no officer had been less liberally rewarded for his
professional
services than his friend. While there is no greater
mystery to a selfish manager, than a man of disinterested
temperament, they who feel and submit to generous
impulses
,
understand each other with an instinctive facility.
When any particular individual is prone to believe that
there is a predominance of good over evil in the world he
inhabits, it is a sign of inexperience or of imbecility; but
when one acts and reasons as if
all
honour and virtue are
Vol. I.  10
extinct, he furnishes the best possible argument against his
own tendencies and character. It has often been remarked
that stronger friendships are made between those who have
different personal peculiarities, than between those whose
sameness of feeling and impulses would be less likely to
keep interest alive; but, in all cases of intimacies, there
must be great identity of principles, and even of tastes in
matters at all connected with motives, in order to ensure
respect, among those whose standard of opinion is higher
than common, or sympathy among those with whom it is
lower. Such was the fact, as respected Admirals Oakes
and Bluewater. No two men could be less alike in
temperament
,
or character, physically, and in some senses, morally
considered; but, when it came to principles, or all those
tastes or feelings that are allied to principles, there was a
strong native, as well as acquired affinity. This union of
sentiment was increased by common habits, and professional
careers so long and so closely united, as to be almost
identical
.
Nothing was easier, consequently, than for Sir
Gervaise
Oakes to comprehend the workings of Admiral
Bluewater's
mind, as the latter endeavoured to believe he had
been fairly treated by the existing government. Of course,
the reasoning which passed through the thoughts of Sir
Gervaise, on this occasion, required much less time than we
have taken to explain its nature; and, after regarding his
friend intently, as already related, for a few seconds, he
answered as follows; a good deal influenced, unwittingly to
himself, with the wish to check the other's Jacobite
propensities
.
I am sorry not to be able to agree with you, Dick, he
said, with some warmth. So far from thinking you
well
treated, by any ministry, these twenty years, I think you
have been very
ill
treated. Your rank you have, beyond
a question; for of that no brave officer can well be deprived
in a regulated service; but, have you had the
commands
to
which you are entitled?I was a commander-in-chief when
only a rear-admiral of the blue; and then how long did I
wear a broad pennant, before I got a flag, at all!
You forget how much I have been with you. When
two serve together, one must command, and the other must
obey. So far from complaining of these Hanoverian Boards,
and First Lords, it seems to me that they have always kept
in view the hollowness of their claims to the throne, and
have felt a desire to purchase honest men by their favours.
You are the strangest fellow, Dick Bluewater, it has
ever been my lot to fall in with! De me, if I believe
you know always, when you
are
ill treated. There are a
dozen men in service, who have had separate commands,
and who are not half as well entitled to them, as you are
yourself.
Come, come, Oakes, this is getting to be puerile, for two
old fellows, turned of fifty. You very well know that I
was offered just as good a fleet, as this of your own, with a
choice of the whole list of flag-officers below me, to pick a
junior from; and, so, we'll say no more about it. As
respects
their red riband, however, it may go a-begging for
me.
Sir Gervaise was about to answer in his former vein,
when a tap at the door announced the presence of another
visiter. This time the door opened on the person of
Galleygo
,
who had been included in Sir Wycherly's hospitable
plan of entertaining every soul who immediately belonged
to the suite of Sir Gervaise.
What the dl has brought
you
here! exclaimed the
vice-admiral, a little warmly; for he did not relish an
interruption
just at this moment. Recollect you 're not on
board the Plantagent, but in the dwelling of a gentleman,
where there are both butler and housekeeper, and who have
no occasion for your advice, or authority, to keep things in
order.
Well, there, Sir Gervaise I doesn't agree with you the
least bit; for I thinks as a ship's stewardI mean a
cabin
steward, and a good 'un of the quality  might do a great
deal of improvement in this very house. The cook and I
has had a partic'lar dialogue on them matters, already;
and I mentioned to her the names of seven different dishes,
every one of which she quite as good as admitted to me,
was just the same as so much gospel to
her
.
I shall have to quarantine this fellow, in the long run,
Bluewater! I do believe if I were to take him to Lambeth
Palace, or even to St. James's, he 'd thrust his oar into the
archbishop's benedictions, or the queen's caudle-cup!
Well, Sir Gervaise, where would be the great harm, if
I did? A man as knows the use of an oar, may be trusted
with one, even in a church, or an abbey. When your
honour comes to hear what the dishes was, as Sir
Wycherly's
cook had never heard on, you 'll think it as great a
cur'osity as I do myself. If I had just leave to name 'em
over, I think as both you gentlemen would look at it as
remarkable.
What are they, Galleygo? inquired Bluewater,
putting
one of his long legs over an arm of the adjoining chair,
in order to indulge himself in a yarn with his friend's
steward
,
with greater freedom; for he greatly delighted in
Galleygo's
peculiarities; seeing just enough of the fellow to
find amusement, without annoyance in them. I'll
answer
for Sir Gervaise, who is always a little diffident about
boasting of the superiority of a ship, over a house.
Yes, your honour, that he is  that is just one of Sir
Jarvy's weak p'ints, as a body might say. Now, I never
goes ashore, without trimming sharp up, and luffing athwart
every person's hawse, I fall in with; which is as much as
to tell 'em, I belongs to a flag-ship, and a racer, and a craft
as hasn't her equal on salt-water; no disparagement to the
bit of bunting at the mizzen-top-gallant-mast-head of the
Csar, or to the ship that carries it. I hopes, as we are
so well acquainted, Admiral Bluewater, no offence will be
taken.
Where none is meant, none ought to be taken, my
friend. Now let us hear your bill-of-fare.
Well, sir, the very first dish I mentioned to Mrs. Larder,
Sir Wycherly's cook, was lobscous; and, would you
believe
it, gentlemen, the poor woman had never heard of it!
I began with a light hand, as it might be, just not to
overwhelm
her with knowledge, at a blow, as Sir Jarvy
captivated
the French frigate with the upper tier of guns, that he
might take her alive, like.
And the lady knew nothing of a lobscous  neither of
its essence, nor nature?
There 's no essences as is ever put in a lobscous,
besides
potaties, Admiral Bluewater; thof we make 'em in the
old Planter
nautice
for Plantagenetin so liquorish a
fashion, you might well think they even had Jamaiky, in
'em. No, potaties is the essence of lobscous; and a very
good thing is a potatie, Sir Jarvy, when a ship's company
has been on salted oakum for a few months.
Well, what was the next dish the good woman broke
down under? asked the rear-admiral, fearful the master
might order the servant to quit the room; while he, himself,
was anxious to get rid of any further political discussion.
Well, sir, she knowed no more of a chowder, than if
the sea wern't in the neighbourhood, and there wern't such
a thing as a fish in all England. When I talked to her of
a chowder, she gave in, like a Spaniard at the fourth or fifth
broadside.
Such ignorance is disgraceful, and betokens a decline in
civilization! But, you hoisted out more knowledge for her
benefit, Galleygosmall doses of learning are poor things.
Yes, your honour; just like weak grogburning the
priming, without starting the shot. To be sure, I did,
Admiral
Blue. I just named to her burgoo, and then I
mentioned
duff (anglice dough) to her, but she denied that there
was any such things in the cookery-book. Do you know, Sir
Jarvy, as these here shore craft get their dinners, as our
master gets the sun; all out of a book, as it might be.
Awful tidings, too, gentlemen, about the Pretender's son;
and I s'pose we shall have to take the fleet up into Scotland,
as I fancy them 'ere sogers will not make much of a hand
in settling law?
And have you honoured us with a visit, just to give us
an essay on dishes, and to tell us what you intend to do
with the fleet? demanded Sir Gervaise, a little more sternly
than he was accustomed to speak to the steward.
Lord bless you, Sir Jarvy, I didn't dream of one or
t'other! As for telling you, or Admiral Blue, (so the
seamen
used to call the second in rank,) here, anything about
lobscous, or chowder, why, it would be carrying coals to
New Market. I 've fed ye both with all such articles, when
ye was nothing but young gentlemen; and when you was
no longer young gentlemen, too, but a couple of sprightly
luffs, of nineteen. And as for moving the fleet, I know,
well enough, that will never happen, without our talking it
over in the old Planter's cabin; which is a much more
10*
nat'ral place for such a discourse, than any house in
England
!
May I take the liberty of inquiring, then, what
did
bring
you here?
That you may, with all my heart, Sir Jarvy, for I likes
to answer your questions. My errand is not to your honour
this time, though you are my master. It's no great matter,
after all, being just to hand this bit of a letter over to
Admiral
Blue.
And where did this letter come from, and how did it
happen to fall into your hands? demanded Bluewater,
looking at the superscription, the writing of which he
appeared
to recognise.
It hails from Lun'nun, I hear; and they tell me it's to
be a great secret that you 've got it, at all. The history of
the matter is just this. An officer got in to-night, with
orders for us, carrying sail as hard as his shay would bear.
It seems he fell in with Master Atwood, as he made his
landfall
,
and being acquainted with that gentleman, he just
whipped out his orders, and sent 'em off to the right man.
Then he laid his course for the landing, wishing to get
aboard of the Dublin, to which he is ordered; but falling
in with our barge, as I landed, he wanted to know the
where-away
of Admiral Blue, here; believing him to be afloat.
Some 'un telling him as I was a friend and servant of both
admirals, as it might be, he turned himself over to me for
advice. So I promised to deliver the letter, as I had a
thousand
afore, and knowed the way of doing such things; and
he gives me the letter, under special orders, like; that is to
say, it was to be handed to the rear-admiral as it might be
under the lee of the mizzen-stay-sail, or in a private fashion.
Well, gentlemen, you both knows I understand that, too,
and so I undertook the job.
And I have got to be so insignificant a person that I
pass for no one, in your discriminating mind, Master
Galleygo
!
exclaimed the vice-admiral, sharply. I have
suspected
as much, these five-and-twenty years.
Lord bless you, Sir Jarvy, how flag-officers will make
mistakes sometimes! They 're mortal, I says to the people
of the galley, and have their appetites false, just like the
young gentlemen, when they get athwart-hawse of a body,
I says. Now, I count Admiral Blue and yourself pretty
much as one man, seeing that you keep few, or no secrets
from each other. I know'd ye both as young gentlemen,
and then you loved one another like twins; and then I
know'd ye as luffs, when ye 'd walk the deck the whole
watch, spinning yarns; and then I know'd ye as Pillardees
and Arrestee, though one pillow might have answered for
both; and as for Arrest, I never know'd either of ye to get
into that scrape. As for telling a secret to one, I've
always
looked upon it as pretty much telling it to t' other.
The two admirals exchanged glances, and the look of
kindness that each met in the eyes of his friend removed
every shadow that had been cast athwart their feelings, by
the previous discourse.
That will do, Galleygo, returned Sir Gervaise, mildly.
You're a good fellow in the main, though a villanously
rough one
A little of old Boreus, Sir Jarvy, interrupted the
steward
,
with a grim smile; but it blows harder at sea than
it does ashore. These chaps on land, ar'n't battened down,
and caulked for such weather, as we sons of Neptun' is
obligated
to face.
Quite true, and so good-night. Admiral Bluewater and
myself wish to confer together, for half an hour; all that it
is proper for you to know, shall be communicated another
time.
Good-night, and God bless your honour. Good-night,
Admiral Blue: we three is the men as can keep any secret
as ever floated, let it draw as much water as it pleases.
Sir Gervaise Oakes stopped in his walk, and gazed at his
friend with manifest interest, as he perceived that Admiral
Bluewater was running over his letter for the third time.
Being now without a witness, he did not hesitate to express
his apprehensions.
'T is as I feared, Dick! he cried. That letter is from
some prominent partisan of Edward Stuart?
The rear-admiral turned his eyes on the face of his friend,
with an expression that was difficult to read; and then he
ran over the contents of the epistle, for the fourth time.
A set of precious rascals they are, Gervaise! at length
the rear-admiral exclaimed. If the whole court was
culled, I question if enough honesty could be found to leaven
one puritan scoundrel. Tell me if you know this hand,
Oakes? I question if you ever saw it before.
The superscription of the letter was held out to Sir
Gervaise
,
who, after a close examination, declared himself
unacquainted with the writing.
I thought as much, resumed Bluewater, carefully
tearing
the signature from the bottom of the page, and burning
it in a candle; let this disgraceful part of the secret die,
at least. The fellow who wrote this, has put `confidential'
at the top of his miserable scrawl; and a most confident
scoundrel he is, for his pains. However, no man has a
right to thrust himself, in this rude manner, between me and
my oldest friend; and least of all will I consent to keep this
piece of treachery from your knowledge. I do more than
the rascal merits in concealing his name; nevertheless, I
shall not deny myself the pleasure of sending him such an
answer as he deserves. Read that, Oakes, and then say if
keelhauling would be too good for the writer.
Sir Gervaise took the letter in silence, though not without
great surprise, and began to peruse it. As he proceeded,
the colour mounted to his temples, and once he dropped his
hand, to cast a look of wonder and indignation towards his
companion. That the reader may see how much occasion
there was for both these feelings, we shall give the
communication
entire. It was couched in the following words:
Dear Admiral Bluewater:
Our ancient friendship, and I am proud to add, affinity
of blood, unite in inducing me to write a line, at this
interesting
moment. Of the result of this rash experiment of the
Pretender's son, no prudent man can entertain a doubt.
Still, the boy may give us some trouble, before he is
disposed
of, altogether. We look to all our friends, therefore,
for their most efficient exertions, and most prudent
co-operation
.
On
you
, every reliance is placed; and I wish I could
say as much for
every flag-officer afloat
. Some distrust
unmerited, I sincerely hopeexists in a very high quarter,
touching the loyalty of a certain commander-in-chief, who
is so completely under your observation, that it is felt
enough is done in hinting the fact to one of your political
tendencies. The king said, this morning, `Vell, dere isht
Bluevater; of
him
we are shure asht of ter sun.' You stand
excellently well
there
, to my great delight; and I need only
say, be watchful and prompt.
Yours, with the most sincere faith and attachment, my
dear Bluewater, &c., &c.  .
Rear-Admiral Bluewater
.
P. S.I have just heard that they have sent you the red
riband. The king himself, was in this.
When Sir Gervaise had perused this precious epistle to
himself, he read it slowly, and in a steady, clear voice,
aloud. When he had ended, he dropped the paper, and
stood gazing at his friend.
One would think the fellow some exquisite satirist,
said Bluewater, laughing.
I
am to be vigilant, and see
that
you
do not mutiny, and run away with the fleet to the
Highlands, one of these foggy mornings! Carry it up into
Scotland, as Galleygo has it! Now, what is your opinion
of that letter?
That all courtiers are knaves, and all princes
ungrateful
.
I should think my loyalty to the good
cause
, if not to
the
man
, the last in England to be suspected.
Nor is it suspected, in the smallest degree. My life on
it, neither the reigning monarch, nor his confidential
servants
,
are such arrant dunces, as to be guilty of so much
weakness. No, this masterly move is intended to secure
me
, by creating a confidence that they think no
generous-minded
man would betray. It is a hook, delicately baited
to catch a gudgeon, and not an order to watch a whale.
Can the scoundrels be so meannay, dare they be so
bold! They must have known you would show me the
letter.
Not theythey have reasoned on my course, as they
would on their own. Nothing catches a weak man sooner
than a pretended confidence of this nature; and I dare say
this blackguard rates me just high enough to fancy I may
be duped in this flimsy manner. Put your mind at rest;
King George knows he may confide in
you
, while I think it
probable
I
am distrusted.
I hope, Dick, you do not suspect
my
discretion! My
own secret would not be half so sacred with me.
I know that, full well. Of
you
, I entertain no distrust,
either in heart or head; of myself, I am not quite so
certain
.
When we
feel
, we do not always
reason;
and there
is as much feeling, as anything else, in this matter.
Not a line is there, in all my despatches, that go to
betray
the slightest distrust of me, or any one else. You are
spoken of, but it is in a manner to gratify you, rather than
to alarm. Take, and read them all; I intended to show
them to you, as soon as we had got through with that cursed
discussion.
As Sir Gervaise concluded, he threw the whole package
of letters on the table, before his friend.
It will be time enough, when you summon me regularly
to a council of war, returned Bluewater, laying the letters
gently aside. Perhaps we had better sleep on this affair;
in the morning we shall meet with cooler heads, and just as
warm hearts.
Good-night, Dick, said Sir Gervaise, holding out both
hands for the other to shake as he passed him, in quitting
the room.
Good-night, Gervaise; let this miserable devil go
over-board
,
and think no more of him. I have half a mind to
ask you for a leave, to-morrow, just to run up to London,
and cut off his ears.
Sir Gervaise laughed and nodded his head, and the two
friends parted, with feelings as kind as ever had distinguished
their remarkable career.
CHAPTER VIII.
Look to't, think on't, I do not use to jest.
Thursday is near; lay hand on heart, advise;
An' you be mine, I'll give you to my friend;
An' you be not, hang, beg, starve, die i' the streets.
Romeo and Juliet
.
Wychecombe Hall
had most of the peculiarities of a
bachelor's dwelling, in its internal government; nor was it,
in any manner, behind, or, it might be better to say, before,
the age, in its modes and customs connected with
jollifications
.
When its master relaxed a little, the servants quite
uniformly imitated his example. Sir Wycherly kept a
plentiful table, and the servants' hall fared nearly as well as
the dining-room; the single article of wine excepted. In
lieu of the latter, however, was an unlimited allowance of
double-brewed ale; and the difference in the potations was
far more in the name than in the quality of the beverages.
The master drank port; for, in the middle of the last
century
,
few Englishmen had better wineand port, too, that
was by no means of a very remarkable delicacy, but which,
like those who used it, was rough, honest, and strong;
while the servant had his malt liquor of the very highest
stamp and flavour. Between indifferent wine and excellent
ale, the distance is not interminable; and Sir Wycherly's
household was well aware of the fact, having frequently
instituted
intelligent practical comparisons, by means of which,
all but the butler and Mrs. Larder had come to the
conclusion
to stand by the home-brewed.
On the present occasion, not a soul in the house was
ignorant of the reason why the baronet was making a night
of it. Every man, woman, and child, in or about the Hall,
was a devoted partisan of the house of Hanover; and as soon
as it was understood that this feeling was to be manifested by
drinking success to King George, and God bless him, on
the one side; and confusion to the Pretender, and his mad
son, on the other; all under the roof entered into the duty,
with a zeal that might have seated a usurper on a throne,
if potations could do it.
When Admiral Bluewater, therefore, left the chamber of
his friend, the signs of mirth and of a regular debauch were
so very obvious, that a little curiosity to watch the result,
and a disinclination to go off to his ship so soon, united to
induce him to descend into the rooms below, with a view to
get a more accurate knowledge of the condition of the
household
.
In crossing the great hall, to enter the drawing-room,
he encountered Galleygo, when the following discourse took
place.
I should think the master-at-arms has not done his duty,
and dowsed the glim below, Master Steward, said the
rear-admiral
,
in his quiet way, as they met; the laughing, and
singing, and hiccupping, are all upon a very liberal scale
for a respectable country-house.
Galleygo touched the lock of hair on his forehead, with
one hand, and gave his trowsers a slue with the other, before
he answered; which he soon did, however, though with a
voice a little thicker than was usual with him, on account
of his having added a draught or two to those he had taken
previously to visiting Sir Gervaise's dressing-room; and
which said additional draught or two, had produced some
such effect on his system, as the fresh drop produces on the
cup that is already full.
That's just it, Admiral Blue, returned the steward, in
passing good-humour, though still sober enough to maintain
the decencies, after his own fashion; that's just it, your
honour. They 've passed the word below to let the lights
stand for further orders, and have turned the hands up for a
frolic. Such ale as they has, stowed in the lower hold of
this house, like leaguers in the ground-tier, it does a body's
heart good to conter'plate. All hands is bowsing up their
jibs on it, sir, and the old Hall will soon be carrying as
much sail as she can stagger under. It's nothing but
loose-away
and sheet-home.
Ay, ay, Galleygo, this may be well enough for the
people of the household, if Sir Wycherly allows it; but it
ill becomes the servants of guests to fall into this disorder.
If I find Tom has done anything amiss, he will hear more
of it; and as your own master is not here to admonish
you
,
I 'll just take the liberty of doing it for him, since I know it
would mortify him exceedingly to learn that his steward
had done anything to disgrace himself.
Lord bless your dear soul, Admiral Blue, take just as
many liberties as you think fit, and I 'll never pocket one
on 'em. I know'd you, when you was only a young
gentleman
,
and now you 're a rear. You 're close on our heels;
and by the time we are a full admiral, you 'll be something
like a vice. I looks upon you as bone of our bone, and
flesh of our flesh,Pillardees and Arresteesand I no more
minds a setting-down from your honour, than I does from
Sir Jarvy, hisself.
I believe that is true enough, Galleygo; but take my
advice, and knock off with the ale for to-night. Can you
tell me how the land lies, with the rest of the company?
You couldn't have asked a better person, your honour,
as I 've just been passing through all the rooms, from a sort
of habit I has, sir; for, d'ye see, I thought I was in the old
Planter, and that it was my duty to overlook everything, as
usual. The last pull at the ale, put that notion in my head;
but it 's gone now, and I see how matters is. Yes sir, the
mainmast of a church isn't stiffer and more correct-like,
than my judgment is, at this blessed moment. Sir
Wycherly
guv' me a glass of his black-strap, as I ran through
the dining-room, and told me to drink `Confusion to the
Pretender,' which I did, with hearty good-will; but his
liquor will no more lay alongside of the ale they 've down
on the orlop, than a Frenchman will compare with an
Englishman
.
What 's your opinion, Admiral Blue, consarning
this cruise of the Pretender's son, up in the Highlands of
Scotland?
Bluewater gave a quick, distrustful glance at the steward,
for he knew that the fellow was half his time in the outer
cabin and pantries of the Plantagenet, and he could not tell
how much of his many private dialogues with Sir Gervaise,
might have been overheard. Meeting with nothing but the
unmeaning expression of one half-seas-over, his uneasiness
instantly subsided.
I think it a gallant enterprise, Galleygo, he answered;
too manly even to feign what he did not believe; but I
fear, as a
cruise
, it will not bring much prize-money. You
Vol. I.  11
have forgotten you were about to tell me how the land lies.
Sir Wycherly, Mr. Dutton, Mr. Rotherham, are still at the
table, I fancyare these all? What have become of the
two young gentlemen?
There 's none ashore, sir, said Galleygo, promptly;
accustomed to give that appellation only to midshipmen.
I mean the two Mr. Wychecombes; one of whom, I
had forgot, is actually an officer.
Yes sir, and a most partic'lar fine officer he is, as every
body says. Well, sir,
he
's with the ladies; while his
namesake has gone back to the table, and has put luff upon
luff, to fetch up leeway.
And the ladieswhat have they done with themselves,
in this scene of noisy revelry?
They 'se in yonder state-room, your honour. As soon
as they found how the ship was heading, like all
women-craft
,
they both makes for the best harbour they could run
into. Yes, they 'se yonder.
As Galleygo pointed to the door of the room he meant,
Bluewater proceeded towards it, parting with the steward
after a few more words of customary, but very useless
caution
.
The tap of the admiral was answered by Wycherly
in person, who opened the door, and made way for his
superior
to enter, with a respectful obeisance. There was but
a single candle in the little parlour, in which the two females
had taken refuge from the increasing noise of the debauch;
and this was due to a pious expedient of Mildred's, in
extinguishing
the others, with a view to conceal the traces of
tears that were still visible on her own and her mother's
cheeks. The rear-admiral was, at first, struck with this
comparative obscurity; but it soon appeared to him
appropriate
to the feelings of the party assembled in the room.
Mrs. Dutton received him with the ease she had acquired in
her early life, and the meeting passed as a matter of course,
with persons temporarily residing under the same roof.
Our friends appear to be enjoying themselves, said
Bluewater, when a shout from the dining-room forced itself
on the ears of all present. The loyalty of Sir Wycherly
seems to be of proof.
Oh! Admiral Bluewater, exclaimed the distressed wife,
feeling, momentarily, getting the better of discretion;
do
you
can
you call such a desecration of God's image,
enjoyment
?
Not justly, perhaps, Mrs. Dutton; and yet it is what
millions mistake for it. This mode of celebrating any great
event, and even of illustrating what we think our principles,
is, I fear, a vice not only of our age, but of our country.
And yet, neither you, nor Sir Gervaise Oakes, I see,
find it necessary to give such a proof of your attachment to
the house of Hanover, or of your readiness to serve it with
your time and persons.
You will remember, my good lady, that both Oakes and
myself are flag-officers in command, and it would never do
for us to fall into a debauch in sight of our own ships. I
am glad to see, however, that Mr. Wychecombe, here,
prefers
such society as I find him in, to the pleasures of the
table.
Wycherly bowed, and Mildred cast an expressive, not to
say grateful, glance towards the speaker; but her mother
pursued the discourse, in which she found a little relief to
her suppressed emotion.
God be thanked for that! she exclaimed,
half-unconscious
of the interpretation that might be put on her words;
All that we have seen of Mr. Wychecombe would lead us
to believe that this is not an unusual, or an accidental
forbearance
.
So much the more fortunate for him. I congratulate
you, young sir, on this triumph of principle, or of
temperament
,
or of both. We belong to a profession, in which the
bottle is an enemy more to be feared, than any that the king
can give us. A sailor can call in no ally as efficient in
subduing this mortal foe, as an intelligent and cultivated
mind. The man who really
thinks
much, seldom
drinks
much; but there are hoursnay weeks and months of
idleness
in a ship, in which the temptation to resort to unnatural
excitement in quest of pleasure, is too strong for minds, that
are not well fortified, to resist. This is particularly the
case with commanders, who find themselves isolated by
their rank, and oppressed with responsibility, in the privacy
of their own cabins, and get to make a companion of the
bottle, by way of seeking relief from uncomfortable thoughts,
and of creating a society of their own. I deem the critical
period of a sailor's life, to be the first few years of solitary
command.
How true!how true! murmured Mrs. Dutton. Oh!
that cutterthat cruel cutter!
The truth flashed upon the recollection of Bluewater, at
this unguarded, and instantly-regretted exclamation. Many
years before, when only a captain himself, he had been a
member of a court-martial which cashiered a lieutenant
of the name of Dutton, for grievous misconduct, while in
command of a cutter; the fruits of the bottle. From the
first, he thought the name familiar to him; but so many
similar things had happened in the course of forty years'
service, that this particular incident had been partially lost
in the obscurity of time. It was now completely recalled,
however; and that, too, with all its attendant circumstances.
The recollection served to give the rear-admiral renewed
interest in the unhappy wife, and lovely daughter, of the
miserable delinquent. He had been applied to, at the time,
for his interest in effecting the restoration of the guilty officer,
or even to procure for him, the hopeless station he now
actually occupied; but he had sternly refused to be a party
in placing any man in authority, who was the victim of a
propensity that not only disgraced himself, but which, in
the peculiar position of a sailor, equally jeoparded the
honour of the country, and risked the lives of all around
him. He was aware that the last application had been
successful
,
by means of a court influence it was very unusual
to exert in cases so insignificant; and, then, he had, for years,
lost sight of the criminal and his fortunes. This unexpected
revival of his old impressions, caused him to feel like an
ancient friend of the wife and daughter; for well could he
recall a scene he had with both, in which the struggle
between
his humanity and his principles had been so violent
as actually to reduce him to tears. Mildred had forgotten
the name of this particular officer, having been merely a
child; but well did Mrs. Dutton remember it, and with fear
and trembling had she come that day, to meet him at the
Hall. The first look satisfied her that she was forgotten,
and she had struggled herself, to bury in oblivion, a scene
which was one of the most painful of her life. The
unguarded
expression, mentioned, entirely changed the state
of affairs.
Mrs. Dutton, said Bluewater, kindly taking a hand of
the distressed wife; I believe we are old friends; if, after
what has passed, you will allow me so to consider myself.
Ah! Admiral Bluewater, my memory needed no
admonisher
to tell me
that
. Your sympathy and kindness
are as grateful to me, now, as they were in that dreadful
moment, when we met before.
And I had the pleasure of seeing this young lady, more
than once, on that unpleasant occasion. This accounts for
a fancy that has fairly haunted me throughout the day; for,
from the instant my eye fell on Miss Mildred, it struck me
that the face, and most of all, its expression, was familiar to
me. Certainly it is not a countenance, once seen, easily to
be forgotten.
Mildred was then but a child, sir, and your recollection
must have been a fancy, indeed, as children of her age
seldom
make any lasting impression on the mind, particularly
in the way of features.
It is not the features that I recognize, but the
expression
;
and that, I need not tell the young lady's mother, is
an expression not so very easily forgotten. I dare say Mr.
Wychecombe is ready enough to vouch for the truth of what
I say.
Hark! exclaimed Mrs. Dutton, who was sensitively
alive to any indication of the progress of the debauch.
There is great confusion in the dining-room!I hope the
gentlemen are of one mind as respects this rising in
Scotland
!
If there is a Jacobite among them, he will have a warm
time of it; with Sir Wycherly, his nephew, and the vicar
all three of whom are raging lions, in the way of loyalty.
There does, indeed, seem something out of the way, for
those sounds, I should think, are the feet of servants,
running
to and fro. If the servants'-hall is in the condition I
suspect, it will as much need the aid of the parlour, as the
parlour can possibly
A tap at the door caused Bluewater to cease speaking;
and as Wycherly threw open the entrance, Galleygo
appeared
11 *
on the threshold, by this time reduced to the necessity
of holding on by the casings.
Well, sir, said the rear-admiral, sternly, for he was no
longer disposed lo trifle with any of the crapulous set;
well, sir, what impertinence has now brought you here?
No impertinence at all, your honour; we carries none
of
that
, in the old Planter. There being no young
gentlemen
,
hereabouts, to report proceedings, I thought I 'd just
step in and do the duty with my own tongue. We has so
many reports in our cabin, that there isn't an officer in the
fleet that can make 'em better, as myself, sir.
There are a hundred who would spend fewer words on
anything. What is your business?
Why, sir, just to report one flag struck, and a
commander-in-chief
on his beam-ends.
Good God! Nothing has happened to Sir Gervaise
speak, fellow, or I 'll have you sent out of this Babel, and
off to the ship, though it were midnight.
It be pretty much that, Admiral Blue; or past six bells;
as any one may see by the ship's clock on the great
companion
ladder; six bells, going well on to seven
Your business, sir! what has happened to Sir
Gervaise
?
repeated Bluewater, shaking his long fore-finger
menacingly, at the steward.
We are as well, Admiral Blue, as the hour we came
over the Planter's side. Sir Jarvy will carry sail with the
best on 'em, I 'll answer for it, whether the ship floats in old
Port Oporto, or in a brewer's vat. Let Sir Jarvy alone for
them trickshe wasn't a young gentleman, for nothing.
Have a moment's patience, sir, put in Wycherly, and
I will go myself, and ascertain the truth.
I shall make but another inquiry, continued Admiral
Bluewater, as Wycherly left the room.
Why, d'ye see, your honour, old Sir Wycherly, who
is commander-in-chief, along shore here, has capsized in
consequence of carrying sail too hard, in company with
younger craft; and they 're now warping him into dock to
be overhauled.
Is this all!that was a result to be expected, in such a
debauch. You need not have put on so ominous a face, for
this, Galleygo.
No, sir, so I thought, myself; and I only tried to look
as melancholy as a young gentleman who is sent below to
report a top-gallant-mast over the side, or a
studding-sailboom
gone in the iron. D'ye remember the time, Admiral
Blue, when you thought to luff up on the old Planter's
weather-quarter, and get between her and the French ninety
on three decks, and how your stu'n-sails went, one a'ter
another, just like so many musherrooms breaking in
peeling
?
Galleygo, who was apt to draw his images from his two
trades, might have talked on an hour, without interruption;
for, while he was uttering the above sentence, Wycherly
returned, and reported that their host was seriously, even
dangerously ill. While doing the honours of his table, he
had been seized with a fit, which the vicar, a noted
three-bottle
man, feared was apoplexy. Mr. Rotherham had bled
the patient, who was already a little better, and an express
had been sent for a medical man. As a matter of course,
the
convives
had left the table, and alarm was frightening
the servants into sobriety. At Mrs. Dutton's earnest
request
,
Wycherly immediately left the room again, forcing
Galleygo out before him, with a view to get more accurate
information concerning the baronet's real situation; both the
mother and daughter feeling a real affection for Sir
Wycherly
;
the kind old man having won their hearts by his
habitual benevolence, and a constant concern for their
welfare.
Sic transit gloria mundi
, muttered Admiral Bluewater,
as he threw his tall person, in his own careless manner, on
a chair, in a dark corner of the room. This baronet has
fallen from his throne, in a moment of seeming prosperity
and revelry; why may not another do the same?
Mrs. Dutton heard the voice, without distinguishing the
words, and she felt distressed at the idea that one whom she
so much respected and loved, might be judged of harshly,
by a man of the rear-admiral's character.
Sir Wycherly is one of the kindest-hearted men,
breathing
,
she said, a little hurriedly; and there is not a better
landlord in England. Then he is by no means addicted to
indulgence at table, more than is customary with gentlemen
of his station. His loyalty has, no doubt, carried him this
evening farther than was prudent, or than we could have
wished.
I have every disposition to think favourably of our poor
host, my dear Mrs. Dutton, and we seamen are not
accustomed
to judge a
bon vivant
too harshly.
Ah! Admiral Bluewater,
you
, who have so wide-spread
a reputation for sobriety and correct deportment! Well do
I remember how I trembled, when I heard your name
mentioned
as one of the leading members of that dreadful
court!
You let your recollections dwell too much on these
unpleasant
subjects, Mrs. Dutton, and I should like to see you
setting an example of greater cheerfulness to your sweet
daughter. I could not befriend you,
then
, for my oath and
my duty were both against it; but,
now
, there exists no
possible reason, why I should not; while there does exist
almost every possible disposition, why I should. This sweet
child interests me in a way I can hardly describe.
Mrs. Dutton was silent and thoughtful. The years of
Admiral Bluewater did not absolutely forbid his regarding
Mildred's extreme beauty, with the eyes of ordinary
admiration
;
but his language, and most of all, his character,
ought to repel the intrusive suspicion. Still Mildred was
surpassingly lovely, and men were surpassingly weak in
matters of love. Many a hero had passed a youth of
self-command
and discretion, to consummate some act of
exceeding
folly, of this very nature, in the decline of life; and
bitter experience had taught her to be distrustful.
Nevertheless
,
she could not, at once, bring herself to think ill of
one, whose character she had so long respected; and, with
all the rear-admiral's directness of manner, there was so
much real and feeling delicacy, blended with the breeding
of a gentleman-like sailor, that it was not easy to suppose
he had any other motives than those he saw fit to avow.
Mildred had made many a friend, by a sweetness of
countenance
,
that was even more winning, than her general
beauty of face and form was attractive; and why should
not this respectable old seaman be of the number.
This train of thought was interrupted by the sudden and
unwelcome appearance of Dutton. He had just returned
from the bed-side of Sir Wycherly, and now came to seek
his wife and daughter, to bid them prepare to enter the
chariot, which was in waiting to convey them home. The
miserable man was not intoxicated, in the sense which
deprives a man of the use of speech and limbs; but he had
drunk quite enough to awaken the demon within him, and
to lay bare the secrets of his true character. If anything,
his nerves were better strung than common; but the wine
had stirred up all the energies of a being, whose resolutions
seldom took the direction of correct feeling, or of right
doing. The darkness of the room, and a slight confusion
which nevertheless existed in his brain, prevented him from
noticing the person of his superior, seated, as the latter was,
in the dark corner; and he believed himself once more
alone with those who were so completely dependent on his
mercy, and who had so long been the subjects of his brutality
and tyranny.
I hope Sir Wycherly is better, Dutton, the wife
commenced
,
fearful that her husband might expose himself and
her, before he was aware of the presence in which he stood.
Admiral Bluewater is as anxious, as we are ourselves, to
know his real state.
Ay, you women are all pity and feeling for baronets
and rear-admirals, answered Dutton, throwing himself
rudely into a chair, with his back towards the stranger, in
an attitude completely to exclude the latter from his view;
while a husband, or father, might die a hundred deaths,
and not draw a look of pity from your beautiful eyes, or a
kind word from your devilish tongues.
Neither Mildred nor I, merit this from
you
, Dutton!
No, you 're both perfection; like mother, like child.
Haven't I been, fifty times, at death's door, with this very
complaint of Sir Wycherly's, and did either of you ever
send for an apothecary, even?
You have been occasionally indisposed, Dutton, but
never apoplectic; and we have always thought a little sleep
would restore you; as, indeed, it always has.
What business had you to
think?
Surgeons think, and
medical men, and it was your duty to send for the nearest
professional man, to look after one you 're bound both to
honour, and obey. You are your own mistress, Martha, I
do suppose, in a certain degree; and what can't be cured
must be endured; but Mildred is my child; and I 'll have
her respect and love, if I break both your hearts in order to
get at them.
A pious daughter always respects her parent, Dutton,
said the wife, trembling from head to foot; but love must
come willingly, or, it will not come at all.
We 'll see as to that, Mrs. Martha Dutton; we 'll see as
to that. Come hither, Mildred; I have a word to say to
you, which may as well be said at once.
Mildred, trembling like her mother, drew near; but with
a feeling of filial piety, that no harshness could entirely
smother, she felt anxious to prevent the father from further
exposing
himself, in the presence of Admiral Bluewater. With
this view, then, and with this view only, she summoned
firmness enough to speak.
Father, she said, had we not better defer our family
matters, until we are alone?
Under ordinary circumstances, Bluewater would not have
waited for so palpable a hint, for he would have retired on
the first appearance of anything so disagreeable as a
misunderstanding
between man and wife. But, an ungovernable
interest in the lovely girl, who stood trembling at her father's
knee, caused him to forget his habitual delicacy of feeling,
and to overlook what might perhaps be termed almost a law
of society. Instead of moving, therefore, as Mildred had
both hoped and expected, he remained motionless in his
seat. Dutton's mind was too obtuse to comprehend his
daughter's allusions, in the absence of ocular evidence of a
stranger's presence, and his wrath was too much excited to
permit him to think much of anything but his own causes
of indignation.
Stand more in front of me, Mildred, he answered,
angrily. More before my face, as becomes one who
don't know her duty to her parent, and needs be taught it.
Oh! Dutton, exclaimed the afflicted wife; do not
do notaccuse Mildred of being undutiful! You know not
what you sayknow not her obligayou cannot know her
heart
, or you would not use these cruel imputations!
Silence, Mrs. Martha Duttonmy business is not with
you
, at present, but with this young lady, to whom, I hope,
I may presume to speak a little plainly, as she is my own
child. Silence, then, Mrs. Martha Dutton. If my memory
is not treacherous, you once stood up before God's altar
with me, and there vow'd to love, honour, and
obey
. Yes,
that was the word;
obey
, Mrs. Martha Dutton.
And what did
you
promise, at the same time, Frank?
exclaimed the wife, from whose bruised spirit this implied
accusation was torn in an agony of mental suffering.
Nothing but what I have honestly and manfully
performed
.
I promised to provide for you; to give you food
and raiment; to let you bear my name, and stand before
the world in the honourable character of honest Frank
Dutton's wife.
Honourable! murmured the wife, loud enough to be
heard by both the Admiral and Mildred, and yet in a tone
so smothered, as to elude the obtuse sense of hearing, that
long excess had left her husband. When this expressive
word had broken out of her very heart, however, she
succeeded
in suppressing her voice, and sinking into a chair,
concealed her face in her hands, in silence.
Mildred, come hither, resumed the brutalized parent.
You
are my daughter, and whatever others have promised
at the altar, and forgotten, a law of nature teaches you to
obey me. You have two admirers, either of whom you
ought to be glad to secure, though there is a great preference
between them
Father! exclaimed Mildred, every feeling of her
sensitive
nature revolting at this coarse allusion to a connection,
and to sentiments, that she was accustomed to view as
among the most sacred and private of her moral being.
Surely, you cannot mean what you say!
Like mother, like child! Let but disobedience and
disrespect
get possession of a wife, and they are certain to run
through a whole family, even though there were a dozen
children! Harkee, Miss Mildred, it is
you
who don't
happen to know what you say, while I understand myself
as well as most parents. Your mother would never acquaint
you with what I feel it a duty to put plainly before your
judgment; and, therefore, I expect you to listen as becomes
a dutiful and affectionate child. You can secure either of
these young Wychecombes, and either of them would be a
good match for a poor, disgraced, sailing-master's daughter.
Father, I shall sink through the floor, if you say
another
word, in this cruel manner!
No, dear; you 'll neither sink nor swim, unless it be by
making a bad, or a good choice. Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe
is Sir Wycherly's heir, and must be the next baronet,
and possessor of this estate. Of course he is much the best
thing, and you ought to give him a preference.
Dutton,
can
you, as a father and a Christian, give such
heartless counsel to your own child! exclaimed Mrs.
Dutton
,
inexpressibly shocked at the want of principle, as well
as at the want of feeling, discovered in her husband's advice.
Mrs. Martha Dutton, I can; and believe the counsel to
be anything but heartless, too. Do you wish your daughter
to be the wife of a miserable signal-station keeper, when she
may become Lady Wychecombe, with a little prudent
management
,
and the mistress of this capital old house, and
noble estate?
Fatherfather, interrupted Mildred, soothingly, though
ready to sink with shame at the idea of Admiral Bluewater's
being an auditor of such a conversation; you forget
yourself
,
and overlook my wishes. There is little probability of
Mr. Thomas Wychecombe's ever thinking of me as a wife
or, indeed, of any one else's entertaining such thoughts.
That will turn out, as you manage matters, Milly. Mr.
Thomas Wychecombe does not think of you as a
wife
,
quite likely, just at this moment; but the largest whales are
taken by means of very small lines, when the last are
properly
handled. This young lieutenant would have you
to-morrow
;
though a more silly thing than for you two to
marry, could not well be hit upon. He is only a lieutenant;
and though his name is so good a one, it does not appear
that he has any particular right to it.
And yet, Dutton, you were only a lieutenant when
you
married, and your name was
nothing
in the way of interest,
or preferment, observed the mother, anxious to interpose
some new feeling between her daughter, and the cruel
inference
left by the former part of her husband's speech.
We
then
thought all lay bright before us!
And so all would lie to this hour, Mrs. Dutton, but for
that one silly act of mine. A man with the charges of a
family on him, little pay, and no fortune, is driven to a
thousand follies to hide his misery. You do not strengthen
your case by reminding me of
that
imprudence. But,
Mildred
,
I do not tell you to cut adrift this young Virginian, for
he may be of use in more ways than one. In the first place,
you can play him off against Mr. Thomas Wychecombe;
and, in the second place, a lieutenant is likely, one day, to
be a captain; and the wife of a captain in His Majesty's
navy, is no disreputable berth. I advise you, girl, to use
this youngster as a bait to catch the heir with; and, failing
a good bite, to take up with the lad himself.
This was said dogmatically, and with a coarseness of
manner that fully corresponded with the looseness of the
principles, and the utter want of delicacy of feeling that
alone could prompt such advice. Mrs. Dutton fairly
groaned, as she listened to her husband, for never before
had he so completely thrown aside the thin mask of decency
that he ordinarily wore; but Mildred, unable to control the
burst of wild emotion that came over her, broke away from
the place she occupied at her father's knee, and, as if blindly
seeking protection in any asylum that she fancied safe,
found herself sobbing, as if her heart would break, in
Admiral
Bluewater's arms.
Dutton followed the ungovernable, impulsive movement,
with his eye, and for the first time he became aware in
whose presence he had been exposing his native baseness.
Wine had not so far the mastery of him, as to blind him to
all the consequences, though it did stimulate him to a point
that enabled him to face the momentary mortification of his
situation.
I beg a thousand pardons, sir, he said, rising, and
bowing low to his superior; I was totally ignorant that I
had the honour to be in the company of Admiral Bluewater
Admiral Blue, I find Jack calls you, sir; ha-ha-haa
familiarity
which is a true sign of love and respect. I never
knew a captain, or a flag-officer, that got a regular,
expressive
ship's name, that he wasn't the delight of the whole
service. Yes, sir; I find the people call Sir Gervaise, Little
Jarvy, and yourself, Admiral BlueHa-ha-haan infallible
sign of merit in the superior, and of love in the men.
Vol. I.  12
I ought to apologize, Mr. Dutton, for making one, so
unexpectedly to myself, in a family council, returned the
rear-admiral. As for the men, they are no great
philosophers
,
though tolerable judges of when they are well
commanded
,
and well treated.But, the hour is late, and it was
my intention to sleep in my own ship, to-night. The coach
of Sir Wycherly has been ordered to carry me to the
landing
,
and I hope to have your permission to see these ladies
home in it.
The answer of Dutton was given with perfect
self-possession
,
and in a manner to show that he knew how to
exercise
the courtesies of life, or to receive them, when in the
humour.
It is an honour, sir, they will not think of declining, if
my wishes are consulted, he said. Come, Milly, foolish
girl, dry your tears, and smile on Admiral Bluewater, for
his condescension. Young women, sir, hardly know how
to take a joke; and our ship's humours are sometimes a
little strong for them. I tell my dear wife, sometimes
`wife,' I say, `His Majesty can't have stout-hearted and
stout-handed seamen, and the women poets and die-away
swains, and all in the same individual,' says I. Mrs. Dutton
understands me, sir; and so does little Milly; who is an
excellent girl in the main; though a little addicted to using
the eye-pumps, as we have it aboard ship, sir.
And, now, Mr. Dutton, it being understood that I am
to see the ladies home, will you do me the favour to inquire
after the condition of Sir Wycherly. One would not wish
to quit his hospitable roof, in uncertainty as to his actual
situation.
Dutton was duly sensible of an awkwardness in the
presence of his superior, and he gladly profited by this
commission
to quit the room; walking more steadily than if he
had not been drinking.
All this time, Mildred hung on Admiral Bluewater's
shoulder
,
weeping, and unwilling to quit a place that seemed to
her, in her fearful agitation, a sort of sanctuary.
Mrs. Dutton, said Bluewater, first kissing the cheek of
his lovely burthen, in a manner so parental, that the most
sensitive delicacy could not have taken the alarm; you
will succeed better than myself, in quieting the feelings of
this little trembler. I need hardly say that if I have
accidentally
overheard more than I ought, it is as much a secret
with me, as it would be with your own brother. The
characters of all cannot be affected by the mistaken and
excited calculations of one; and this occasion has served to
make me better acquainted with you, and your admirable
daughter, than I might otherwise have been, by means of
years of ordinary intercourse.
Oh! Admiral Bluewater, do not judge him
too
harshly!
He has been too long at that fatal table, which I fear has
destroyed poor dear Sir Wycherly, and knew not what he
said. Never before have I seen him in such a fearful
humour, or in the least disposed to trifle with, or to wound the
feelings of this sweet child!
Her extreme agitation is a proof of this, my good
madam, and shows all you can wish to say. View me as
your sincere friend, and place every reliance on my
discretion
.
The wounded mother listened with gratitude, and Mildred
withdrew from her extraordinary situation, wondering by
what species of infatuation she could have been led to
adopt it.
CHAPTER IX.
Ah, Montague,
If thou be there, sweet brother, take my hand,
And with thy lips keep in my soul awhile!
Thou lov'st me not; for, brother, if thou didst,
Thy tears would wash this cold congealed blood
That glues my lips, and will not let me speak.
Come quickly, Montague, or I am dead.
King Henry
VI.
Sir Wycherly
had actually been seized with a fit of
apoplexy. It was the first serious disease he had experienced
in a long life of health and prosperity; and the sight of
their condescending, good-humoured, and indulgent master,
in a plight so miserable, had a surprising effect on the
heated brains of all the household. Mr. Rotherham, a good
three-bottle man, on emergency, had learned to bleed, and
fortunately the vein he struck, as his patient still lay on the
floor, where he had fallen, sent out a stream that had the
effect not only to restore the baronet to life, but, in a great
measure, to consciousness. Sir Wycherly was not a
hard
drinker, like Dutton; but he was a
fair
drinker, like Mr.
Rotherham, and most of the beneficed clergy of that day.
Want of exercise, as he grew older, had as much influence
in producing this attack as excess of wine; and there were,
already, strong hopes of his surviving it, aided as he was,
by a good constitution. The apothecary had reached the
Hall, within five minutes after the attack, having luckily
been prescribing to the gardener; and the physician and
surgeon of the family were both expected in the course of
the morning.
Sir Gervaise Oakes had been acquainted with the state
of his host, by his own valet, as soon as it was known in
the servants'-hall, and being a man of action, he did not
hesitate to proceed at once to the chamber of the sick, to
offer his own aid, in the absence of that which might be
better. At the door of the chamber, he met Atwood, who
had been summoned from his pen, and they entered together,
the vice-admiral feeling for a lancet in his pocket, for he,
too, had acquired the art of the blood-letter. They now
learned the actual state of things.
Where is Bluewater? demanded Sir Gervaise, after
regarding his host a moment with commiseration and
concern
.
I hope he has not yet left the house.
He is still here, Sir Gervaise, but I should think on the
point of quitting us. I heard him say, that,
notwithstanding
all Sir Wycherly's kind plans to detain him, he intended
to sleep in his own ship.
That I 've never doubted, though I 've affected to
believe
otherwise. Go to him, Atwood, and say I beg he will
pull within hail of the Plantagenet, as he goes off, and desire
Mr. Magrath to come ashore, as soon as possible. There
shall be a conveyance at the landing to bring him here;
and he may order his own surgeon to come also, if it be
agreeable to himself.
With these instructions the secretary left the room; while
Sir Gervaise turned to Tom Wychecombe, and said a few
of the words customary on such melancholy occasions.
I think there is hope, sir, he added, yes sir, I think
there is hope; though your honoured relative is no longer
young  still, this early bleeding has been a great thing;
and if we can gain a little time for poor Sir Wycherly, our
efforts will not be thrown away. Sudden death is awful,
sir, and few of us are prepared for it, either in mind, or
affairs. We sailors have to hold our lives in our hands, it
is true, but then it is for king and country; and we hope for
mercy on all who fall in the discharge of their duties. For
my part, I am never unprovided with a will, and that
disposes
of all the interests of this world, while I humbly trust
in the Great Mediator, for the hereafter. I hope Sir
Wycherly
is equally provident as to his worldly affairs?
No doubt my dear uncle could wish to leave certain
trifling memorials behind him to a few of his intimates,
returned Tom, with a dejected countenance; but he has
not been without a will, I believe, for some time; and I
presume
you will agree with me in thinking he is not in a
condition
to make one, now, were he unprovided in that way?
Perhaps not exactly at this moment, though a rally
12*
might afford an opportunity. The estate is entailed, I think
Mr. Dutton told me, at dinner.
It is, Sir Gervaise, and I am the unworthy individual
who is to profit by it, according to the common notions of
men, though Heaven knows I shall consider it anything but
a gain; still, I am the unworthy individual who is to be
benefited by my uncle's death.
Your father was the baronet's next brother? observed
Sir Gervaise, casually, a shade of distrust passing athwart
his mind, though coming from what source, or directed to
what point, he was himself totally unable to say. Mr.
Baron Wychecombe, I believe, was your parent?
He was, Sir Gervaise, and a most tender and indulgent
father, I ever found him. He left me his earnings, some
seven hundred a year, and I am sure the death of Sir
Wycherly
is as far from my necessities, as it is from my
wishes.
Of course you will succeed to the baronetcy, as well as
to the estate? mechanically asked Sir Gervaise, led on by
the supererogatory expressions of Tom, himself, rather than
by a vulgar curiosity, to ask questions that, under other
circumstances
,
he might have thought improper.
Of course, sir. My father was the only surviving
brother
of Sir Wycherly; the only one who ever married; and
I am
his
eldest child. Since this melancholy event has
occurred, it is quite fortunate that I lately obtained this
certificate
of the marriage of my parentsis it not, sir?
Here Tom drew from his pocket a soiled piece of paper,
which professed to be a certificate of the marriage of Thomas
Wychecombe, barrister, with Martha Dodd, spinster, &c.
&c. The document was duly signed by the rector of a
parish church in Westminster, and bore a date sufficiently
old to establish the legitimacy of the person who held it.
This extraordinary precaution produced the very natural
effect of increasing the distrust of the vice-admiral, and, in
a slight degree, of giving it a direction.
You go well armed, sir, observed Sir Gervaise, drily.
Is it your intention, when you succeed, to carry the patent
of the baronetcy, and the title-deeds, in your pocket?
Ah! I perceive my having this document strikes you
as odd, Sir Gervaise, but it can be easily explained. There
was a wide difference in rank between my parents, and
some ill-disposed persons have presumed so far to reflect on
the character of my mother, as to assert she was not married
at all.
In which case, sir, you would do well to cut off
half-a-dozen
of their ears.
The law is not to be appeased in that way, Sir Gervaise.
My dear parent used to inculcate on me the necessity of
doing everything according to law; and I endeavour to
remember his precepts. He avowed his marriage on his
death-bed, made all due atonement to my respected and
injured
mother, and informed me in whose hands I should
find this very certificate; I only obtained it this morning,
which fact will account for its being in my pocket, at this
melancholy and unexpected crisis, in my beloved uncle's
constitution.
The latter part of Tom's declaration was true enough;
for, after having made all the necessary inquiries, and
obtained
the hand-writing of a clergyman who was long since
dead, he had actually forged the certificate that day, on a
piece of soiled paper, that bore the water-mark of 1720.
His language, however, contributed to alienate the confidence
of his listener; Sir Gervaise being a man who was so much
accustomed to directness and fair-dealing, himself, as to feel
disgust at anything that had the semblance of cant or
hypocrisy
.
Nevertheless, he had his own motives for pursuing
the subject; the presence of neither at the bed-side of the
sufferer, being just then necessary.
And this Mr. Wycherly Wychecombe, he said; he
who has so much distinguished himself of late; your uncle's
namesake;is it true that he is not allied to your family?
Not in the least, Sir Gervaise, answered Tom, with
one of his sinister smiles. He is only a Virginian, you
know, sir, and cannot well belong to us. I have heard my
uncle say, often, that the young gentleman must be
descended
from an old servant of his father's, who was
transported
for stealing silver out of a shop on Ludgate Hill, and
who was arrested for passing himself off, as one of the
Wychecombe family. They tell me, Sir Gervaise, that the
colonies are pretty much made of persons descended from
that sort of ancestors?
I cannot say that I have found it so; though, when I
commanded a frigate, I served several years on the North
American station. The larger portion of the Americans,
like much the larger portion of the English, are humble
labourers, established in a remote colony, where civilization
is not far advanced, wants are many, and means few; but,
in the way of character, I am not certain they are not quite
on a level with those they left behind them; and, as to the
gentry of the colonies, I have seen many men of the best
blood of the mother country among them;younger sons,
and their descendants, as a matter of course, but of an
honourable and respected ancestry.
Well, sir, this surprises me; and it is not the general
opinion, I am persuaded! Certainly, it is not the fact as
respects this gentleman  stranger, I might call him, for
stranger he is at Wychecombewho has not the least right
to pretend to belong to us.
Did you ever know him to lay claim to that honour,
sir?
Not directly, Sir Gervaise; though I am told he has
made many hints to that effect, since he landed here to be
cured of his wound. It would have been better had he
presented
his rights to the landlord, than to present them to the
tenants, I think you will allow, as a man of honour,
yourself
,
Sir Gervaise?
I can approve of nothing clandestine in matters that
require open and fair dealing, Mr. Thomas Wychecombe.
But I ought to apologize for thus dwelling on your family
affairs, which concern me only as I feel an interest in the
wishes and happiness of my new acquaintance, my excellent
host.
Sir Wycherly has property in the funds that is not
entailed
quite
1000 a year, beyond the estatesand I know
he has left a will, continued Tom; who, with the
shortsightedness
of a rogue, flattered himself with having made a
favourable impression on his companion, and who was
desirous
of making him useful to himself, in an emergency
that he felt satisfied must terminate in the speedy death of
his uncle. Yes, a good 1000 a year, in the fives;
money saved from his rents, in a long life. This will
probably
has some provision in favour of my younger brothers;
and perhaps of this namesake of his,Tom was well aware
that it devised every shilling, real and personal, to himself;
for a kinder heart does not exist on earth. In fact, this
will my uncle put in my possession, as heir at law, feeling
it due to my pretensions, I suppose; but I have never
presumed
to look into it.
Here was another instance of excessive finesse, in which
Tom awakened suspicion by his very efforts to allay it. It
seemed highly improbable to Sir Gervaise, that a man like
the nephew could long possess his uncle's will, and feel no
desire to ascertain its contents. The language of the young
man was an indirect admission, that he might have examined
the will if he would; and the admiral felt disposed to
suspect
that what he might thus readily have done, he actually
had done. The dialogue, however, terminated here;
Dutton
,
just at that moment, entering the room on the errand on
which he had been sent by Admiral Bluewater, and Tom
joining his old acquaintance, as soon as the latter made his
appearance. Sir Gervaise Oakes was too much concerned
for the condition of his host, and had too many cares of his
own, to think deeply or long on what had just passed between
himself and Tom Wychecombe. Had they separated that
night, what had been said, and the unfavourable impressions
it had made, would have been soon forgotten; but
circumstances
subsequently conspired to recall the whole to his
mind, of which the consequences will be related in the course
of our narrative.
Dutton appeared to be a little shocked, as he gazed upon
the pallid features of Sir Wycherly, and he was not sorry
when Tom led him aside, and began to speak confidentially
of the future, and of the probable speedy death of his uncle.
Had there been one present, gifted with the power of reading
the thoughts and motives of men, a deep disgust of human
frailties must have come over him, as these two impure
spirits betrayed to him their cupidity and cunning.
Outwardly
,
they were friends mourning over a mutual probable
loss; while inwardly, Dutton was endeavouring to obtain
such a hold of his companion's confidence, as might pave
the way to his own future preferment to the high and
unhoped-for
station of a rich baronet's father-in-law; while
Tom thought only of so far mystifying the master, as to
make use of him, on an emergency, as a witness to establish
his own claims. The manner in which he endeavoured to
effect his object, however, must be left to the imagination of
the reader, as we have matters of greater moment to record
at this particular juncture.
From the time Sir Wycherly was laid on his bed, Mr.
Rotherham had been seated at the sick man's side, watching
the course of his attack, and ready to interpret any of the
patient's feebly and indistinctly expressed wishes. We say
indistinctly, because the baronet's speech was slightly
affected
with that species of paralysis which reduces the
faculty to the state that is vulgarly called thick-tongued.
Although a three-bottle man, Mr. Rotherham was far from
being without his devout feelings, on occasions, discharging
all the clerical functions with as much unction as the habits
of the country, and the opinions of the day, ordinarily
exacted
of divines. He had even volunteered to read the
prayers for the sick, as soon as he perceived that the patient's
recollection had returned; but this kind offer had been
declined
by Sir Wycherly, under the clearer views of fitness,
that the near approach of death is apt to give, and which
views left a certain consciousness that the party assembled
was not in the best possible condition for that sacred office.
Sir Wycherly revived so much, at last, as to look about
him with increasing consciousness; and, at length, his eyes
passed slowly over the room, scanning each person singly,
and with marked deliberation.
I know you allnow, said the kind-hearted baronet,
though always speaking thick, and with a little difficulty;
am sorry to give  much trouble. I have  little time
to spare.
I hope not, Sir Wycherly, put in the vicar, in a
consolatory
manner; you have had a sharp attack, but then
there is a good constitution to withstand it.
My time  short  feel it here, rejoined the patient,
passing his hand over his forehead.
Note that, Dutton, whispered Tom Wycherly. My
poor uncle intimates himself that his mind is a little shaken.
Under such circumstances, it would be cruel to let him injure
himself with business.
It cannot be done
legally
, Mr. ThomasI should think
Admiral Oakes would interfere to prevent it.
Rotherham, continued the patient, I willsettle with
withworld;then, givethoughtsto God. Have we
gueststhe house?Men of familycharacter?
Certainly, Sir Wycherly; Admiral Oakes is in the
room, even; and Admiral Bluewater, is, I believe, still in
the house. You invited both to pass the night with you.
I remember it  now; my mind  still  confused,
here Tom Wychecombe again nudged the master Sir
Gervaise Oakes  an Admiral  ancient baronet  man of
high honour. Admiral Bluewater, too  relative  Lord
Bluewater; gentleman  universal esteem. You, too,
Rotherham
;
wish my poor brother JamesSt. James,used to
call himhad been living;yougood neighbour
Rotherham
.
Can I do anything to prove it, my dear Sir Wycherly?
Nothing would make me happier than to know, and to
comply with, all your wishes, at a moment so important!
Let all quit roombut yourselfhead feels worse
I cannot delay
'T is cruel to distress my beloved uncle with business,
or conversation, in his present state, interposed Tom
Wychecombe, with emphasis, and, in a slight degree, with
authority.
All not only felt the truth of this, but all felt that the
speaker, by his consanguinity, had a clear right to interfere,
in the manner he had. Still Sir Gervaise Oakes had great
reluctance in yielding to this remonstrance; for, to the
distrust
he had imbibed of Tom Wychecombe, was added an
impression that his host wished to reveal something of
interest
,
in connection with his new favourite, the lieutenant.
He felt compelled, notwithstanding, to defer to the
acknowledged
nephew's better claims, and he refrained from
interfering
.
Fortunately, Sir Wycherly was yet in a state to
enforce his own wishes.
Let all quit  room, he repeated, in a voice that was
startling by its unexpected firmness, and equally unexpected
distinctness. All but Sir Gervaise OakesAdmiral
Bluewater
Mr.
Rotherham. Gentlemenfavour to remain
rest depart.
Accustomed to obey their master's orders, more especially
when given in a tone so decided, the domestics quitted the
room, accompanied by Dutton; but Tom Wychecombe saw
fit to remain, as if his presence were to be a matter of
course.
Do me  favour  withdraw,  Mr. Wychecombe,
resumed the baronet, after fixing his gaze on his nephew
for some time, as if expecting him to retire without this
request.
My beloved uncle, it is IThomas, your own brother's
sonyour next of kinwaiting anxiously by your respected
bed-side. Do not  do not  confound me with strangers.
Such a forgetfulness would break my heart!
Forgive me, nephew  but I wish  alone with these
gentleheadgettingconfused
You see how it is, Sir Gervaise Oakesyou see how it
is, Mr. Rotherham. Ah! there goes the coach that is to
take Admiral Bluewater to his boat. My uncle wished for
three witnesses to something, and I can remain as one of
the three.
Is it your pleasure, Sir Wycherly, to wish to see us
alone? asked Sir Gervaise, in a manner that showed
authority would be exercised to enforce his request, should
the uncle still desire the absence of his nephew.
A sign from the sick man indicated the affirmative, and
that in a manner too decided to admit of mistake.
You perceive, Mr. Wychecombe, what are your uncle's
wishes, observed Sir Gervaise, very much in the way that
a well-bred superior intimates to an inferior the compliance
he expects; I trust his desire will not be disregarded, at a
moment like this.
I am Sir Wycherly Wychecombe's next of kin, said
Tom, in a slightly bullying tone; and no one has the
same right as a relative, and, I may say, his heir, to be at
his bed-side.
That depends on the pleasure of Sir Wycherly
Wychecome
himself, sir.
He
is master here; and, having done
me the honour to invite me under his roof as a guest, and,
now, having requested to see me alone, with others he has
expressly namedone of whom you are notI shall
conceive
it my duty to see his wishes obeyed.
This was said in the firm, quiet way, that the habit of
command had imparted to Sir Gervaise's manner; and Tom
began to see it might be dangerous to resist. It was
important
,
too, that one of the vice-admiral's character and
station should have naught to say against him, in the event
of any future controversy; and, making a few professions
of respect, and of his desire to please his uncle, Tom quitted
the room.
A gleam of satisfaction shot over the sick man's
countenance
,
as his nephew disappeared; and then his eye turned
slowly towards the faces of those who remained.
Bluewater, he said, the thickness of his speech, and
the general difficulty of utterance, seeming to increase; the
rear-admiral  I want all  respectable  witnesses in the
house.
My friend has left us, I understand, returned Sir
Gervaise
,
insisting on his habit of never sleeping out of his
ship; but Atwood must soon be back; I hope
he
will
answer!
A sign of assent was given; and, then, there was the
pause of a minute, or two, ere the secretary made his
appearance
.
As soon, however, as he had returned, the three
collected around the baronet's bed, not without some of the
weakness which men are supposed to have inherited from
their common mother Eve, in connection with the motive
for this singular proceeding of the baronet.
Sir Gervaise  Rotherham  Mr. Atwood, slowly
repeated
the patient, his eye passing from the face of one to
that of another, as he uttered the name of each; three
witnessesthat will doThomas saidmust have
three
three
good
names.
What can we do to serve you, Sir Wycherly? inquired
the admiral, with real interest. You have only to name
your requests, to have them faithfully attended to.
Old Sir Michael Wychecombe, Kt.two wives
Margery
and Joan. Two wivestwo sonshalf-blood
Thomas
,
James, Charles, and Gregory,
whole
Sir Reginald
Wychecome,
half
. Understandhopegentlemen?
This is not being very clear, certainly, whispered Sir
Gervaise; but, perhaps by getting hold of the other end
of the rope, we may under-run it, as we sailors say, and
Vol. I.  13
come at the meaning  we will let the poor man proceed
therefore. Quite plain, my dear sir, and what have you
next to tell us. You left off, with saying only
half
about
Sir Reginald.
Half-blood; only
half
Tom and the rest, whole. Sir
Reginald, no
nullius
young Tom, a
nullius
.
A
nullius
, Mr. Rotherham! You understand Latin,
sir; what can a
nullius
, mean? No such rope in the ship,
hey! Atwood?
Nullius
, or
nullius
, as it ought sometimes to be
pronounced
,
is the genitive case, singular, of the pronoun
nullus
;
nullus, nulla, nullum;
which means, `no man,' `no
woman,' `no thing.'
Nullius
means, `of no man,' `of no
woman,' `of no thing.'
The vicar gave this explanation, much in the way a
pedagogue
would have explained the matter to a class.
Ay-ayany school-boy could have told that, which is
the first form learning. But what the devil can `Nom.
nullus, nulla, nullum;
Gen.
nullius, nullius, nullius
,' have
to do with Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, the nephew and heir
of the present baronet?
That is more than I can inform you, Sir Gervaise,
answered the vicar, stiffly; but, for the Latin, I will take
upon myself to answer, that it is good.
Sir Gervaise was too well-bred to laugh, but he found it
difficult to suppress a smile.
Well, Sir Wycherly, resumed the vice-admiral, this
is quite plainSir Reginald is only
half
, while your nephew
Tom, and the rest, are
whole
Margery and Joan, and all
that. Anything more to tell us, my dear sir?
Tom
not
whole
nullus
, I wish to say. Sir Reginald
half
no
nullus
.
This is like being at sea a week, without getting a sight
of the sun! I am all adrift, now, gentlemen.
Sir Wycherly does not attend to his cases, put in
Atwood
,
drily. At one time, he is in the
genitive
, and then
he gets back to the
nominative;
which is leaving us in the
vocative
.
ComecomeAtwood, none of your gun-room wit, on
an occasion so solemn as this. My dear Sir Wycherly,
have you anything more to tell us? I believe we perfectly
understand you, now. Tom is not
whole
you wish to say
nullus
, and not to say
nullius
. Sir Reginald is only
half
,
but he is no
nullus
.
Yes, sir  that is it, returned the old man, smiling.
Half
, but no
nullus
. Change my mindseen too much
of the other, latelyTom, my nephewwant to make
him
my heir.
This is getting clearer, out of all question. You wish
to make your nephew, Tom, your heir. But the law does
that already, does it not, my dear sir? Mr. Baron
Wychecombe
was the next brother of the baronet; was he not, Mr.
Rotherham?
So I have always understood, sir; and Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe must be the heir at law.
No  no
nullus  nullus
, repeated Sir Wycherly,
with so much eagerness as to make his voice nearly
indistinct
;
Sir ReginaldSir ReginaldSir Reginald.
And pray, Mr. Rotherham, who may this Sir Reginald
be? Some old baronet of the family, I presume.
Not at all, sir; it is Sir Reginald Wychecombe of
Wychecombe-Regis, Herts; a baronet of Queen Anne's
time, and a descendant from a cadet of this family, I am
told.
This is getting on soundingsI had taken it into my
head this Sir Reginald was some old fellow of the reign of
one of the Plantagenets. Well, Sir Wycherly, do you wish
us to send an express into Hertfordshire, in quest of Sir
Reginald Wychecombe, who is quite likely your executor?
Do not give yourself the pain to speak; a sign will answer.
Sir Wycherly seemed struck with the suggestion, which,
the reader will readily understand, was far from being his
real meaning; and then he smiled, and nodded his head in
approbation.
Sir Gervaise, with the promptitude of a man of business,
turned to the table where the vicar had written notes to the
medical men, and dictated a short letter to his secretary.
This letter he signed, and in five minutes Atwood left the
room, to order it to be immediately forwarded by express.
When this was done, the admiral rubbed his hands, in
satisfaction
,
like a man who felt he had got himself cleverly out
of a knotty difficulty.
I don't see, after all, Mr. Rotherham, he observed to
the vicar, as they stood together, in a corner of the room,
waiting the return of the secretary; what he lugged in
that school-boy Latin for
nullus, nulla, nullum!
Can you
possibly explain
that?
Not unless it was Sir Wycherly's desire to say, that
Sir Reginald, being descended from a younger son, was
nobody
as yet, had no woman  and I believe he is not
marriedand was poor, or had `no
thing
.'
And is Sir Wycherly such a desperate scholar, that he
would express himself in this hieroglyphical manner, on
what I fear will prove to be his death-bed.
Why, Sir Gervaise, Sir Wycherly was educated like
all other young gentlemen, but has forgotten most of his
classics, in the course of a long life of ease and affluence.
Is it not probable, now, that his recollection has returned to
him suddenly, in consequence of this affection of the head?
I think I have read of some curious instances of these
reviving
memories, on a death-bed, or after a fit of sickness.
Ay, that you may have done! exclaimed Sir Gervaise,
smiling; and poor, good Sir Wycherly, must have begun
afresh, at the very place where he left off. But here is
Atwood, again.
After a short consultation, the three chosen witnesses
returned to the bed-side, the admiral being spokesman.
The express will be off in ten minutes, Sir Wycherly,
he said; and you may hope to see your relative, in the
course of the next two or three days.
Too latetoo late, murmured the patient, who had an
inward consciousness of his true situation; too lateturn
the will roundSir Reginald, Tom;TomSir Reginald.
Turn the will round.
Turn the will round!this is very explicit, gentlemen,
to those who can understand it. Sir Reginald, Tom;Tom,
Sir Reginald. At all events, it is clear that his mind is
dwelling on the disposition of his property, since he speaks
of wills. Atwood, make a note of these words, that there
need be no mistake. I wonder he has said nothing of our
brave young lieutenant, his namesake. There can be no
harm, Mr. Rotherham, in just mentioning that fine fellow
to him, in a moment like this?
I see none, sir. It is
our
duty to remind the sick of
their
duties.
Do you not wish to see your young namesake, Lieutenant
Wycherly
Wychecombe, Sir Wycherly? asked the
admiral
;
sufficiently emphasizing the Christian name. He
must be in the house, and I dare say would be happy to
obey your wishes.
I hope he is well, sirfine young gentlemanhonour
to the name, sir.
Quite true, Sir Wycherly; and an honour to the
nation
,
too.
Didn't know Virginia was a
nation
so much the better
fine young
Virginian
, sir.
Of your
family
, no doubt, Sir Wycherly, as well as of
your name, added the admiral, who secretly suspected the
young sailor of being a son of the baronet, notwithstanding
all he had heard to the contrary. An exceedingly fine
young man, and an honour to any house in England!
I suppose they
have
houses in Virginiabad climate;
houses necessary. No relative, sir;probably a
nullus
.
Many Wychecombes,
nullusus
. Tom, a
nullus
this young
gentleman, a
nullus
Wychecombes of Surrey, all
nulluses
Sir Reginald, no
nullus;
but a
half
Thomas, James,
Charles, and Gregory, all
whole
. My brother, Baron
Wychecombe
,
told mebefore he died.
Whole what
, Sir Wycherly? asked the admiral, a little
vexed at the obscurity of the other's language.
Blood
whole blood
, sir. Capital law, Sir Gervaise;
had it from the baronfirst hand.
Now, one of the peculiarities of England is, that, in the
division of labour, few know anything material about the
law, except the professional men. Even their knowledge is
divided and sub-divided, in a way that makes a very fair
division of profit. Thus the conveyancer is not a barrister;
the barrister is not an attorney; and the chancery
practitioner
would be an unsafe adviser for one of the purely
law courts. That particular provision of the common law,
which Baron Wychecombe had mentioned to his brother, as
the rule of the
half-blood
, has been set aside, or modified,
by statute, within the last ten years; but few English
laymen
would be at all likely to know of such a law of descent
13 *
even when it existed; for while it did violence to every
natural sentiment of right, it lay hidden in the secrets of the
profession. Were a case stated to a thousand intelligent
Englishmen, who had not read law, in which it was laid
down that brothers, by different mothers, though equally
sons of the founder of the estate, could not take from each
other, unless by devise or entail, the probability is that quite
nine in ten would deny the existence of any rule so
absurd
;
and this, too, under the influence of feelings that were
creditable to their sense of natural justice. Nevertheless,
such was one of the important provisions of the perfection
of reason, until the recent reforms in English law; and it
has struck us as surprising, that an ingenious writer of
fiction, who has recently charmed his readers with a tale,
the interest of which turns principally on the vicissitudes of
practice, did not bethink him of this peculiar feature of his
country's laws; inasmuch as it would have supplied mystery
sufficient for a dozen ordinary romances, and
improbabilities
enough for a hundred. That Sir Gervaise and his
companions should be ignorant of the law of the
half-blood
,
is, consequently, very much a matter of course; and
no one ought to be surprised that the worthy baronet's
repeated
allusions to the whole, and the half, were
absolutely
enigmas, which neither had the knowledge necessary
to explain.
What
can
the poor fellow mean? demanded the
admiral
,
more concerned than he remembered ever before to
have been, on any similar occasion. One could wish to
serve him as much as possible, but all this about `
nullus
,'
and `whole blood,' and `half,' is so much gibberish to me
can you make anything of it,hey! Atwood?
Upon my word, Sir Gervaise, it seems a matter for a
judge, rather than for man-of-war's-men, like ourselves.
It certainly can have no connection with this rising of
the Jacobites?
That
is an affair likely to trouble a loyal
subject, in his last moments, Mr. Rotherham!
Sir Wycherly's habits and age forbid the idea that he
knows more of
that
, sir, than is known to us all. His
request
,
however, to `turn the will round,' I conceive to be
altogether explicit. Several capital treatises have appeared
lately on the `human will,' and I regret to say, my honoured
friend and patron has not always been quite as orthodox on
that point, as I could wish. I, therefore, consider his words
an evidence of a hearty repentance.
Sir Gervaise looked about him, as was his habit when
any droll idea crossed his mind; but again suppressing the
inclination to smile, he answered with suitable gravity
I understand you, sir; you think all these
inexplicable
terms are connected with Sir Wycherly's religious
feelings. You may certainly be right, for it exceeds my
knowledge to connect them with anything else. I wish,
notwithstanding, he had not disowned this noble young
lieutenant
of ours! Is it quite certain, the young man is a
Virginian?
So I have always understood it, sir. He has never
been known in this part of England, until he was landed
from a frigate in the roads, to be cured of a serious wound.
I think none of Sir Wycherly's allusions have the least
reference to
him
.
Sir Gervaise Oakes now joined his hands behind his back,
and walked several times, quarter-deck fashion, to and fro,
in the room. At each turn, his eyes glanced towards the
bed, and he ever found the gaze of the sick man anxiously
fastened on himself. This satisfied him that religion had
nothing to do with his host's manifest desire to make
himself
understood; and his own trouble was greatly increased.
It seemed to him, as if a dying man was making incessant
appeals to his aid, without its being in his power to afford
it. It was not possible for a generous man, like Sir
Gervaise
,
to submit to such a feeling without an effort; and he
soon went to the side of the bed, again, determined to bring
the affair to some intelligible issue.
Do you think, Sir Wycherly, you could write a few
lines, if we put pen, ink, and paper before you? he asked,
as a sort of desperate remedy.
Impossiblecan hardly see; have got no strength
stopwill tryif you please.
Sir Gervaise was delighted with this, and he immediately
directed his companions to lend their assistance. Atwood
and the vicar bolstered the old man up, and the admiral put
the writing materials before him, substituting a large quarto
bible for a desk. Sir Wycherly, after several abortive
attempts, finally got the pen in his hand, and with great
difficulty traced six or seven nearly illegible words, running
the line diagonally across the paper. By this time his
powers failed him altogether, and he sunk back, dropping
the pen, and closing his eyes in a partial insensibility. At
this critical instant, the surgeon entered, and at once put an
end to the interview, by taking charge of the patient, and
directing all but one or two necessary attendants, to quit the
room.
The three chosen witnesses of what had just past, repaired
together to a parlour; Atwood, by a sort of mechanical
habit, taking with him the paper on which the baronet had
scrawled the words just mentioned. This, by a sort of
mechanical
use, also, he put into the hands of Sir Gervaise, as
soon as they entered the room; much as he would have laid
before his superior, an order to sign, or a copy of a letter to
the secretary of the Navy Board.
This is as bad as the `
nullus!
' exclaimed Sir Gervaise,
after endeavouring to decipher the scrawl in vain. What
is this first word, Mr. Rotherham`Irish,' is it not,hey!
Atwood?
I believe it is no more than `I-n,' stretched over much
more paper than is necessary.
You are right enough, vicar; and the next word is
`the,' though it looks like a
chevaux de frise
what follows?
It looks like `man-of-war,' Atwood?
I beg your pardon, Sir Gervaise; this first letter is
what I should call an elongated nthe next is certainly an
athe third looks like the waves of a riverah! it is an
mand the last is an en-a-m-ethat makes `name,'
gentlemen
.
Yes, eagerly added the vicar, and the two next words
are, `of God.'
Then it is religion, after all, that was on the poor man's
mind! exclaimed Sir Gervaise, in a slight degree
disappointed
,
if the truth must be told. What's this A-m-e-n
`Amen'why it's a sort of a prayer.
This is the form, in which it is usual to commence
wills, I believe, Sir Gervaise, observed the secretary, who
had written many a one, on board ship, in his day. `In the
name of God, Amen.'
By George, you're right, Atwood; and the poor man
was trying, all the while, to let us know how he wished to
dispose of his property! What could he mean by the
nullus
it is not possible that the old gentleman has nothing to
leave?
I'll answer for it, Sir Gervaise,
that
is not the true
explanation
,
the vicar replied. Sir Wycherly's affairs are
in the best order; and, besides the estate, he has a large
sum in the funds.
Well, gentlemen, we can do no more to-night. A
medical
man is already in the house, and Bluewater will send
ashore, one or two others from the fleet. In the morning, if
Sir Wycherly is in a state to converse, this matter shall be
attended to.
The party now separated; a bed being provided for the
vicar, and the admiral and his secretary retiring to their
respective rooms.
CHAPTER X.
Bid physicians talk our veins to temper,
And with an argument new-set a pulse;
Then think, my lord, of reasoning into love.
Young
.
While
the scene just related, took place in the chamber
of the sick man, Admiral Bluewater, Mrs. Dutton, and
Mildred
left the house, in the old family-coach. The
rear-admiral
had pertinaciously determined to adhere to his
practice
of sleeping in his ship; and the manner in which he
had offered seats to his two fair companionsfor Mrs. Dutton
still deserved to be thus termed  has already been seen.
The motive was simply to remove them from any further
brutal exhibitions of Dutton's cupidity, while he continued
in his present humour; and, thus influenced, it is not
probable
that the gallant old sailor would be likely to dwell,
more than was absolutely necessary, on the unpleasant
scene of which he had been a witness. In fact, no allusion
was made to it, during the quarter of an hour the party was
driving from the Hall to the station-house. They all spoke,
with regret,Mildred with affectionate tenderness, even,
of poor Sir Wycherly; and several anecdotes, indicative of
his goodness of heart, were eagerly related to Bluewater, by
the two females, as the carriage moved heavily along. In
the time mentioned, the vehicle drew up before the door of
the cottage, and all three alighted.
If the morning of that day had been veiled in mist, the
sun had set in as cloudless a sky, as is often arched above
the island of Great Britain. The night was, what in that
region, is termed a clear moonlight. It was certainly not
the mimic day that is so often enjoyed in purer atmospheres,
but the panorama of the head-land was clothed in a soft,
magical sort of semi-distinctness, that rendered objects
sufficiently
obvious, and exceedingly beautiful. The rounded,
shorn swells of the land, hove upward to the eye, verdant
and smooth; while the fine oaks of the park formed a
shadowy background to the picture, inland. Seaward, the
ocean was glittering, like a reversed plane of the firmament,
far as eye could reach. If our own hemisphere, or rather this
latitude, may boast of purer skies than are enjoyed by the
mother country, the latter has a vast superiority in the tint
of the water. While the whole American coast is bounded
by a vast, dull-looking sheet of sea-green, the deep blue of
the wide ocean appears to be carried close home to the shores
of Europe. This glorious tint, from which the term of
ultra marine has been derived, is most remarkable in the
Mediterranean, that sea of delights; but it is met with, all
along the rock-bound coasts of the Peninsula of Spain and
Portugal, extending through the British Channel, until it is
in a measure lost on the shoals of the North Sea; to be
revived, however, in the profound depths of the ocean that
laves the wild and romantic coast of Norway.
'T is a glorious night! exclaimed Bluewater, as he
handed Mildred, the last, from the carriage; and one can
hardly wish to enter a cot, let it swing ever so lazily.
Sleep is out of the question, returned Mildred,
sorrowfully
.
These are nights in which even the weary are
reluctant to lose their consciousness; but who can sleep
while there is this uncertainty about dear Sir Wycherly.
I rejoice to hear you say this, Mildred,for so the
admiral had unconsciously, and unrepelled, begun to call his
sweet companionI rejoice to hear you say this, for I am
an inveterate star-gazer and moon-ite; and I shall hope to
persuade you and Mrs. Dutton to waste yet another hour,
with me, in walking on this height. Ah! yonder is Sam
Yoke, my coxswain, waiting to report the barge; I can
send Sir Gervaise's message to the surgeons by deputy, and
there will be no occasion for my hastening from this lovely
spot, and pleasant company.
The orders were soon given to the coxswain. A dozen
boats, it would seem, were in waiting for officers ashore,
notwithstanding the lateness of the hour; and directions
were sent for two of them to pull off, and obtain the medical
men. The coach was sent round to receive the latter, and
then all was tranquil, again, on the height. Mrs. Dutton
entered the house, to attend to some of her domestic
concerns
,
while the rear-admiral took the arm of Mildred, and
they walked, together, to the verge of the cliffs.
A fairer moonlight picture seldom offered itself to a
seaman's
eye, than that which now lay before the sight of
Admiral Bluewater and Mildred. Beneath them rode the
fleet; sixteen sail of different rigs, eleven of which, however,
were two-decked ships of the largest size then known in
naval warfare; and all of which were in that perfect order,
that an active and intelligent commander knows how to
procure
,
even from the dilatory and indifferent. If Admiral
Bluewater was conspicuous in manuvring a fleet, and in
rendering every vessel of a line that extended a league,
efficient
,
and that too, in her right place, Sir Gervaise Oakes
had the reputation of being one of the best seamen, in the
ordinary sense of the word, in England. No vessel under
his command, ever had a lubberly look; and no ship that
had any sailing in her, failed to have it brought out of her.
The vice-admiral was familiar with that all-important fact
one that members equally of Congress and of Parliament
are so apt to forget, or rather not to know at allthat the
efficiency of a whole fleet, as a fleet, is necessarily brought
down to the level of its worst ships. Of little avail is it,
that four or five vessels of a squadron sail fast, and work
well, if the eight or ten that remain, behave badly, and are
dull. A separation of the vessels is the inevitable consequence,
when the properties of all are thoroughly tried; and the
division of a force, is the first step towards its defeat; as its
proper concentration, is a leading condition of victory. As
the poorer vessels cannot imitate the better, the good are
compelled
to regulate their movements by the bad; which is at
once essentially bringing down the best ships of a fleet to
the level of its worst; the proposition with which we
commenced
.
Sir Gervaise Oakes was so great a favourite, that all he
asked was usually conceded to him. One of his conditions
was, that his vessels should sail equally well: If you give
me fast ships, he said, I can overtake the enemy; if dull,
the enemy can overtake me; and I leave you to say which
course will be most likely to bring on an action. At any
rate, give me
consorts;
not one flyer, and one drag; but
vessels that can keep within hail of each other, without
anchoring. The admiralty professed every desire to oblige
the gallant commander; and, as he was resolved never to
quit the Plantagenet until she was worn out, it was
indispensably
necessary to find as many fast vessels as possible,
to keep her company. The result was literally a fleet of
horses, as Galleygo used to call it; and it was generally
said in the service, that Oakes had a squadron of flyers,
if not a flying-squadron.
Vessels like these just mentioned, are usually symmetrical
and graceful to the eye, as well as fast. This fact was
apparent
to Mildred, accustomed as she was to the sight of
ships; and she ventured to express as much, after she and
her companion had stood quite a minute on the cliff, gazing
at the grand spectacle beneath them.
Your vessels look even handsomer than common,
Admiral
Bluewater, she said, though a ship, to me, is always
an attractive sight.
This is because they
are
handsomer than common, my
pretty critic. Vice-Admiral Oakes is an officer who will
no more tolerate an ugly ship in his fleet, than a peer of the
realm will marry any woman but one who is handsome;
unless indeed she happen to be surpassingly rich.
I have heard that men are accustomed to lose their
hearts under such an influence, said Mildred, laughing;
but I did not know before, that they were ever frank enough
to avow it!
The knowledge has been imparted by a prudent mother,
I suppose, returned the rear-admiral, in a musing manner:
I wish I stood sufficiently in the parental relation to you,
my young friend, to venture to give a little advice, also.
Never, before, did I feel so strong a wish to warn a human
being of a great danger that I fear is impending over her,
could I presume to take the liberty.
It is not a liberty, but a duty, to warn any one of a
danger that is known to ourselves, and not to the person
who incurs the risk. At least so it appears to the eyes of
a very young girl.
Yes, if the danger was of falling from these cliffs, or of
setting fire to a house, or of any other visible calamity.
The case is different, when young ladies, and setting fire to
the heart, are concerned.
Certainly, I can perceive the distinction, answered
Mildred, after a short pause; and can understand that the
same person who would not scruple to give the alarm against
any physical danger, would hesitate even at hinting at one
of a moral character. Nevertheless, if Admiral Bluewater
think a simple girl, like me, of sufficient importance to take
the trouble to interest himself in her welfare, I should hope
he would not shrink from pointing out this danger. It is a
terrible word to sleep on; and I confess, besides a little
uneasiness
,
to a good deal of curiosity to know more.
This is said, Mildred, because you are unaccustomed to
the shocks which the tongue of rude man may give your
sensitive feelings.
Unaccustomed! said Mildred, trembling so that the
weakness was apparent to her companion.
Unaccustomed
!
Alas! Admiral Bluewater, can this be so, after
what you have seen and heard!
Pardon me, dear child; nothing was farther from my
thoughts, than to wish to revive those unpleasant
recollections
.
If I thought I should be forgiven, I might venture,
yet, to reveal my secret; for never beforethough I
cannot
Vol. I.  14
tell the reason of so sudden and so extraordinary an
interest in one who is almost a stranger
Nononot a stranger, dear sir. After all that has
passed to-day; after you have been admitted, though it were
by accident, to one most sacred secret;after all that was
said in the carriage, and the terrible scenes my beloved
mother
went through in your presence so many years since,
you can never be a stranger to
us
, whatever may be your
own desire to fancy yourself one.
Girl, you do not fascinateyou do not charm me, but
you
bind
me to you in a way I did not think it in the power
of any human being to subjugate my feelings!
This was said with so much energy, that Mildred dropped
the arm she held, and actually recoiled a step, if not in
alarm, at least in surprise. But, on looking up into the face
of her companion, and perceiving large tears actually
glistening on his cheek, and seeing the hair that exposure
and mental cares had whitened more than time, all her
confidence
returned, and she resumed the place she had
abandoned
,
of her own accord, and as naturally as a daughter
would have clung to the side of a father.
I am sure, sir, my gratitude for this interest ought to be
quite equal to the honour it does me, Mildred said, earnestly.
And, now, Admiral Bluewater, do not hesitate to speak to
me with the frankness that a parent might use. I will listen
with the respect and deference of a daughter.
Then do listen to what I have to say, and make no
answer, if you find yourself wounded at the freedom I am
taking. It would seem that there is but one subject on which
a man, old fellow or young fellow, can speak to a lovely
young girl, when he gets her alone, under the light of a fine
moon;and that is love. Nay, start not again, my dear,
for, if I am about to speak on so awkward a subject, it is
not in my own behalf. I hardly know whether you will
think it in behalf of any one; as what I have to say, is not
an appeal to your affections, but a warning against bestowing
them.
A warning, Admiral Bluewater! Do you really think
that can be necessary?
Nay, my child, that is best known to yourself. Of one
thing I am certain; the young man I have in my eye, affects
to admire you, whether he does or not; and when young
women are led to believe they are loved, it is a strong appeal
to all their generous feelings to answer the passion, if not
with equal warmth, at least with something very like it.
Affects to admire, sir!And why should any one be at
the pains of
affecting
feelings towards me, that they do not
actually entertain? I have neither rank, nor money, to
bribe any one to be guilty of an hypocrisy so mean, and
which, in my case, would be so motiveless.
Yes, if it
were
motiveless to win the most beautiful
creature in England! But, no matter. We will not stop
to analyze motives, when
facts
are what we aim at. I
should think there must be some passion in this youth's
suit, and that will only make it so much the more dangerous
to its object. At all events, I feel a deep conviction that he
is altogether unworthy of you. This is a bold expression
of opinion on an acquaintance of a day; but there are such
reasons for it, that a man of my time of life, if unprejudiced,
can scarcely be deceived.
All this is very singular, sir, and I had almost used
your own word of `alarming,' replied Mildred, slightly
agitated by curiosity, but more amused. I shall be as
frank as yourself, and say that you judge the gentleman
harshly. Mr. Rotherham may not have all the qualities
that a clergyman ought to possess, but he is far from being
a bad man. Good or bad, however, it is not probable that
he will carry his transient partiality any farther than he
has gone already.
Mr. Rotherham!I have neither thought nor spoken
of the pious vicar at all!
Mildred was now sadly confused. Mr. Rotherham had
made his proposals for her, only the day before, and he had
been mildly, but firmly refused. The recent occurrence
was naturally uppermost in her mind; and the conjecture
that her rejected suitor, under the influence of wine, might
have communicated the state of his wishes, or what he
fancied
to be the state of his wishes, to her companion, was so
very easy, that she had fallen into the error, almost without
reflection.
I beg pardon, sirI really imagined, the confused girl
answered; but, it was a natural mistake for me to
suppose
you meant Mr. Rotherham, as he is the only person
who has ever spoken to my mother on the subject of
anything
like a preference for me.
I should have less fear of those who spoke to your
mother
,
Mildred, than of those who spoke only to
you
. As I
hate ambiguity, however, I will say, at once, that my
allusion
was to Mr. Wychecombe.
Mr. Wychecombe, Admiral Bluewater!and the
veteran
felt the arm that leaned on him tremble violently, a
sad confirmation of even more than he apprehended, or he
would not have been so abrupt. Surelysurelythe
warning you mean, cannot,
ought
not to apply to a
gentleman
of Mr. Wychecombe's standing and character!
Such is the world, Miss Dutton, and we old seamen, in
particular, get to know it, whether willingly or not. My
sudden interest in you, the recollection of former, but painful
scenes, and the events of the day, have made me watchful,
and, you will add, boldbut I am resolved to speak, even
at the risk of disobliging you for everand, in speaking, I
must say that I never met with a young man who has made
so unfavourable an impression on me, as this same Mr.
Wychecombe.
Mildred, unconsciously to herself, withdrew her arm, and
she felt astonished at her own levity, in so suddenly becoming
sufficiently intimate with a stranger to permit him thus to
disparage a confirmed friend.
I am sorry, sir, that you entertain so indifferent an
opinion of one who is, I believe, a general favourite, in this
part of the country, she answered, with a coldness that
rendered her manner marked.
I perceive I shall share the fate of all unwelcome
counsellors
,
but can only blame my own presumption. Mildred,
we live in momentous times, and God knows what is to
happen to myself, in the next few months; but, so strong is
the inexplicable interest that I feel in your welfare, that I
shall venture still to offend. I like not this Mr.
Wychecombe
,
who is so devout an admirer of yours  real or
affectedand, as to the liking of dependants for the heir of
a considerable estate, it is so much a matter of course, that
I count it nothing.
The heir of a considerable estate! repeated Mildred, in
a voice to which the natural sweetness returned, quietly
resuming
the arm, she had so unceremoniously dropped
Surely, dear sir, you are not speaking of Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe, Sir Wycherly's nephew.
Of whom else should I speak?Has he not been your
shadow the whole day?so marked in his attentions, as
scarce to deem it necessary to conceal his suit?
Has it really struck you thus, sir?I confess I did not
so consider it. We are so much at home at the Hall, that
we rather expect all of that family to be kind to us. But,
whether you are right in your conjecture, or not, Mr.
Thomas
Wychecombe can never be aught to meand as proof,
Admiral Bluewater, that I take your warning, as it is meant,
in kindness and sincerity, I will add, that he is not a very
particular favourite.
I rejoice to hear it! Now there is his namesake, our
young lieutenant, as gallant and as noble a fellow as ever
livedwould to Heaven he was not so wrapt up in his
profession
,
as to be insensible to any beauties, but those of a
ship. Were you my own daughter, Mildred, I could give
you to that lad, with as much freedom as I would give him
my estate, were he my son.
Mildred smiledand it was archly, though not without a
shade of sorrow, toobut she had sufficient self-command,
to keep her feelings to herself, and too much maiden reserve
not to shrink from betraying her weakness to one who, after
all, was little more than a stranger.
I dare say, sir, she answered, with an equivocation
which was perhaps venial, that your knowledge of the world
has judged both these gentlemen, rightly. Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe, notwithstanding all you heard from my poor
father, is not likely to think seriously of me; and I will
answer for my own feelings as regards
him
. I am, in no
manner, a proper person to become Lady Wychecombe;
and, I trust, I should have the prudence to decline the honour
were it even offered to me. Believe me, sir, my father
would have held a different language to-night, had it not
been for Sir Wycherly's wine, and the many loyal toasts
that were drunk. He
must
be conscious, in his reflecting
moments, that a child of his is unsuited to so high a station.
Our prospects in life were once better than they are now,
14 *
Admiral Bluewater; but they have never been such as to
raise these high expectations in us.
An officer's daughter may always claim to be a
gentlewoman
,
my dear; and, as such, you might become the wife
of a duke, did he love you. Since I find my warning
unnecessary
,
however, we will change the discourse. Did not
something extraordinary occur at this cliff, this morning, and
in connection with this very Mr. Thomas Wychecombe?
Sir Gervaise was my informant; but he did not relate the
matter very clearly.
Mildred explained the mistake, and then gave a vivid
description
of the danger in which the young lieutenant had
been placed, as well as of the manner in which he had
extricated
himself. She particularly dwelt on the extraordinary
presence of mind and resolution, by means of which he had
saved his life, when the stone first gave way beneath his foot.
All this is well, and what I should have expected from
so active and energetic a youth, returned the rear-admiral,
a little gravely; but, I confess I would rather it had not
happened. Your inconsiderate and reckless young men,
who risk their necks idly, in places of this sort, seldom have
much in them, after all. Had there been a motive, it would
have altered the case.
Oh! but there
was
a motive, sir; he was far from doing
so silly a thing for nothing!
And what was the motive, pray?I can see no
sufficient
reason why a man of sense should trust his person over
a cliff as menacing as this. One may approach it, by
moonlight
;
but in the day, I confess to you I should not fancy
standing as near it, as we do at this moment.
Mildred was much embarrassed for an answer. Her own
heart told her Wycherly's motive, but that it would never
do to avow to her companion, great as was the happiness
she felt in avowing it to herself. Gladly would she have
changed the discourse; but, as this could not be done, she
yielded to her native integrity of character, and told the
truth, as far as she told anything.
The flowers that grow on the sunny side of these rocks,
Admiral Bluewater, are singularly fragrant and beautiful,
she said; and hearing my mother and myself speaking
of them, and how much the former delighted in them, though
they were so seldom to be had, he just ventured over the
cliffnot here, where it is so
very
perpendicular, but yonder,
where one
may
cling to it, very well, with a little careand
it was in venturing a littlejust a
very
little too far, he
told me, himself, sir, to-day, after dinner,that the stone
broke, and the accident occurred. I do not think Mr.
Wycherly
Wychecombe in the least fool-hardy, and not at all
disposed to seek a silly admiration, by a silly exploit.
He has a most lovely and a most eloquent advocate,
returned the admiral, smiling, though the expression of his
countenance was melancholy, even to sadness; and he is
acquitted. I think few men of his years would hesitate
about risking their necks for flowers so fragrant and
beautiful
,
and so much coveted by
your
mother, Mildred.
And he a sailor, sir, who thinks so little of standing on
giddy places, and laughs at fears of this nature?
Quite true; though there are few cliffs on board ship.
Ropes are our sources of courage.
So I should think, by what passed to-day, returned
Mildred, laughing. Mr. Wycherly called out for a rope,
and we just threw him one, to help him out of his difficulty.
The moment he got his rope, though it was only yonder
small signal-halyards, he felt himself as secure as if he
stood up here, on the height, with acres of level ground around
him. I do not think he was frightened, at any time; but
when he got hold of that little rope, he was fairly valiant!
Mildred endeavoured to laugh at her own history, by
way of veiling her interest in the event; but her companion
was too old, and too discerning, to be easily deceived. He
continued silent, as he led her away from the cliff; and
when he entered the cottage, Mildred saw, by the nearer
light of the candles, that his countenance was still sad.
Admiral Bluewater remained half an hour longer in the
cottage, when he tore himself away, from a society which, for
him, possessed a charm that he could not account for, nor
yet scarcely estimate. It was past one, when he bid Mrs.
Dutton and her daughter adieu; promising, however, to see
them again, before the fleet sailed. Late as it was, the
mother and Mildred felt no disposition to retire, after
the exciting scenes they had gone through; but, feeling a
calm on their spirits, succeeding the rude interruption produced
by Dutton's brutality, they walked out on the cliff, to enjoy
the cool air, and the bland scenery of the head-land, at that
witching hour.
I should feel alarm at this particularity of attention, from
most men, my child, observed the prudent mother, as they
left the house; but the years, and especially the character
of Admiral Bluewater, are pledges that he meditates nothing
foolish, nor wrong.
His
years
would be sufficient, mother, cried Mildred,
laughingfor her laugh came easily, since the opinion she
had just before heard of Wycherly's meritleaving the
character out of the question.
For you, perhaps, Mildred, but not for himself. Men
rarely seem to think themselves too old to win the young of
our sex; and what they want in attraction, they generally
endeavour to supply by flattery and artifice. But, I acquit
our new friend of all that.
Had he been my own father, dearest mother, his
language
,
and the interest he took in me, could not have been
more paternal. I have found it truly delightful to listen to
such counsel, from one of his sex; for, in general, they do
not treat me in so sincere and fatherly a manner.
Mrs. Dutton's lip quivered, her eye-lids trembled too, and
a couple of tears fell on her cheeks.
It
is
new to you, Mildred, to listen to the language of
disinterested affection and wisdom from one of his years and
sex. I do not censure your listening with pleasure, but
merely tell you to remember the proper reserve of your
years and character. Hist! there are the sounds of his
barge's oars.
Mildred listened, and the measured but sudden jerk of
oars in the rullocks, ascended on the still night-air, as
distinctly
as they might have been heard in the boat. At the
next instant, an eight-oared barge moved swiftly out from
under the cliff, and glided steadily on towards a ship, that
had one lantern suspended from the end of her gaff,
another
in her mizzen-top, and the small night-flag of a
rear-admiral
,
fluttering at her mizzen-royal-mast-head. The
cutter lay nearest to the landing, and, as the barge
approached
her, the ladies heard the loud hail of boat-ahoy!
The answer was also audible; though given in the mild
gentleman-like voice of Bluewater, himself. It was simply,
rear-admiral's flag. A death-like stillness succeeded this
annunciation of the rank of the officer in the passing boat,
interrupted only by the measured jerk of the oars. Once
or twice, indeed, the keen hearing of Mildred made her fancy
she heard the common dip of the eight oars, and the wash
of the water, as they rose from the element, to gain a
renewed
purchase. As each vessel was approached, however,
the hail and the answer were renewed, the quiet of midnight,
in every instance, succeeding. At length the barge was
seen shooting along on the quarter of the Csar, the
rear-admiral's own ship, and the last hail was given. This
time, there was a slight stir in the vessel; and, soon after
the sound of the oars ceased, the lanterns descended from the
stations they had held, since nightfall. Two or three other
lanterns were still displayed at the gaffs of other vessels,
the signs that their captains were not on board; though
whether they were ashore, or visiting in the fleet, were facts
best known to themselves. The Plantagenet, however, had
no light; it being known that Sir Gervaise did not intend
to come off that night.
When all this was over, Mrs. Dutton and Mildred sought
their pillows, after an exciting day, and, to them, one far
more momentous than they were then aware of.
CHAPTER XI.
When I consider life, 't is all a cheat;
Yet fool'd with hope, men favour the deceit;
Trust on, and think to-morrow will repay;
To-morrow's falser than the former day.
Dryden
.
Although
Admiral Bluewater devoted the minimum of
time to sleep, he was not what the French term
matinal
.
There is a period in the morning, on board of a ship of war,
that of washing decks,which can best be compared to the
discomfort of the American purification, yclep'd a
housecleaning
.
This occurs daily, about the rising of the sun;
and no officer, whose rank raises him above mingling with
the duty, ever thinks, except on extraordinary occasions
that may require his presence for other purposes, of intruding
on its sacred mysteries. It is a rabid hour in a ship, and
the wisest course, for all idlers, and all watch-officers, who
are not on duty, is to keep themselves under hatches, if
their convenience will possibly allow it. He who wears a
flag, however, is usually reposing in his cot, at this critical
moment; or, if risen at all, he is going through similar
daily ablutions of his own person.
Admiral Bluewater was in the act of opening his eyes,
when the splash of the first bucket of water was heard on
the deck of the Csar, and he lay in the species of
enjoyment
which is so peculiar to naval men, after they have
risen to the station of commander; a sort of semi-trance, in
which the mind summons all the ancient images, connected
with squalls; reefing top-sails in the rain; standing on the
quarter of a yard, shouting haul out to leeward; peering
over the weather hammock-cloths to eye the weather, with
the sleet pricking the face like needles;and, washing
decks! These dreamy images of the past, however, are
summoned merely to increase the sense of present
enjoyment
.
They are so many well-contrived foils, to give
greater brilliancy to the diamonds of a comfortable cot, and
the entire consciousness of being no longer exposed to an
untimely summons on deck.
Our rear-admiral, nevertheless, was not a vulgar dreamer,
on such occasions. He thought little of personal comforts
at any time, unless indeed when personal discomforts
obtruded
themselves on his attention; he knew little, or nothing,
of the science of the table, whereas his friend was a knowing
cook, and in his days of probation had been a distinguished
caterer; but he was addicted to a sort of dreaming of his
own, even when the sun stood in the zenith, and he was
walking the poop, in the midst of a circle of his officers.
Still, he could not refrain from glancing back at the past,
that morning, as plash after plash was heard, and recalling
the time when
magna pars quorum
FUIT. At this
delectable
instant, the ruddy face of a young gentleman
appeared
in his state-room door, and, first ascertaining that
the eyes of his superior were actually open, the youngster
said
A note from Sir Gervaise, Admiral Bluewater.
Very well, sir,taking the note.How 's the wind,
Lord Geoffrey?
An Irishman's hurricane, sir; right up and down. Our
first says, sir, he never knew finer channel weather.
Our first is a great astrologer. Is the fleet riding flood
yet?
No sir; it 's slack-water; or, rather, the ebb is just
beginning to make.
Go on deck, my lord, and see if the Dover has hove in
any upon her larboard bower, so as to bring her more on
our quarter.
Ay-ay-sir, and this cadet of one of the most illustrious
houses of England, skipped up the ladder to ascertain his
fact.
In the meanwhile, Bluewater stretched out an arm, drew
a curtain from before his little window, fumbled for some
time among his clothes before he got his spectacles, and then
opened the note. This early epistle was couched in the
following words
Dear Blue:
I write this in a bed big enough to ware a ninety in.
I 've been athwart ships half the night, without knowing it,
Galleygo has just been in to report `our fleet' all well, and
the ships riding flood. It seems there is a good look-out
from the top of the house, where part of the roads are visible,
Magrath, and the rest of them, have been at poor Sir
Wycherly
all night, I learn, but he remains down by the head,
yet. I am afraid the good old man will never be in trim
again. I shall remain here, until something is decided; and
as we cannot expect our orders until next day after
to-morrow
,
at the soonest, one might as well be here, as on board.
Come ashore and breakfast with us; when we can consult
about the propriety of remaining, or of abandoning the
wreck. Adieu,
Oakes
,
Rear-Admiral Bluewater.
P. S.There was a little occurrence last night,
connected
with Sir Wycherly's will, that makes me
particularly
anxious to see you, as early as possible, this morning.
O.
Sir Gervaise, like a woman, had written his mind in his
postscript. The scene of the previous night had forcibly
presented itself to his recollection on awakening, and calling
for his writing-desk, he had sent off this note, at the dawn of
day, with the wish of having as many important witnesses
as he could well obtain, at the interview he intended to
demand, at the earliest practicable hour.
What the deuce can Oakes have to do with Sir
Wycherly
Wychecombe's will? thought the rear-admiral.
By the way, that puts me in mind of my own; and of my
own recent determination. What are my poor 30,000 to
a man with the fortune of Lord Bluewater. Having neither
a wife nor child, brother nor sister of my own, I 'll do what
I please with my money. Oakes
wont
have it; besides,
he 's got enough of his own, and to spare. An estate of
7000 a year, besides heaps of prize-money funded. I dare
say, he has a good 12,000 a year, and nothing but a
nephew to inherit it all. I 'm determined to do as I please
with my money. I made every shilling of it, and I 'll give
it to whom I please.
The whole time, Admiral Bluewater lay with his eyes shut,
and with a tongue as motionless as if it couldn't stir. With
all his
laissez aller
manner, however, he had the
promptitude
of a sailor, when his mind was made up to do a thing,
though he always performed it in his own peculiar mode.
To rise, dress, and prepare to quit his state-room, occupied
him but a short time; and he was seated before his own
writing-desk, in the after-cabin, within twenty minutes after
the thoughts just recorded, had passed through his mind.
His first act was to take a folded paper from a private
drawer, and glance his eye carelessly over it. This was
the will in favour of Lord Bluewater. It was expressed in
very concise terms, filling only the first side of a page.
This will he copied,
verbatim et literatim
,
leaving blanks
for the name of the legatee, and appointing Sir Gervaise
Oakes his executor, as in the will already executed. When
finished in this manner, he set about filling up the blanks.
For a passing instant, he felt tempted to insert the name of
the Pretender; but, smiling at his own folly, he wrote that
of Mildred Dutton, daughter of Francis Dutton, a master in
His Majesty's Navy, in all the places that it was requisite
so to do. Then he affixed the seal, and, folding all the
upper part of the sheet over, so as to conceal the contents,
he rang a little silver bell, which always stood at his elbow.
The outer cabin-door was opened by the sentry, who thrust
his head in at the opening.
I want one of the young gentlemen, sentry, said the
rear-admiral.
The door closed, and, in another minute, the smiling face
of Lord Geoffrey was at the entrance of the after-cabin.
Who 's on deck, my lord, demanded Bluewater,
beside
the watch?
No one, sir. All the idlers keep as close as foxes, when
the decks are getting it; and as for any of our snorers
showing their faces before six bells, it 's quite out of the
question, sir.
Some one must surely be stirring in the gun-room, by
this time! Go and ask the chaplain and the captain of
marines to do me the favour to step into the cabinor the
first lieutenant; or the master; or any of the idlers.
The midshipman was gone two or three minutes, when
he returned with the purser and the chaplain.
The first lieutenant is in the forehold, sir; all the
marines
have got their dead-lights still in, and the master is
working-up his log, the gun-room steward says. I hope
these will do, sir; they are the greatest idlers in the ship, I
believe.
Lord Geoffrey Cleveland was the second son of the third
duke in the English empire, and he knew it, as well as any
one on board. Admiral Bluewater had no slavish respect for
rank; nevertheless, like all men educated under an
aristocratic
system, he was influenced by the feeling to a degree
of which he himself was far from being conscious. This
young scion of nobility was not in the least favoured in
matters of duty, for this his own high spirit would have
resented
;
but he dined in the cabin twice as often as any
other midshipman on board, and had obtained for himself a
Vol. I.  15
sort of license for the tongue, that emboldened him to utter
what passed for smart things in the cockpit and gun-room,
and which, out of all doubt, were pert things everywhere.
Neither the chaplain nor the purser took offence at his
liberties
on the present occasion; and, as for the rear-admiral,
he had not attended to what had been uttered. As soon,
however, as he found others in his cabin, he motioned to
them to approach his desk, and pointed to the paper, folded
down, as mentioned.
Every prudent man, he said, and, especially every
prudent sailor and soldier, in a time of war, ought to be
provided with a will. This is mine, just drawn up, by
myself
;
and that instrument is an old one, which I now destroy
in your presence. I acknowledge this to be my hand and
seal, writing his name, and touching the seal with a finger
as he spoke; affixed to this my last will and testament.
Will you have the kindness to act as witnesses?
When the chaplain and purser had affixed their names,
there still remained a space for a third signature. This, by
a sign from his superior, the laughing midshipman filled
with his own signature.
I hope you 've recollected, sir, cried the boy, with glee,
as he took his seat to obey; that the Bluewaters and
Clevelands are related. I shall be grievously disappointed,
when this will is proved, if my name be not found
somewhere
in it!
So shall I, too, my lord, drily returned Bluewater;
for, I fully expect it will appear as a witness; a character
that is at once fatal to all claims as a legatee.
Well, sir, I suppose flag-officers can do pretty much as
they please with their money, since they do pretty much as
they please with the ships, and all in them. I must lean
so much the harder on my two old aunts, as I appear to
have laid myself directly athwart-hawse of fortune, in this
affair!
Gentlemen, said the rear-admiral, with easy courtesy;
I regret it is not in my power to have your company at
dinner, to-day, as I am summoned ashore by Sir Gervaise,
and it is uncertain when I can get off, again; but to-morrow
I shall hope to enjoy that pleasure.
The officers bowed, expressed their acknowledgments,
accepted
the invitation, bowed once or twice more each, and
left the cabin, with the exception of the midshipman.
Well, sir, exclaimed Bluewater, a little surprised at
finding he was not alone, after a minute of profound reverie;
to what request am I indebted still to the pleasure of your
presence?
Why, sir, it 's just forty miles to my father's house in
Cornwall, and I know the whole family is there; so I just
fancied, that by bending on two extra horses, a chaise might
make the Park gates in about five hours; and by getting
under way on the return passage, to-morrow about this
time, the old Csar would never miss a crazy reefer, more
or less.
Very ingeniously put, young gentleman, and quite
plausible
.
When I was of your age, I was four years without
once seeing either father or mother.
Yes sir, but that was such a long time ago! Boys
can't stand it, half as well now, as they did then, as all old
people say.
The rear-admiral's lips moved slightly, as if a smile
struggled about his mouth, and then his face suddenly lost
the expression, in one approaching to sadness.
You know, Geoffrey, I am not commander-in-chief. Sir
Gervaise alone can give a furlough.
Very true, sir; but whatever you ask of Sir Gervaise,
he always does; more especially as concerns us of your
flag-ship.
Perhaps that is true. But, my boy, we live in serious
times, and we may sail in an hour's notice. Are you
ignorant
that Prince Charles Edward has landed in Scotland,
and that the Jacobites are up and doing? If the French back
him, we may have our hands full here, in the channel.
Then my dear mother must go without a kiss, for the
next twelvemonth! cried the gallant boy, dashing a hand
furtively across his eyes, in spite of his resolution. The
throne of old England must be upheld, even though not a
mother
nor a sister in the island, see a midshipman in years!
Nobly said, Lord Geoffrey, and it shall be known at
head-quarters.
Your
family is whig; and you do well, at
your time of life, to stick to the family politics.
A small run on the shore, sir, would be a great pleasure,
after six months at sea?
You must ask Captain Stowel's leave for that. You
know I never interfere with the duty of the ship.
Yes, sir, but there are so many of us, and all have a
hankering after
terra firma
. Might I just say, that I have
your permission, to ask Captain Stowel, to let me have a
run on the cliffs?
You may do
that
, my lord, if you wish it; but Stowel
knows that he can do as he pleases.
He would be a queer captain of a man-of-war, if he
didn't, sir! Thank you, Admiral Bluewater; I will write
to my mother, and I know she 'll be satisfied with the reason
I shall give her, for not coming to see her. Good-morning,
sir.
Good-morning,then, when the boy's hand was on
the lock of the cabin-doormy lord?
Did you wish to say anything more, sir?
When you write, remember me kindly to the Duchess.
We were intimate, when young people; and, I might say,
loved each other.
The midshipman promised to do as desired; and then
the rear-admiral was left alone. He walked the cabin, for
half an hour, musing on what he had done in relation to
his property, and on what he ought to do, in relation to the
Pretender; when he suddenly summoned his coxswain, gave
a few directions, and sent an order on deck to have his
barge manned. The customary reports went their usual
rounds, and reached the cabin in about three minutes more;
Lord Geoffrey bringing them down, again.
The barge is manned, sir, said the lad, standing near
the cabin-door, rigged out in the neat, go-ashore-clothes of
a midshipman.
Have you seen Captain Stowel, my lord? demanded
the rear-admiral.
I have, sir; and he has given me permission to drift
along shore, until sunset; to be off with the evening gun of
the vice-admiral.
Then do me the favour to take a seat in my barge, if
you are quite ready.
This offer was accepted, and, in a few minutes, all the
ceremonies of the deck had been observed, and the
rear-admiral
was seated in his barge. It was now so late, that
etiquette had fair play, and no point was omitted on the
occasion
.
The captain was on deck, in person, as well as
gun-room officers enough to represent their body; the guard
was paraded, under its officers; the drums rolled; the
boatswain
piped six side boys over, and Lord Geoffrey skipped
down first into the boat, remaining respectfully standing,
until his superior was seated. All these punctilios observed,
the boat was shoved off from the vessel's side, the eight oars
dropped, as one, and the party moved towards the shore.
Every cutter, barge, yawl, or launch that was met, and which
did not contain an officer of rank itself, tossed its oars, as
this barge, with the rear-admiral's flag fluttering in its bow,
passed, while the others lay on theirs, the gentlemen
saluting
with their hats. In this manner the barge passed the
fleet, and approached the shore. At the landing, a little
natural quay formed by a low flat rock, there was a general
movement, as the rear-admiral's flag was seen to draw
near; and even the boats of captains were shoved aside, to
give the naval
pas
. As soon, however, as the foot of
Bluewater
touched the rock, the little flag was struck; and, a
minute later, a cutter, with only a lieutenant in her, coming
in, that officer ordered the barge to make way for
him
, with
an air of high and undisputed authority.
Perhaps there was not a man in the British marine, to
whom the etiquette of the service gave less concern, than to
Bluewater. In this respect, he was the very reverse of his
friend; for Sir Gervaise was a punctilious observer, and a
rigid enforcer of all the prescribed ceremonials. This was
by no means the only professional point on which these two
distinguished officers differed. It has already been
mentioned
,
that the rear-admiral was the best tactician in
England
,
while the vice-admiral was merely respectable in that
branch of his duty. On the other hand, Sir Gervaise was
deemed the best practical seaman afloat, so far as a single
ship was concerned, while Bluewater had no particular
reputation
in that way. Then, as to discipline, the same
distinction
existed. The commander-in-chief was a little of a
martinet
, exacting compliance with the most minute
regulations
;
while his friend, even when a captain, had thrown
15 *
the police duty of his ship very much on what is called the
executive officer; or the first lieutenant; leaving to that
important
functionary, the duty of devising, as well as of
executing
the system by which order and cleanliness were
maintained in the vessel. Nevertheless, Bluewater had his
merit even in this peculiar feature of the profession. He
had made the best captain of the fleet to his friend, that had
ever been met with. This office, which, in some measure,
corresponds to that of an adjutant-general on shore, was
suited to his generalizing and philosophical turn of mind;
and he had brought all its duties within the circle and control
of clear and simple principles, which rendered them pleasant
and easy. Then, too, whenever he commanded in chief, as
frequently happened, for a week or two at a time, Sir
Gervaise
being absent, it was remarked that the common service
of the fleet went on like clock-work; his mind seeming to
embrace generals, when it refused to descend to details. In
consequence of these personal peculiarities, the captains
often observed, that Bluewater ought to have been the senior,
and Oakes the junior; and then, their joint commands would
have produced perfection: but these criticisms must be set
down, in a great measure, to the natural propensity to find
fault, and an inherent desire in men, even when things are
perfectly well in themselves, to prove their own superiority,
by pointing out modes and means by which they might be
made much better. Had the service been on land, this
opinion might possibly have had more practical truth in it;
but, the impetuosity and daring of Sir Gervaise, were not
bad substitutes for tactics, in the straight-forward combats
of ships. To resume the narrative.
When Bluewater landed, he returned the profound and
general salute of all on or near the rock, by a sweeping, but
courteous bow, which was nevertheless given in a vacant,
slovenly manner; and immediately began to ascend the
ravine. He had actually reached the grassy acclivity above,
before he was at all aware of any person's being near him.
Turning, he perceived that the midshipman was at his heels,
respect alone preventing one of the latter's active limbs and
years from skipping past his superior on the ascent. The
admiral recollected how little there was to amuse one of the
boy's habits in a place like Wychecombe, and he
good-naturedly
determined to take him along with himself.
You are little likely to find any diversion here, Lord
Geoffrey, he said; if you will accept of the society
of a dull old fellow, like myself, you shall see all I see, be
it more or less.
I 've shipped for the cruise, sir, and am ready and happy,
too, to follow your motions, with or without signals,
returned
the laughing youngster. I suppose Wychecombe
is about as good as Portsmouth, or Plymouth; and I 'm sure
these green fields are handsomer than the streets of any
dirty town I ever entered.
Ay, green fields are, indeed, pleasant to the eyes of us
sailors, who see nothing but water, for months at a time.
Turn to the right, if you please, my lord; I wish to call at
yonder signal-station, on my way to the Hall.
The boy, as is not usual with lads of his age, inclined in
the way he was told to go, and in a few minutes both
stood on the head-land. As it would not have done for the
master to be absent from his staff, during the day, with a
fleet in the roads, Dutton was already at his post, cleanly
dressed as usual, but trembling again with the effect of the
last night's debauch on his nerves. He arose, with great
deference of manner, to receive the rear-admiral, and not
without many misgivings of conscience; for, while memory
furnished a tolerable outline of what had occurred in the
interview between himself and his wife and daughter, wine
had lost its influence, and no longer helped to sustain his
self-command. He was much relieved, however, by the
discreet manner in which he was met by Bluewater.
How is Sir Wycherly? inquired the admiral saluting
the master, as if nothing had happened; a note from Sir
Gervaise
,
written about day-break, tells me he was not, then,
essentially better.
I wish it were in my power to give you any good news,
sir. He must be conscious, notwithstanding; for Dick, his
groom, has just ridden over with a note from Mr.
Rotherham
,
to say that the excellent old baronet particularly desires
to see my wife and daughter; and that the coach will be
here, to take them over in a few minutes. If you are bound
to the Hall, this morning, sir, I 'm certain the ladies would
be delighted to give you a seat.
Then I will profit by their kindness, returned
Bluewater
,
seating himself on the bench at the foot of the staff;
more especially, if you think they will excuse my adding
Lord Geoffrey Cleveland, one of Stowel's midshipmen, to
the party. He has entered, to follow my motions, with or
without signals.
Dutton uncovered again, and bowed profoundly, at this
announcement of the lad's name and rank; the boy
himself
,
taking the salute in an off-hand and indifferent way,
like one already wearied with vulgar adulation, while he
gazed about him, with some curiosity, at the head-land and
flag-staff.
This a good look-out, sir, observed the midshipman;
and one that is somewhat loftier than our cross-trees. A
pair of sharp eyes might see everything that passes within
twenty miles; and, as a proof of it, I shall be the first to
sing out, `sail, hoe!'
Where-away, my young lord? said Dutton, fidgeting,
as if he had neglected his duty, in the presence of a
superior
;
I 'm sure, your lordship can see nothing but the
fleet at anchor, and a few boats passing between the different
ships and the landing!
Where-away, sure enough, youngster? added the
admiral
.
I see some gulls glancing along the surface of the
water, a mile or two outside the ships, but nothing like a
sail.
The boy caught up Dutton's glass, which lay on the seat,
and, in a minute, he had it levelled at the expanse of water.
It was some little time, and not without much sighting along
the barrel of the instrument, that he got it to suit himself.
Well, Master Sharp-eyes, said Bluewater, drily, is it
a Frenchman, or a Spaniard?
Hold on, a moment, sir, until I can get this awkward
glass to bear on it.  Ay  now I have hershe's but a
speck, at the bestroyals and head of top-gallant-sails
no sir, by George, it 's our own cutter, the Active, with her
squaresail set, and the heads of her lower sails just rising.
I know her by the way she carries her gaff.
The Active!that betokens news, observed Bluewater,
thoughtfullyfor the march of events, at that moment, must
necessarily bring on a crisis in his own career. Sir
Gervaise
sent her to look into Cherbourg.
Yes sir; we all know thatand, there she comes to tell
us, I hope, that Monsieur de Vervillin has, at last, made up
his mind to come out and face us, like a man. Will you
look at the sail, sir?
Bluewater took the glass, and sweeping the horizon, he
soon caught a view of his object. A short survey sufficed,
for one so experienced, and he handed the glass back to the
boy.
You have quick eyes, sir, he said, as he did so; that
is a cutter, certainly, standing in for the roads, and I believe
you may be right in taking her for the Active.
'T is a long way to know so small a craft! observed
Dutton, who also took his look at the stranger.
Very true, sir, answered the boy; but one ought to
tell a friend as far as he can see him. The Active carries
a longer and a lower gaff, than any other cutter in the navy,
which is the way we all tell her from the Gnat, the cutter
we have with us.
I am glad to find your lordship is so close an observer,
returned the complaisant Dutton; a certain sign, my lord,
that your lordship will make a good sailor, in time.
Geoffrey is a good sailor, already, observed the
admiral
,
who knew that the youngster was never better pleased,
than when he dropped the distance of using his title, and
spoke to, or of him, as of a connection; which, in truth, he
was. He has now been with me four years; having
joined when he was only twelve. Two more years will
make an officer of him.
Yes sir, said Dutton, bowing first to one, and then to
the other. Yes sir; his lordship may well look forward
to that, with
his
particular merit,
your
esteemed favour, and
his
own
great name. Ah! sir, they 've caught a sight of
the stranger in the fleet, and bunting is at work, already.
In anchoring his ships, Admiral Bluewater had kept them
as close together, as the fog rendered safe; for one of
the great difficulties of a naval commander is to retain his
vessels in compact order, in thick or heavy weather. Orders
had been given, however, for a sloop and a frigate to weigh,
and stretch out into the offing a league or two, as soon as
the fog left them, the preceding day, in order to sweep as
wide a reach of the horizon as was convenient. In order
to maintain their ground in a light wind, and with a strong
tide running, these two cruisers had anchored; one, at the
distance of a league from the fleet, and the other, a mile or
two farther outside, though more to the eastward. The sloop
lay nearest to the stranger, and signals were flying at her
main-royal-mast-head, which the frigate was repeating, and
transmitting to the flag-ship of the commander-in-chief.
Bluewater was so familiar with all the ordinary signals, that
it was seldom he had recourse to his book for the
explanations
;
and, in the present instance, he saw at once that it was
the Active's number that was shown. Other signals,
however
,
followed, which it surpassed the rear-admiral's
knowledge
to read, without assistance; from all which he was
satisfied that the stranger brought intelligence of importance,
and which could only be understood by referring to the
private signal-book.
While these facts were in the course of occurrence, the
coach arrived to convey Mrs. Dutton and Mildred to the
Hall. Bluewater now presented himself to the ladies, and
was received as kindly as they had separated from him a
few hours before; nor were the latter displeased at hearing
he was to be their companion back to the dwelling of Sir
Wycherly.
I fear this summons bodes evil tidings, said Mrs.
Dutton
;
he would hardly think of desiring to see us, unless
something quite serious were on his mind; and the
messenger
said he was no better.
We shall learn all, my dear lady, when we reach the
Hall, returned Bluewater; and the sooner we reach it,
the sooner our doubts will be removed. Before we enter
the carriage, let me make you acquainted with my young
friend, Lord Geoffrey Cleveland, whom I have presumed to
invite to be of the party.
The handsome young midshipman was well received,
though Mrs. Dutton had been too much accustomed, in early
life, to see people of condition, to betray the same deference
as her husband for the boy's rank. The ladies occupied, as
usual, the hind seat of the coach, leaving that in front to
their male companions. The arrangement accidentally
brought Mildred and the midshipman opposite each other; a
circumstance that soon attracted the attention of the
admiral
,
in a way that was a little odd; if not remarkable.
There is a charm in youth, that no other period of life
posesses
;
infancy, with its helpless beauty, scarcely seizing
upon the imagination and senses with an equal force. Both
the young persons in question, possessed this advantage in
a high degree; and had there been no other peculiarity, the
sight might readily have proved pleasing to one of
Bluewater's
benevolence and truth of feeling. The boy was turned
of sixteen; an age in England when youth does not yet put
on the appearance of manhood; and he retained all the
evidences of a gay, generous boyhood, rendered a little
piquant
, by the dash of archness, roguery, and fun, that a
man-of-war is tolerably certain to impart to a lad of spirit.
Nevertheless, his countenance retained an expression of
ingenuousness and of sensitive feeling, that was singularly
striking in one of his sex, and which, in spite of her beauty
of feature, hair, and complexion, formed the strongest
attraction in the loveliness of Mildred; that expression,
which had so much struck and charmed Bluewaterhaunted
him, we might addsince the previous day, by appearing
so familiar, even while so extraordinary, and for which he
had been unable to recollect a counterpart. As she now
sat, face to face with Lord Geoffrey, to his great surprise,
the rear-admiral found much of the same character of this
very expression in the handsome boy, as in the lovely
girl. It is true, the look of ingenuousness and of sensitive
feeling, was far less marked in young Cleveland, than in
Mildred, and there was little general resemblance of feature
or countenance between the two; still, the first was to be
found in both, and so distinctly, as to be easily traced, when
placed in so close contact. Geoffrey Cleveland had the
reputation
of being like his mother; and, furnished with this
clue, the fact suddenly flashed on Bluewater's mind, that the
being whom Mildred so nearly and strikingly resembled,
was a deceased sister of the Duchess, and a beloved cousin
of his own. Miss Hedworth, the young lady in question,
had long been dead; but, all who had known her, retained
the most pleasing impressions equally of her charms of
person and of mind. Between her and Bluewater there had
existed a tender friendship, in which, however, no shade of
passion had mingled; a circumstance that was in part owing
to the difference in their years, Captain Bluewater having
been nearly twice his young relative's age; and in part,
probably
,
to the invincible manner in which the latter seemed
wedded to his profession, and his ship. Agnes Hedworth,
notwithstanding, had been very dear to our sailor, from a
variety of causes,far more so, than her sister, the Duchess,
though
she
was a favouriteand the rear-admiral, when his
mind glanced rapidly through the chain of association, that
traced the accidental resemblance of Mildred to this esteemed
object, had a sincere delight in finding he had thus been
unconsciously attracted by one whose every look and smile
now forcibly reminded him of the countenance of a being
whom, in her day, he had thought so near perfection. This
delight, however, was blended with sadness, on various
accounts
;
and the short excursion proved to be so melancholy,
that no one was sorry when it terminated.
CHAPTER XII.
Nat.
Truly, Master Holofernes, the epithets are sweetly varied,
like a scholar, at the least: But, sir, I assure ye, it was a buck of
the first head.
Hol.
Sir Nathaniel,
haud credo
.
Bull.
'T was not a
haud credo
, 't was a pricket.
Love's Labour Lost
.
Every
appearance of the jolly negligence which had been
so characteristic of life at Wychecombe-Hall, had vanished,
when the old coach drew up in the court, to permit the
party it had brought from the station to alight. As no one
was expected but Mrs. Dutton and her daughter, not even a
footman appeared to open the door of the carriage; the
vulgar-minded usually revenging their own homage to the
powerful, by manifesting as many slights as possible to the
weak. Galleygo let the new-comers out, and, consequently,
he was the first person of whom inquiries were made, as to
the state of things in the house.
Well, said Admiral Bluewater, looking earnestly at
the steward; how is Sir Wycherly, and what is the
news?
Sir Wycherly is still on the doctor's list, your honour;
and I expects his case is set down as a hard'un. We's as
well as can be expected, and altogether in good heart. Sir
Jarvy turned out with the sun, thof he didn't turn in 'till
the middle-watch was half goneor
two
bells, as they calls
'em aboard this house
four
bells, as we should say in the
old Planter  and chickens, I hears, has riz, a shillin' a
head, since our first boat landed.
It's a melancholy business, Mrs. Dutton; I fear there
can be little hope.
Yes it's all
that
, Admiral Blue, continued Galleygo,
following the party into the house, no one but himself
hearing
a word he uttered; and 't will be worse, afore it's
any better. They tells me potaties has taken a start, too;
and, as all the b'ys of all the young gentlemen in the fleet
is out, like so many wild locusts of Hegypt, I expects
nothing
better than as our mess will fare as bad as sogers on
a retreat.
In the hall, Tom Wychecombe, and his namesake, the
lieutenant, met the party. From the formal despondency of
the first, everything they apprehended was confirmed. The
last, however, was more cheerful, and not altogether without
hope; as he did not hesitate openly to avow.
For myself, I confess I think Sir Wycherly much
better
,
he said; although the opinion is not sanctioned by
that of the medical men. His desiring to see these ladies is
favourable; and then cheering news for him has been
brought back, already, by the messenger sent, only eight
hours since, for his kinsman, Sir Reginald Wychecombe.
He has sensibly revived since that report was brought in.
Ah! my dear namesake, rejoined Tom, shaking his
head, mournfully; you cannot know my beloved uncle's
constitution and feelings as well as I! Rely on it, the
medical
men are right; and your hopes deceive you. The
Vol. I.  16
sending for Mrs. Dutton and Miss Mildred, both of whom
my honoured uncle respects and esteems, looks more like
leave-taking than anything else; and, as to Sir Reginald
Wychecombe,  though a relative, beyond a question,  I
think there has been some mistake in sending for him; since
he is barely an acquaintance of the elder branch of the
family, and he is of the half-blood.
Half
what, Mr. Thomas Wychecombe? demanded
the vice-admiral so suddenly, behind the speaker, as to
cause all to start; Sir Gervaise having hastened to meet the
ladies and his friend, as soon as he knew of their arrival.
I ask pardon, sir, for my abrupt inquiry; but, as
I
was
the means of sending for Sir Reginald Wychecombe, I feel
an interest in knowing his exact relationship to my host?
Tom started, and even paled, at this sudden question;
then the colour rushed into his temples; he became calmer,
and replied.
Half-blood
, Sir Gervaise, he said, steadily. This is
an affinity that puts a person altogether out of the line of
succession; and, of course, removes any necessity, or wish,
to see Sir Reginald.
Half-
blood
hey! Atwood? muttered the vice-admiral,
turning away towards his secretary, who had followed him
down stairs. This may be the solution, after all! Do
you happen to know what half-
blood
means? It cannot
signify that Sir Reginald comes from one of those, who have
no fatherall their ancestry consisting only of a mother?
I should think not, Sir Gervaise; in that case, Sir
Reginald would scarcely be considered of so honourable a
lineage, as he appears to be. I have not the smallest idea,
sir, what half-
blood
means; and, perhaps, it may not be
amiss to inquire of the medical gentlemen. Magrath is up
stairs; possibly he can tell us.
I rather think it has something to do with the law. If
this out-of-the-way place, now, could furnish even a lubberly
attorney, we might learn all about it. Harkee, Atwood;
you must stand by to make Sir Wycherly's will, if he says
anything more about ithave you got the heading all
written
out, as I desired.
It is quite ready, Sir Gervaisebeginning, as usual,
`In the name of God, Amen.' I have even ventured so far
as to describe the testator's style and residence, &c. &c.
`I, Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, Bart., of Wychecombe
Hall, Devon, do make and declare this to be my last will
and testament, &c. &c.' Nothing is wanting but the devises,
as the lawyers call them. I can manage a will, well enough,
Sir Gervaise, I believe. One of mine has been in the courts,
now, these five years, and they tell me it sticks there, as
well as if it had been drawn in the Middle Temple.
Ay, I know your skill. Still, there can be no harm in
just asking Magrath; though I think it must be law, after
all! Run up and ask him, Atwood, and bring me the
answer in the drawing-room, where I see Bluewater has
gone with his convoy; andharkeetell the surgeons to
let us know the instant the patient says anything about his
temporal affairs. The twenty thousand in the funds are
his, to do what he pleases with; let the land be tied up, as
it may.
While this aside, was going on in the hall, Bluewater
and the rest of the party had entered a small parlour, that
was in constant use, still conversing of the state of Sir
Wycherly
.
As all of them, but the two young men, were
ignorant of the nature of the message to Sir Reginald
Wychecombe, and of the intelligence in connection with
that gentleman, which had just been received, Mrs. Dutton
had ventured to ask an explanation, which was given by
Wycherly, with a readiness that proved
he
felt no
apprehensions
on the subject.
Sir Wycherly desired to see his distant relative, Sir
Reginald, said the lieutenant; and the messenger who
was sent to request his attendance, fortunately learned from
a post-boy, that the Hertfordshire baronet, in common with
many other gentlemen, is travelling in the west, just at this
moment; and that he slept last night, at a house only
twenty miles distant. The express reached him several
hours since, and an answer has been received, informing us
that we may expect to see him, in an hour or two.
Thus much was related by Wycherly; but, we may add
that Sir Reginald Wychecombe was a Catholic, as it
was then usual to term the Romanists, and in secret, a
Jacobite
;
and, in common with many of that religious
persuasion
,
he was down in the west, to see if a rising could not
be organized in that part of the kingdom, as a diversion to
any attempt to repel the young Pretender in the north. As
the utmost caution was used by the conspirators, this fact
was not even suspected by any who were not in the secret
of the whole proceeding. Understanding that his relation
was an inefficient old man, Sir Reginald, himself an active
and sagacious intriguer, had approached thus near to the
old paternal residence of his family, in order to ascertain if
his own name and descent might not aid him in obtaining
levies among the ancient tenantry of the estate. That day
he had actually intended to appear at Wychecombe,
disguised
,
and under an assumed name. He proposed venturing
on this step, because circumstances put it in his power, to
give what he thought would be received as a sufficient
excuse, should his conduct excite comment.
Sir Reginald Wychecombe was a singular, but by no
means an unnatural compound of management and integrity.
His position as a Papist had disposed him to intrigue, while
his position as one proscribed by religious hostility, had
disposed
him to be a Papist. Thousands are made men of
activity, and even of importance, by persecution and
proscription
,
who would pass through life quietly and
unnoticed
,
if the meddling hand of human forethought did not
force them into situations that awaken their hostility, and
quicken their powers. This gentleman was a firm believer
in all the traditions of his church, though his learning
extended
little beyond his missal; and he put the most implicit
reliance on the absurd, because improbable, fiction of the
Nag's Head consecration, without having even deemed it
necessary to look into a particle of that testimony by which
alone such a controversy could be decided. In a word, he
was an instance of what religious intolerance has ever done,
and will probably for ever continue to do, with so wayward
a being as man.
Apart from this weakness, Sir Reginald Wychecombe had
both a shrewd and an inquiring mind. His religion he left
very much to the priests; but of his temporal affairs he
assumed
a careful and prudent supervision. He was much
richer than the head of the family; but, while he had no
meannesses connected with money, he had no objection to
be the possessor of the old family estates. Of his own
relation
to the head of this family, he was perfectly aware, and
the circumstance of the half-blood, with all its legal
consequences
,
was no secret to him. Sir Reginald
Wychecombe
was not a man to be so situated, without having
recourse to all proper means, in order, as it has become the
fashion of the day to express it, to define his position.
By means of a shrewd attorney, if not of his own religious,
at least of his own political opinions, he had ascertained the
fact, and this from the mouth of Martha herself, that Baron
Wychecombe had never married; and that, consequently,
Tom and his brothers were no more heirs at law to the
Wychecombe estate, than he was in his own person. He
fully understood, too, that there
was
no heir at law; and
that the lands must escheat, unless the present owner made
a will; and to this last act, his precise information told him
that Sir Wycherly had an unconquerable reluctance. Under
such circumstances, it is not at all surprising, that when the
Hertfordshire baronet was thus unexpectedly summoned to
the bed-side of his distant kinsman, he inferred that his own
claims were at length to be tardily acknowledged, and that
he was about to be put in possession of the estates of his
legitimate ancestors. It is still less wonderful, that,
believing
this, he promptly promised to lose no time in obeying
the summons, determining momentarily to forget his political,
in order to look a little after his personal interests.
The reader will understand, of course, that all these details
were unknown to the inmates of the Hall, beyond the fact
of the expected arrival of Sir Reginald Wychecombe, and
that of the circumstance of the half-blood; which, in its
true bearing, was known alone to Tom. Their thoughts
were directed towards the situation of their host, and little
was said, or done, that had not his immediate condition for
the object. It being understood, however, that the surgeons
kept the sick chamber closed against all visiters, a silent and
melancholy breakfast was taken by the whole party, in
waiting for the moment when they might be admitted.
When this cheerless meal was ended, Sir Gervaise desired
Bluewater to follow him to his room, whither he led the way
in person.
It is possible, certainly, that Vervillin is out,
commenced
the vice-admiral, when they were alone; but we
16 *
shall know more about it, when the cutter gets in, and
reports. You saw nothing but her number, I think you told
me?
She was at work with private signals, when I left the
head-land; of course I was unable to read them without the
book.
That Vervillin is a good fellow, returned Sir Gervaise,
rubbing his hands; a way he had when much pleased; and
has stuff in him. He has thirteen two-decked ships, Dick,
and that will be one apiece for our captains, and a spare
one for each of our flags. I believe there is no three-decker
in that squadron?
There you've made a small mistake, Sir Gervaise, as
the Comte de Vervillin had his flag in the largest
three-decker
of France;
le Bourbon
120. The rest of his ships
are like our own, though much fuller manned.
Never mind, Bluenever mind:we'll put two on the
Bourbon, and try to make our frigates of use. Besides, you
have a knack at keeping the fleet so compact, that it is nearly
a single battery.
May I venture to ask, then, if it's your intention to go
out, should the news by the Active prove to be what you
anticipate?
Sir Gervaise cast a quick, distrustful glance at the other,
anxious to read the motive for the question, at the same time
that he did not wish to betray his own feelings; then he
appeared to meditate on the answer.
It is not quite agreeable to lie here, chafing our cables,
with a French squadron roving the channel, he said; but
I rather think it's my duty to wait for orders from the
Admiralty, under present circumstances.
Do you expect my lords will send you through the
Straits of Dover, to blockade the Frith?
If they do, Bluewater, I shall hope for your company.
I trust, a night's rest has given you different views of what
ought to be a seaman's duty, when his country is at open
war with her ancient and most powerful enemies.
It is the prerogative of the
crown
to declare war, Oakes.
No one but a
lawful
sovereign can make a
lawful
war.
Ay, here come your cursed distinctions about
de jure
and
de facto
, again. By the way, Dick, you are something of
a scholarcan you tell me what is understood by calling a
man a
nullus?
Admiral Bluewater, who had taken his usual lolling
attitude
in the most comfortable chair he could find, while his
more mercurial friend kept pacing the room, now raised his
head in surprise, following the quick motions of the other,
with his eyes, as if he doubted whether he had rightly heard
the question.
It's plain English, is it not?or plain
Latin
, if you
willwhat is meant by calling a man a
nullus?
repeated
Sir Gervaise, observing the other's manner.
The Latin is
plain
enough, certainly, returned
Bluewater
,
smiling; you surely do not mean
nullus, nulla,
nullum?
Exactly thatyou've hit it to a gender.
Nullus, nulla,
nullum
. No
man
, no
woman
, no
thing
. Masculine,
feminine
,
neuter.
I never heard the saying. If ever used, it must be some
silly play on sounds, and mean a numskullor, perhaps, a
fling at a fellow's position, by saying he is a `nobody.' Who
the deuce has been calling another a
nullus
, in the presence
of the commander-in-chief of the southern squadron?
Sir Wycherly Wychecombeour unfortunate host,
here: the poor man who is on his death-bed, on this very
floor.
Again Bluewater raised his head, and once more his eye
sought the face of his friend. Sir Gervaise had now stopped
short, with his hands crossed behind his back, looking
intently
at the other, in expectation of the answer.
I thought it might be some difficulty from the fleet
some silly fellow complaining of another still more silly for
using such a word. Sir Wycherly!the poor man's mind
must have failed him.
I rather think not; if it has, there is `method in his
madness,' for he persevered, most surprisingly, in the use
of the term. His nephew, Tom Wychecombe, the
presumptive
heir, he insists on it, is a
nullus;
while this Sir
Reginald
,
who is expected to arrive every instant, he says is only
half
or half-
blood
, as it has since been explained to us.
I am afraid this nephew will prove to be anything but
nullus
, when he succeeds to the estate and title, answered
Bluewater, gravely. A more sinister-looking scoundrel,
I never laid eyes on.
That is just my way of thinking; and not in the least
like the family.
This matter of likenesses is not easily explained, Oakes.
We see parents and children without any visible resemblance
to each other; and then we find startling likenesses between
utter strangers.
Bachelor's children
may be in that predicament,
certainly
;
but I should think few others. I never yet studied
a child, that I did not find some resemblance to both parents:
covert and only transitory, perhaps; but a likeness so
distinct
as to establish the relationship. What an accursed
chance it is, that our noble young lieutenant should have no
claim on this old baronet; while this dd
nullus
is both
heir at law, and heir of entail! I never took half as much
interest in any other man's estate, as I take in the succession
to this of our poor host!
There you are mistaken, Oakes; you took more in
mine;
for, when I made a will in your own favour, and
gave it to you to read, you tore it in two, and threw it
over-board
,
with your own hand.
Ay, that was an act of lawful authority. As your
superior
,
I countermanded that will! I hope you've made
another, and given your money, as I told you, to your
cousin, the Viscount.
I did, but
that
will has shared the fate of the first. It
appearing to me, that we are touching on serious times, and
Bluewater being rich already, I destroyed the devise in his
favour, and made a new one, this very morning. As you
are my executor, as usual, it may be well to let you know
it.
Dick, you have not been made enough to cut off the head
of your own familyyour own flesh and blood, as it might
beto leave the few thousands you own, to this mad
adventurer
in Scotland!
Bluewater smiled at this evidence of the familiarity of his
friend with his own way of thinking and feeling; and, for
a single instant, he regretted that he had not put his first
intention in force, in order that the conformity of views might
have been still more perfect; but, putting a hand in his pocket,
he drew out the document itself, and leaning forward, gave
it carelessly to Sir Gervaise.
There is the will; and by looking it over, you will know
what I've done, he said. I wish you would keep it; for,
if `misery makes us acquainted with strange bed-fellows,'
revolutions reduce us, often, to strange plights, and the paper
will be safer with you than with me. Of course, you will
keep my secret, until the proper time to reveal it shall
arrive.
The vice-admiral, who knew that he had no direct interest
in his friend's disposition of his property, took the will, with
a good deal of curiosity to ascertain its provisions. So short
a testament was soon read; and his eye rested intently on
the paper until it had taken in the last word. Then his hand
dropped, and he regarded Bluewater with a surprise he
neither affected, nor wished to conceal. He did not doubt
his friend's sanity, but he greatly questioned his discretion.
This is a very simple, but a very ingenious
arrangement
,
to disturb the order of society, he said; and to
convert a very modest and unpretending, though lovely girl,
into a forward and airs-taking old woman! What is this
Mildred Dutton to you, that you should bequeath to her
30,000?
She is one of the meekest, most ingenuous, purest, and
loveliest, of her meek, ingenuous, pure, and lovely sex,
crushed to the earth by the curse of a brutal, drunken
father; and, I am resolute to see that this world, for once,
afford some compensation for its own miseries.
Never doubt that, Richard Bluewater; never doubt
that
.
So certain is vice, or crime, to bring its own punishment in
this life, that one may well question if any other hell is
needed. And, depend on it, your meek, modest
ingenuousness
,
in its turn, will not go unrewarded.
Quite true, so far as the spirit is concerned; but, I mean
to provide a little for the comfort of the body. You
remember
Agnes Hedworth, I take it for granted?
Remember her!out of all question. Had the war left
me leisure for making love, she was the only woman I ever
knew, who could have brought me to her feetI mean as a
dog, Dick.
Do you see no resemblance between her and this
Mildred
Dutton? It is in the expression rather than in the
featuresbut, it is the expression which alone denotes the
character.
By George, you're right, Bluewater; and this relieves
me from some embarrassment I've felt about that very
expression
of which you speak. She
is
like poor Agnes, who
became a saint earlier than any of us could have wished.
Living or dead, Agnes Hedworth must be an angel! You
were fonder of her, than of any other woman, I believe.
At one time, I thought you might propose for her hand.
It was not that sort of affection, and you could not have
known her private history, or you would not have fancied
this. I was so situated in the way of relatives, that Agnes,
though only the child of a cousin-german, was the nearest
youthful female relative I had on earth; and I regarded her
more as a sister, than as a creature who could ever become
my wife. She was sixteen years my junior; and by the
time she had become old enough to marry, I was
accustomed
to think of her only as one destined for another
station
.
The same feeling existed as to her sister, the Duchess,
though in a greatly lessened degree.
Poor, sweet Agnes!and it is on account of this
accidental
resemblance, that you have determined to make the
daughter of a drunken sailing-master your heiress?
Not altogether so; the will was drawn before I was
conscious that the likeness existed. Still, it has probably,
unknown to myself, greatly disposed me to view her with
favour. But, Gervaise, Agnes herself was not fairer in
person, or more lovely in mind, than this very Mildred
Dutton.
Well, you have not been accustomed to regard
her
as
a sister; and
she
has become marriageable, without there
having been any opportunity for your regarding her as so
peculiarly sacred, Dick! returned Sir Gervaise, half
suppressing
a smile as he threw a quiet glance at his friend.
You know this to be idle, Oakes. Some one must
inherit
my money; my brother is long since dead; even poor,
poor Agnes is gone; her sister don't need it; Bluewater is
an over-rich bachelor, already;
you
won't take it, and what
better can I do with it? If you could have seen the cruel
manner in which the spirits of both mother and daughter
were crushed to the earth last night, by that beast of a
husband
and father, you would have felt a desire to relieve their
misery, even though it had cost you Bowldero, and half
your money in the funds.
Umph! Bowldero has been in my family five centuries,
and is likely to remain there, Master Bluewater, five more;
unless, indeed, your dashing Pretender should succeed, and
take it away by confiscation.
There, again, was another inducement. Should I leave
my cash to a rich person, and should chance put me on the
wrong side in this struggle, the king,
de facto
, would get it
all; whereas, even a German would not have the heart to
rob a poor creature like Mildred of her support.
The
Scotch
are notorious for bowels, in such matters!
Well, have it your own way, Dick. It 's of no great moment
what you do with your prize-money; though I had supposed
it would fall into the hands of this boy, Geoffrey Cleveland,
who is no discredit to your blood.
He will have a hundred thousand pounds, at
five-and-twenty
,
that were left him by old Lady Greenfield, his
great-aunt
,
and that is more than he will know what to do with.
But, enough of this. Have you received further tidings from
the north, during the night?
Not a syllable. This is a retired part of the country;
and half Scotland might be capsized in one of its loughs,
and we not know of it, for a week, down here in Devonshire.
Should I get no intelligence or orders, in the next thirty-six
hours, I think of posting up to London, leaving you in
command
of the fleet.
That may not be wise. You would scarcely confide so
important a trust, in such a crisis, to a man of my political
feelingsI will not say
opinions;
since you attribute all to
sentiment.
I would confide my life and honour to you, Richard
Bluewater, with the utmost confidence in the security of
both, so long as it depended on your own acts or inclinations.
We must first see, however, what news the Active brings
us; for, if de Vervillin is really out, I shall assume that
the duty of an English sailor is to beat a Frenchman, before
all other considerations.
If he
can
, drily observed the other, raising his right
leg so high as to place the foot on the top of an old-fashioned
chair; an effort that nearly brought his back in a horizontal
line.
I am far from regarding it as a matter of course,
Admiral
Bluewater; but, it
has
been done sufficiently often, to
render it an event of no very violent
possibility
. Ah, here
is Magrath to tell us the condition of his patient.
The surgeon of the Plantagenet entering the room, at
that moment, the conversation was instantly changed.
Well, Magrath, said Sir Gervaise, stopping suddenly
in his quarter-deck pace; what news of the poor man?
He is reviving, Admiral Oakes, returned the
phlegmatic
surgeon; but it is like the gleaming of sunshine that
streams through clouds, as the great luminary sets behind
the hills
Oh! hang your poetry, doctor; let us have nothing but
plain matter-of-fact, this morning.
Well then, Sir Gervaise, as commander-in-chief, you 'll
be obeyed, I think. Sir Wycherly Wychecombe is suffering
under an attack of apoplexy  or
as the Greeks
had it. The diagnosis of the disease is not easily mistaken,
though it has its affinities as well as other maladies. The
applications for gout, or
arthritis
sometimes produce
apoplexy
;
though one disease is seated in the head, while the
other usually takes refuge in the feet. Ye 'll understand
this the more readily, gentlemen, when ye reflect that as a
thief is chased from one hiding-place, he commonly
endeavours
to get into another. I much misgive the prudence
of the phlebotomy ye practised among ye, on the first
summons
to the patient.
What the dl does the man mean by phlebotomy?
exclaimed Sir Gervaise, who had an aversion to medicine,
and knew scarcely any of the commonest terms of practice,
though expert in bleeding.
I 'm thinking it 's what you and Admiral Bluewater so
freely administer to His Majesty's enemies, whenever ye fall
in with 'em at sea;he-he-he answered Magrath,
chuckling
at his own humour; which, as the quantity was small,
was all the better in quality.
Surely he does not mean powder and shot! We give
the French shot; Sir Wycherly has not been shot?
Varra true, Sir Gervaise, but ye 've let him blood,
amang ye: a measure that has been somewhat preceepitately
practised, I 've my misgivings!
Now, any old woman can tell us better than that,
doctor
.
Blood-letting is the every-day remedy for attacks of
this sort.
I do not dispute the dogmas of elderly persons of the
other sex, Sir Gervaise, or your
every-day remedia
. If
`every-day' doctors would save life and alleviate pain,
diplomas would be unnecessary; and we might, all of us,
practise on the principle of the `de'el tak' the hindmaist,'
as ye did yoursel', Sir Gervaise, when ye cut and slash'd
amang the Dons, in boarding El Lirio. I was there, ye 'll
both remember, gentlemen; and was obleeged to sew up the
gashes ye made with your own irreverent and ungodly
hands.
This speech referred to one of the most desperate,
hand-to-hand
struggles, in which the two flag-officers had ever
been engaged; and, as it afforded them the means of
exhibiting
their personal gallantry, when quite young men, both
usually looked back upon the exploit with great
self-complacency
;
Sir Gervaise, in particular, his friend having
often declared since, that they ought to have been laid on
the shelf for life, as a punishment for risking their men in
so mad an enterprise, though it did prove to be brilliantly
successful.
That was an affair in which one might engage at
twenty-two
,
Magrath, observed Bluewater; but which he ought
to hesitate about thinking of even, after thirty.
I 'd do it again, this blessed day, if you would give us
a chance! exclaimed Sir Gervaise, striking the back of
one hand into the palm of the other, with a sudden energy,
that showed how much he was excited by the mere
recollection
of the scene.
That w'ud ye!that w'ud ye! said Magrath, growing
more and more Scotch, as he warmed in the discourse;
ye 'd board a mackerel-hoy, rather than not have an
engagement
.
Ye 'r a varra capital vice-admiral of the red,
Sir Gervaise, but I 'm judging ye 'd mak' a varra indeeferent
loblolly-boy.
Bluewater, I shall be compelled to change ships with
Vol. I.  17
you, in order to get rid of the old stand-by's of the
Plantagenets
!
They stick to me like leeches; and have got to be
so familiar, that they criticise all my orders, and don't more
than half obey them, in the bargain.
No one will criticise your nautical commands, Sir
Gervaise
;
though, in the way of the healing airt,science, it
should be calledye 're no mair to be trusted, than one of
the young gentlemen. I 'm told ye drew ye 'r lancet on
this poor gentleman, as ye 'd draw ye 'r sword on an
enemy!
I did, indeed, sir; though Mr. Rotherham had rendered
the application of the instrument unnecessary. Apoplexy
is a rushing of the blood to the head; and by diminishing
the quantity in the veins of the arms or temples, you lessen
the pressure on the brain.
Just layman's practice, sirjust layman's practice. Will
ye tell me now if the patient's face was red or white?
Everything
depends on
that;
which is the true diagnosis of the
malady.
Red, I think; was it not, Bluewater? Red, like old
port, of which I fancy the poor man had more than his
share.
Weel, in that case, you were not so varra wrong; but,
they tell me his countenance was pallid and death-like; in
which case ye came near to committing murder. There is
one principle that controls the diagnosis of all cases of
apoplexy
among ye'r true country gentlemenand that is, that
the system is reduced and enfeebled, by habitual devotion to
the decanter. In such attacks ye canna' do warse, than to
let blood. But, I 'll no be hard upon you, Sir Gervaise;
and so we 'll drop the subjectthough, truth to say, I do
not admire your poaching on my manor. Sir Wycherly is
materially better, and expresses, as well as a man who has
not the use of his tongue,
can
express a thing, his besetting
desire to make his last will and testament. In ordinary
cases of
apoplexia
, it is good practice to oppose this craving;
though, as it is my firm opinion that nothing can save the
patient's life, I do not set myself against the measure, in
this particular case. Thar' was a curious discussion at
Edinbro', in my youth, gentlemen, on the question whether
the considerations connected with the disposition of the
property
,
or the considerations connected with the patient's
health, ought to preponderate in the physician's mind, when
it might be reasonably doubted whether the act of making a
will, would or would not essentially affect the nervous system,
and otherwise derange the functions of the body. A very
pretty argument, in excellent Edinbro' Latin, was made on
each side of the question. I think, on the whole, the physicos
had the best o' it; for they could show a plausible present
evil, as opposed to a possible remote good.
Has Sir Wycherly mentioned my name this morning?
asked the vice-admiral, with interest.
He has, indeed, Sir Gervaise; and that in a way so
manifestly connected with his will, that I 'm opining ye 'll
no be forgotten in the legacies. The name of Bluewater
was in his mouth, also.
In which case no time should be lost; for, never before
have I felt half the interest in the disposition of a stranger's
estate. Hark! Are not those wheels rattling in the
courtyard
?
Ye'r senses are most pairfect, Sir Gervaise, and that
I 've always said was one reason why ye'r so great an
admiral
,
returned Magrath. Mind, only
one
, Sir Gervaise;
for many qualities united, are necessary to make a truly
great man. I see a middle-aged gentleman alighting, and
servants around him, who wear the same liveries as those
of this house. Some relative, no doubt, come to look after
the legacies, also.
This must be Sir Reginald Wychecombe; it may not
be amiss if we go forward to receive him, Bluewater.
At this suggestion, the rear-admiral drew in his legs,
which had not changed their position on account of the
presence
of the surgeon, arose, and followed Sir Gervaise, as
the latter left the room.
CHAPTER XIII.
Videsne quis venit?
Video, et gaudeo
.
Nathaniel et Holofernes
.
Tom Wychecombe
had experienced an uneasiness that
it is unnecessary to explain, ever since he learned that his
reputed uncle had sent a messenger to bring the
half-blood
to the Hall. From the moment he got a clue to the
fact, he took sufficient pains to ascertain what was in the
wind; and when Sir Reginald Wychecombe entered the
house, the first person he met was this spurious supporter
of the honours of his name.
Sir Reginald Wychecombe, I presume, from the arms
and the liveries, said Tom, endeavouring to assume the
manner of a host. It is grateful to find that, though we
are separated by quite two centuries, all the usages and the
bearings of the family are equally preserved and respected,
by both its branches.
I am Sir Reginald Wychecombe, sir, and endeavour
not to forget the honourable ancestry from which I am
derived. May I ask what kinsman I have the pleasure now
to meet?
Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, sir, at your command; the
eldest
son of Sir Wycherly's next brother, the late Mr.
Baron Wychecombe. I trust, Sir Reginald, you have not
considered us as so far removed in blood, as to have entirely
overlooked our births, marriages, and deaths.
I have
not
, sir, returned the baronet, drily, and with
an emphasis that disturbed his listener, though the cold,
jesuitical smile that accompanied the words, had the effect
to calm his vivid apprehensions.
All
that relates to the
house of Wychecombe has interest in my eyes; and I have
endeavoured, successfully I trust, to ascertain
all
that relates
to its births,
marriages
, and deaths. I greatly regret that
the second time I enter this venerable dwelling, should be
on an occasion as melancholy as this, on which I am now
summoned. How is your respectable  how is Sir
Wycherly
Wychecombe, I wish to say?
There was sufficient in this answer, taken in connexion
with the deliberate, guarded, and yet expressive manner of
the speaker, to make Tom extremely uncomfortable, though
there was also sufficient to leave him in doubts as to his
namesake's true meaning. The words emphasized by the
latter, were touched lightly, though distinctly; and the cold,
artificial smile with which they were uttered, completely
baffled the sagacity of a rogue, as common-place as the
heir-expectant. Then the sudden change in the
construction
of the last sentence, and the substitution of the name
of the person mentioned, for the degree of affinity in which
he was supposed to stand to Tom, might be merely a rigid
observance of the best tone of society, or it might be
equivocal
.
All these little distinctions gleamed across the mind
of Tom Wychecombe; but that was not the moment to
pursue
the investigation. Courtesy required that he should
make an immediate answer, which he succeeded in doing
steadily enough as to general appearances, though his
sagacious
and practised questioner perceived that his words had
not failed of producing the impression he intended; for he
had looked to their establishing a species of authority over
the young man.
My honoured and beloved uncle has revived a little, they
tell me, said Tom; but I fear these appearances are
delusive
.
After eighty-four, death has a fearful hold upon
us, sir! The worst of it is, that my poor, dear uncle's mind
is sensibly affected; and it is quite impossible to get at any
of his little wishes, in the way of memorials and messages
How then, sir, came Sir Wycherly to honour
me
with
a request to visit him? demanded the other, with an
extremely
awkward pertinency.
I suppose, sir, he has succeeded in muttering your
name, and that a natural construction has been put on its
use, at such a moment. His will has been made some time,
I understand; though I am ignorant of even the name of
the executor, as it is closed in an envelope, and sealed with
Sir Wycherly's arms. It cannot be, then, on account of a
will
, that he has wished to see you. I rather think, as the
next of the family,
out of the direct line of succession
, he
17 *
may have ventured to name you as the executor of the will
in existence, and has thought it proper to notify you of the
same.
Yes sir, returned Sir Reginald, in his usual cold, wary
manner; though it would have been more in conformity
with usage, had the notification taken the form of a request
to serve, previously to making the testament. My letter
was signed `Gervaise Oakes,' and, as they tell me a fleet is
in the neighbourhood, I have supposed that the celebrated
admiral of that name, has done me the honour to write it.
You are not mistaken, sir; Sir Gervaise Oakes is in the
houseahhere he comes to receive you, accompanied by
Rear-Admiral Bluewater, whom the sailors call his
mainmast
.
The foregoing conversation had taken place in a little
parlour that led off from the great hall, whither Tom had
conducted his guest, and in which the two admirals now
made their appearance. Introductions were scarcely
necessary
,
the uniform and starfor in that age officers usually
appeared in their robesthe uniform and star of Sir
Gervaise
at once proclaiming his rank and name; while, between
Sir Reginald and Bluewater there existed a slight personal
acquaintance, which had grown out of their covert, but deep,
Jacobite sympathies.
Sir Gervaise Oakes, and Sir Reginald
Wychecombe
,
passed between the gentlemen, with a hearty shake
of the hand from the admiral, which was met by a cold touch
of the fingers on the part of the other, that might very well
have passed for the great model of the sophisticated
manipulation
of the modern salute, but which, in fact, was the
result of temperament rather than of fashion. As soon as
this ceremony was gone through, and a few brief expressions
of courtesy were exchanged, the new comer turned to
Bluewater
,
with an air of greater freedom, and continued
And you, too, Sir Richard Bluewater! I rejoice to meet
an acquaintance in this melancholy scene.
I am happy to see you, Sir Reginald; though you have
conferred on me a title to which I have no proper claim.
No!the papers tell us that you have received one of
the lately vacant red ribands?
I believe some such honour has been in
contemplation
Contemplation!I do assure you, sir, your name is
fairly and distinctly gazettedas, by sending to my
carriage
,
it will be in my power to show you. I am, then, the
first to call you, Sir Richard.
Excuse me, Sir Reginaldthere is some little
misapprehension
in this matter; I prefer to remain plain
Rear-Admiral
Bluewater. In due season, all will be explained.
The parties exchanged looks, which, in times like those
in which they lived, were sufficiently intelligible to both;
and the conversation was instantly changed. Before Sir
Reginald relinquished the hand he held, however, he gave
it a cordial squeeze, an intimation that was returned by a
warm pressure from Bluewater. The party then began to
converse of Sir Wycherly, his actual condition, and his
probable motive in desiring to see his distant kinsman. This
motive, Sir Gervaise, regardless of the presence of Tom
Wychecombe, declared to be a wish to make a will; and,
as he believed, the intention of naming Sir Reginald his
executor, if not in some still more interesting capacity.
I understand Sir Wycherly has a considerable sum
entirely
at his own disposal, continued the vice-admiral;
and I confess I like to see a man remember his friends
and servants, generously, in his last moments. The estate
is entailed, I hear; and I suppose Mr. Thomas Wychecombe
here, will be none the worse for that precaution in his
ancestor
;
let the old gentleman do as he pleases with his
savings.
Sir Gervaise was so much accustomed to command, that
he did not feel the singularity of his own interference in the
affairs of a family of what might be called strangers, though
the circumstance struck Sir Reginald, as a little odd.
Nevertheless, the last had sufficient penetration to
understand
the vice-admiral's character at a glance, and the
peculiarity
made no lasting impression. When the allusion was
made to Tom's succession, as a matter of course, however,
he cast a cold, but withering look, at the reputed heir, which
almost chilled the marrow in the bones of the jealous rogue.
Might I say a word to you, in your own room, Sir
Gervaise
?
asked Sir Reginald, in an aside. These matters
ought not to be indecently hurried; and I wish to
understand
the ground better, before I advance.
This question was overheard by Bluewater; who, begging
the gentlemen to remain where they were, withdrew
himself
,
taking Tom Wychecombe with him. As soon as they
were alone, Sir Reginald drew from his companion, by
questions warily but ingeniously put, a history of all that
had occurred within the last twenty-four hours; a
knowledge
of the really helpless state of Sir Wycherly, and of
the manner in which he himself had been summoned,
included
.
When satisfied, he expressed a desire to see the
sick man.
By the way, Sir Reginald, said the vice-admiral, with
his hand on the lock of the door, arresting his own
movement
to put the question; I see, by your manner of
expressing
yourself, that the law has not been entirely
overlooked
in your education. Do you happen to know what
`half-blood' means? it is either a medical or a legal term,
and I understand few but nautical.
You could not apply to any man in England, Sir
Gervaise
,
better qualified to tell you, answered the
Hertfordshire
baronet, smiling expressively. I am a barrister of
the Middle Temple, having been educated as a younger son,
and having since succeeded an elder brother, at the age of
twenty-seven; and, I stand in the unfortunate relation of
the `half-blood' myself, to this very estate, on which we are
now conversing.
Sir Reginald then proceeded to explain the law to the
other, as we have already pointed it out to the reader;
performing
the duty succinctly, but quite clearly.
Bless me!bless me! Sir Reginald, exclaimed the
direct-minded and
just
-minded sailorhere must be some
mistake! A fortieth cousin, or the king, take this estate
before
yourself, though you are directly descended from all
the old Wychecombes of the times of the Plantagenets!
Such is the common law, Sir Gervaise. Were I Sir
Wycherly's half-brother, or a son by a second wife of our
common father, I could not take from
him
, although that
common father had earned the estate by his own hands, or
services.
This is damnable, sirdamnableand you 'll pardon
me, but I can hardly believe we have such a monstrous
principle in the good, honest, well-meaning laws, of good,
honest, well-meaning old England!
Sir Reginald was one of the few lawyers of his time, who
did not recognize the virtue of this particular provision of
the common law; a circumstance that probably arose from
his having so
small
an interest now in the mysteries of the
profession, and so
large
an interest in the family estate of
Wychecombe, destroyed by its
dictum
. He was,
consequently
,
less surprised, and not at all hurt, at the evident
manner in which the sailor repudiated his statement, as doing
violence equally to reason, justice, and probability.
Good, honest, well-meaning old England tolerates many
grievous things, notwithstanding, Sir Gervaise, he
answered
;
among others, it tolerates the law of the
half-blood
.
Much depends on the manner in which men view
these things; that which seems gold to one, resembling silver
in the eyes of another. Now, I dare say,this was said
as a feeler, and with a smile that might pass for ironical
or confiding, as the listener pleased to take itNow, I
dare say, the clans would tell us that England tolerates an
usurper, while her lawful prince was in banishment; though
you
and
I
might not feel disposed to allow it.
Sir Gervaise started, and cast a quick, suspicious glance
at the speaker; but there the latter stood, with as open and
guileless an expression on his handsome features, as was
ever seen in the countenance of confiding sixteen.
Your supposititious case is no parallel, returned the
vice-admiral
,
losing every shade of suspicion, at this appearance
of careless frankness; since men often follow their
feelings
in their allegiance, while the law is supposed to be
governed by reason and justice. But, now we are on the
subject, will you tell me, Sir Reginald, if you also know
what a
nullus
is?'
I have no farther knowledge of the subject, Sir
Gervaise
,
returned the other, smiling, this time, quite
naturally
;
than is to be found in the Latin dictionaries and
grammars.
Ayyou mean
nullus, nulla, nullum
. Even we sailors
know
that;
as we all go to school before we go to sea.
But, Sir Wycherly, in efforts to make himself understood,
called you a `half-blood.'
And quite correctlyI admit such to be the fact; and
that I have no more
legal
claim, whatever, on this estate,
than you have yourself. My
moral
right, however, may be
somewhat better.
It is much to your credit, that you so frankly admit it,
Sir Reginald; for, hang me, if I think even the judges would
dream of raising such an objection to your succeeding, unless
reminded of it.
Therein you do them injustice, Sir Gervaise; as it is
their duty to administer the laws, let them be what they
may.
Perhaps you are right, sir. But the reason for my
asking what a
nullus
is, was the circumstance that Sir
Wycherly
,
in the course of his efforts to speak, repeatedly called
his nephew and heir, Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, by that
epithet.
Did he, indeed?Was the epithet, as you well term it,
filius nullius?
I rather think it was
nullus
though I do believe the
word
filius
was muttered, once or twice, also.
Yes sir, this has been the case; and I am not sorry
Sir Wycherly is aware of the fact, as I hear that the young
man affects to consider himself in a different point of view.
A
filius nullius
is the legal term for a bastardthe `son
of nobody,' as you will at once understand. I am fully
aware that such is the unfortunate predicament of Mr.
Thomas
Wychecombe, whose father, I possess complete evidence
to show, was never married to his mother.
And yet, Sir Reginald, the impudent rascal carries in
his pocket even, a certificate, signed by some parish priest
in London, to prove the contrary.
The civil baronet seemed surprised at this assertion of
his military brother; but Sir Gervaise explaining what had
passed between himself and the young man, he could no
longer entertain any doubt of the fact.
Since you have seen the document, resumed Sir
Reginald
,
it must, indeed, be so; and this misguided boy is
prepared to take any desperate step in order to obtain the
title and the estate. All that he has said about a will must
be fabulous, as no man in his senses would risk his neck to
obtain so hollow a distinction as a baronetcywe are equally
members of the class, and may speak frankly, Sir Gervaise
and the will would secure the estate, if there were one.
I cannot think, therefore, that there is a will at all.
If this will were not altogether to the fellow's liking,
would not the marriage, beside the hollow honour of which
you have spoken, put the whole of the landed property in
his possession, under the entail?
It would, indeed; and I thank you for the suggestion.
If, however, Sir Wycherly is desirous,
now
, of making a
new
will, and has strength and mind sufficient to execute
his purpose, the
old
one need give us no concern. This is
a most delicate affair for one in my situation to engage in,
sir; and I greatly rejoice that I find such honourable and
distinguished witnesses, in the house, to clear my
reputation
,
should anything occur to require such exculpation.
On the one side, Sir Gervaise, there is the danger of an
ancient estate's falling into the hands of the crown, and this,
too, while one of no
stain
of blood, derived from the same
honourable ancestors as the last possessor, is in existence;
or, on the other, of its becoming the prey of one of base
blood, and of but very doubtful character. The
circumstance
that Sir Wycherly desired my presence, is a great
deal; and I trust to you, and to those with you, to vindicate
the fairness of my course. If it's your pleasure, sir, we
will now go to the sick chamber.
With all my heart. I think, however, Sir Reginald,
said the vice-admiral, as he approached the door; that
even in the event of an escheat, you would find these
Brunswick
princes sufficiently liberal to restore the property. I
could not answer for those wandering Scotchmen; who
have so many breechless nobles to enrich; but, I think,
with the Hanoverians, you would be safe.
The last have certainly one recommendation the most,
returned the other, smiling courteously, but in a way so
equivocal that even Sir Gervaise was momentarily struck
by it; they have fed so well, now, at the crib, that they
may not have the same voracity, as those who have been
long fasting. It would be, however, more pleasant to take these
lands from a Wychecombea Wychecombe to a
Wychecombe
than
to receive them anew from even the
Plantagenet
who made the first grant.
This terminated the private dialogue, as the colloquists
entered the hall, just as the last speaker concluded.
Wycherly
was conversing, earnestly, with Mrs. Dutton and
Mildred, at the far end of the hall, when the baronets
appeared
;
but, catching the eye of the admiral, he said a few
words hastily to his companions, and joined the two
gentlemen
,
who were now on their way to the sick man's chamber.
Here is a namesake, if not a relative, Sir Reginald,
observed Sir Gervaise, introducing the lieutenant; and
one, I rejoice to say, of whom all of even your honourable
name have reason to be proud.
Sir Reginald's bow was courteous and bland, as the
admiral
proceeded to complete the introduction; but Wycherly
felt that the keen, searching look he bestowed on himself,
was disagreeable.
I am not at all aware, that I have the smallest claim to
the honour of being Sir Reginald Wychecombe's relative,
he said, with cold reserve. Indeed, until last evening, I
was ignorant of the existence of the Hertfordshire branch
of this family; and you will remember, Sir Gervaise, that
I am a Virginian.
A Virginian! exclaimed his namesake, taken so much
by surprise as to lose a little of his self-command. I did
not know, indeed, that any who bear the name had found
their way to the colonies.
And if they had, sir, they would have met with a set
of fellows every way fit to be their associates, Sir Reginald.
We English are a little clannishI hate the word, too; it
has such a narrow Scotch soundbut we
are
clannish,
although
generally provided with garments to our nether
limbs; and we sometimes look down upon even a son, whom
the love of adventure has led into that part of the world.
In my view, an Englishman is an Englishman, let him come
from what part of the empire he may. That is what I call
genuine liberality, Sir Reginald.
Quite true, Sir Gervaise; and a Scotchman is a
Scotchman
,
even though he come from the north of Tweed.
This was quietly said, but the vice-admiral felt the merited
rebuke it contained, and he had the good-nature and the
good sense to laugh at it, and to admit his own prejudices.
This little encounter brought the party to Sir Wycherly's
door, where all three remained until it was ascertained that
they might enter.
The next quarter of an hour brought about a great change
in the situation of all the principal inmates of Wychecombe
Hall. The interdict was taken off the rooms of Sir
Wycherly
,
and in them had collected all the gentlemen, Mrs.
Dutton and her daughter, with three or four of the upper
servants of the establishment. Even Galleygo had contrived
to thrust his ungainly person in, among the rest, though he
had the discretion to keep in the background, among his
fellows. In a word, both dressing-room and bed-room had
their occupants, though the last was principally filled by the
medical men, and those whose rank gave them claims to be
near the person of the sick.
It was now past a question known that poor Sir
Wycherly
was on his death-bed. His mind had sensibly
improved
,
nor was his speech any worse; but his physical
system
generally had received a shock that rendered recovery
hopeless. It was the opinion of the physicians that he might
possibly survive several days; or, that he might be carried
off, in a moment, by a return of the paralytic affection.
The baronet, himself, appeared to be perfectly conscious
of his situation; as was apparent by the anxiety he
expressed
to get his friends together, and more especially the
concern he felt to make a due disposition of his worldly
affairs. The medical men had long resisted both wishes,
until, convinced that the question was reduced to one of a
few hours more or less of life, and that denial was likely to
produce worse effects than compliance, they finally and
unanimously consented.
It's no a great concession to mortal infirmity to let a
dying man have his way, whispered Magrath to the two
admirals, as the latter entered the room. Sir Wycherly
is a hopeless case, and we 'll just consent to let him make a
few codicils, seeing that he so fairvently desires it; and then
there may be fewer hopeless deevils left behind him, when
he 's gathered to his forefathers.
Here we are, my dear Sir Wycherly, said the
vice-admiral
,
who never lost an occasion to effect his purpose,
Vol. I.  18
by any unnecessary delay; here we all are anxious to
comply with your wishes. Your kinsman, Sir Reginald
Wychecombe, is also present, and desirous of doing your
pleasure.
It was a painful sight to see a man on his death-bed, so
anxious to discharge the forms of the world, as the master
of the Hall now appeared to be. There had been an
unnecessary
alienation between the heads of the two branches
of the family; not arising from any quarrel, or positive
cause of disagreement, but from a silent conviction in both
parties, that each was unsuited to the other. They had met
a few times, and always parted without regret. The case
was now different; the separation was, in one sense at
least, to be eternal; and all minor considerations, all caprices
of habits or despotism of tastes, faded before the solemn
impressions
of the moment. Still, Sir Wycherly could not
forget that he was master of Wychecombe, and that his
namesake was esteemed a man of refinement; and, in his
simple way of thinking he would fain have arisen, in order
to do him honour. A little gentle violence, even, was
necessary
to keep the patient quiet.
Much honoured, sir  greatly pleased, muttered Sir
Wycherly, the words coming from him with difficulty.
Same ancestorssame namePlantagenetsold house,
sirhead go, new one comenone better, than
Do not distress yourself to speak, unnecessarily, my
dear sir, interrupted Sir Reginald, with more tenderness
for the patient than consideration for his own interest, as
the next words promised to relate to the succession. Sir
Gervaise Oakes tells me, he understands your wishes,
generally
,
and that he is now prepared to gratify them. First
relieve your mind, in matters of business; and, then, I shall
be most happy to exchange with you the feelings of kindred.
Yes, Sir Wycherly, put in Sir Gervaise, on this hint;
I believe I have now found the clue to all you wish to say.
The few words written by you, last night, were the
commencement
of a will, which it is your strong desire to make.
Do not speak, but raise your right hand, if I am not
mistaken
.
The sick man actually stretched his right arm above the
bed-clothes, and his dull eyes lighted with an expression of
pleasure, that proved how strongly his feelings were enlisted
in the result.
You see, gentlemen! said Sir Gervaise, with emphasis.
No one can mistake the meaning of this! Come nearer,
doctorMr. Rotherhamall who have no probable interest
in the affairI wish it to be seen that Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe
is desirous of making his will.
The vice-admiral now went through the ceremony of
repeating
his request, and got the same significant answer.
So I understood it, Sir Wycherly, and I believe now I
also understand all about the `half,' and the `whole,' and
the `
nullus
.' You meant to tell us that your kinsman, Sir
Reginald Wychecombe, was of the `half-blood' as respects
yourself, and that Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, your nephew,
is what is termed in lawhowever painful this may be,
gentlemen
,
at such solemn moments the truth must be plainly
spoken  that Mr. Thomas Wychecombe is what the law
terms a `
filius nullius
.' If we have understood you in this,
also, have the goodness to give this company the same sign
of assent.
The last words were scarcely spoken, before Sir
Wycherly
again raised his arm, and nodded his head.
Here there can be no mistake, and no one rejoices in it
more than I do myself; for, the unintelligible words gave
me a great deal of vexation. Well, my dear sir,
understanding
your wishes, my secretary, Mr. Atwood, has drawn
the commencement of a will, in the usual form, using your
own pious and proper language of`In the name of God,
Amen,' as the commencement; and he stands ready to write
down your bequests, as you may see fit to name them. We
will take them, first, on a separate piece of paper; then read
them to you, for your approbation; and afterwards,
transcribe
them into the will. I believe, Sir Reginald, that mode
would withstand the subtleties of all the gentlemen of all the
Inns of Court?
It is a very proper and prudent mode for executing a
will, sir, under the peculiar circumstances, returned he of
Hertfordshire. But, Sir Gervaise, my situation, here, is
a little delicate, as may be that of Mr. Thomas Wychecombe
and others of the name and family, if any such there be.
Would it not be well to inquire if our presence is actually
desired by the intended testator?
Is it your wish, Sir Wycherly, that your kinsmen and
namesakes remain in the room, or shall they retire until the
will is executed? I will call over the names of the company,
and when you wish any one, in particular, to stay in the
room, you will nod your head.
Allall stay, muttered Sir Wycherly; Sir Reginald
TomWycherlyall
This seems explicit enough, gentlemen, resumed the
vice-admiral. You are
all
requested to stay; and, if I
might venture an opinion, our poor friend has named those
on whom he intends his bequests to falland pretty much,
too, in the order in which they will come.
That will appear more unanswerably when Sir
Wycherly
has expressed his intentions in words, observed Sir
Reginald, very desirous that there should not be the smallest
appearance of dictation or persuasion offered to his kinsman,
at a moment so grave. Let me entreat that no leading
questions be put.
Sir Gervaise understands leading in battle, much better
than in a cross-examination, Sir Reginald, Bluewater
observed
,
in a tone so low, that none heard him but the person
to whom the words were addressed. I think we shall
sooner get at Sir Wycherly's wishes, by allowing him to
take his own course.
The other bowed, and appeared disposed to acquiesce.
In the mean time preparations were making for the
construction
of the will. Atwood seated himself at a table near
the bed, and commenced nibbing his pens; the medical men
administered a cordial; Sir Gervaise caused all the witnesses
to range themselves around the room, in a way that each
might fairly see, and be seen; taking care, however, so to
dispose of Wycherly, as to leave no doubt of his handsome
person's coming into the sick man's view. The lieutenant's
modesty might have rebelled at this arrangement, had he
not found himself immediately at the side of Mildred.
CHAPTER XIV.
Yet, all is o'er!fear, doubt, suspense, are fled,
Let brighter thoughts be with the virtuous dead!
The final ordeal of the soul is past,
And the pale brow is sealed to Heaven at last.
Mrs. Hemans
.
It
will be easily supposed that Tom Wychecombe
witnessed
the proceedings related in the preceding chapter with
dismay. The circumstance that he actually possessed a
bon fide
will of his uncle, which left him heir of all the
latter owned, real or personal, had made him audacious,
and first induced him to take the bold stand of asserting his
legitimacy, and of claiming all its consequences. He had
fully determined to assume the title on the demise of Sir
Wycherly; plausibly enough supposing that, as there was
no heir to the baronetcy, the lands once in his quiet
possession
,
no one would take sufficient interest in the matter
to dispute his right to the rank. Here, however, was a blow
that menaced death to all his hopes. His illegitimacy
seemed to be known to others, and there was every prospect
of a new will's supplanting the old one, in its more important
provisions, at least. He was at a loss to imagine what had
made this sudden change in his uncle's intentions; for he
did not sufficiently understand himself, to perceive that the
few months of close communion which had succeeded the
death of his reputed father, had sufficed to enlighten Sir
Wycherly on the subject of his own true character, and to
awaken a disgust that had remained passive, until suddenly
aroused by the necessity of acting; and, least of all, could
he understand how surprisingly the moral vision of men
is purified and enlarged, as respects both the past and the
future, by the near approach of death. Although symptoms
of strong dissatisfaction escaped him, he quieted his feelings
as much as possible, cautiously waiting for any occurrence
that might be used in setting aside the contemplated
instrument
,
hereafter; or, what would be still better, to defeat its
execution, now.
18*
As soon as the necessary preparations were made,
Atwood
,
his pen nibbed, ink at hand, and paper spread, was
ready to proceed: and a breathless stillness existed in the
chamber, Sir Gervaise resumed the subject on which they
were convened.
Atwood will read to you what he has already written,
Sir Wycherly, he said; should the phraseology be
agreeable
to you, you will have the goodness to make a sign to
that effect. Well, if all is ready, you can now commence
hey! Atwood?
`In the name of God, Amen;' commenced the
methodical
secretary; `I, Wycherly Wychecombe, Bart, of
Wychecombe-Hall
,
in the county of Devon, being of sound mind,
but of a feeble state of health, and having the view of death
before my eyes, revoking all other wills, codicils or
testamentary
devises, whatsoever, do make and declare this
instrument
to be my last will and testament: that is to say,
Imprimis, I do hereby constitute and appoint
of , the executor of this my said will, with all the
powers and authority that the law gives, or may hereafter
give to said executor. Secondly, I give and bequeath to'
This is all that is yet written, Sir Gervaise, blanks being
left for the name or names of the executor or executors, as
well as for the `s' at the end of `executor,' should the
testator
see fit to name more than one.
There, Sir Reginald, said the vice-admiral, not
altogether
without exultation; this is the way we prepare
these things on board a man-of-war! A flag-officer's secretary
needs have himself qualified to do anything, short of a
knowledge
of administering to the cure of souls!
And the cure of bodies, ye 'll be permitting me to add,
Sir Gervaise, observed Magrath, taking an enormous pinch
of a strong yellow snuff.
Our secretary would make but a lubberly fist at turning
off a delicate turtle-soup out of pig's-head; such as we puts
on our table at sea, so often, muttered Galleygo in the ear
of Mrs. Larder.
I see nothing to object to, Sir Gervaise, if the language
is agreeable to Sir Wycherly, answered the barrister by
profession, though not by practice. It would be advisable
to get his approbation of even the language.
That we intend to do, of course, sir. Sir Wycherly, do
you find the terms of this will to your liking?
Sir Wycherly smiled, and very clearly gave the sign of
assent.
I thought as muchfor, Atwood has made the wills of
two admirals, and of three captains, to my knowledge; and
my lord Chief Justice said that one of the last would have
done credit to the best conveyancer in England, and that it
was a pity the testator had nothing to bequeath. Now, Sir
Wycherly, will you have one executor, or more? if
one
,
hold up a single finger; and a finger for each additional
executor you wish us to insert in these blanks. One,
Atwood
you
perceive, gentlemen, that Sir Wycherly raises
but
one
finger; and so you can give a flourish at the end
of the `r,' as the word will be in the singular;hey!
Atwood
?
The secretary did as directed, and then reported himself
ready to proceed.
It will now be necessary for you to
name
your executor,
Sir Wycherlymake as little effort as possible, as we shall
understand the name, alone.
Sir Wycherly succeeded in uttering the name of Sir
Reginald Wychecombe, quite audibly.
This is plain enough, resumed the vice-admiral; how
does the sentence read now, Atwood?
`
Imprimis:
I do hereby constitute and appoint Sir
Reginald Wychecombe of Wychecombe-Regis, in the county
of Herts, Baronet, the executor of this my said will, &c.'
If that clause is to your liking, Sir Wycherly, have the
goodness to give the sign agreed on.
The sick man smiled, nodded his head, raised his hand,
and looked anxiously at his kinsman.
I consent to serve, Sir Wycherly, if such is your desire,
observed the nominee, who detected the meaning of his
kinsman's look.
And now, sir, continued the vice-admiral; it is
necessary
to ask you a few questions, in order that Atwood
may know what next to write. Is it your desire to bequeath
any real estate? Sir Wycherly assented. Do you wish
to bequeath
all
your real estate? The same sign of assent
was given. Do you wish to bequeath
all
to one person?
The sign of assent was given to this also. This makes
plain sailing, and a short run,hey! Atwood?
The secretary wrote as fast as possible, and in two or
three minutes he read aloud, as follows
`Secondly, I make and declare the following bequests or
devisesthat is to say, I give and bequeath to
of , all the real estate of which I may die seised,
together with all the houses, tenements, hereditaments, and
appurtenances thereunto belonging, and all my rights to the
same, whether in law or equity, to be possessed and enjoyed
by the said   of  in fee, by
heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns, for ever.' There
are blanks for the name and description, as well as for the
sex of the devisee, added the secretary.
All very proper and legal, I believe, Sir Reginald?I
am glad you think so, sir. Now, Sir Wycherly, we wait
for the name of the lucky person you mean thus to favour.
Sir Reginald Wychecombe, the sick man uttered,
painfully
;
half-blood  no
nullus
. Sir Michael's heir
my
heir.
This is plain English! cried Sir Gervaise, in the way
of a man who is not displeased; put in the name of `Sir
Reginald Wychecombe of Wychecombe-Regis, Herts,'
Atwood
aythat
just fills the blank handsomelyyou want
`
his
heirs, executors, &c.' in the other blank.
I beg your pardon, Sir Gervaise; it should read `by
himself, his
heirs, &c.'
Very truevery true, Atwood, Now read it slowly,
and Sir Wycherly will assent, if he approve.
This was done, and Sir Wycherly not only approved, but
it was apparent to all present, the abashed and confounded
Tom himself not excepted, that he approved, with a feeling
akin to delight.
That gives a black eye to all the land,hey! Atwood?
said Sir Gervaise; who, by this time, had entered into the
business in hand, with all the interest of a regular notary
or, rather, with that of one, on whose shoulders rested the
responsibility of success or failure. We come next to the
personals. Do you wish to bequeath your furniture, wines,
horses, carriages, and other things of that sort, to any
particular
person, Sir Wycherly?
AllSir ReginaldWychecombehalf-bloodold Sir
Michael's heir, answered the testator.
Goodclap that down, Atwood, for it is doing the thing,
as I like to see family affairs settled. As soon as you are
ready, let us hear how it sounds in writing.
`I furthermore bequeath to the said Sir Reginald
Wychecombe
of Wychecombe-Regis, as aforesaid, baronet, all my
personal property, whatsoever,' read Atwood, as soon as
ready; `including furniture, wines, pictures, books, horses
and carriages, and all other goods and chattels, of which I
may die possessed, excepting thereout and therefrom,
nevertheless
,
such sums in money, stocks, bonds, notes, or other
securities for debts, or such articles as I may in this
instrument
especially devise to any other person.' We can now
go to especial legacies, Sir Gervaise, and then another clause
may make Sir Reginald residuary legatee, if such be Sir
Wycherly's pleasure.
If you approve of that clause, my dear sir, make the
usual sign of assent.
Sir Wycherly both raised his hand and nodded his head,
evidently quite satisfied.
Now, my good sir, we come to the pounds  no
guineas? You like that betterwell, I confess that it sounds
better on the ear, and is more in conformity with the habits
of gentlemen. Will you now bequeath guineas? Good
first name the legateeis that right, Sir Reginald?
Quite right, Sir Gervaise; and Sir Wycherly will
understand
that he now names the first person to whom he
wishes to bequeath anything else.
Milly, muttered the sick man.
What? Mills!the mills go with the lands, Sir
Reginald
?
He means Miss Mildred Dutton, eagerly interposed
Wycherly, though with sufficient modesty.
Yesrightright, added the testator. Little Milly
Milly Duttongood little Milly.
Sir Gervaise hesitated, and looked round at Bluewater, as
much as to say this is bringing coals to Newcastle; but
Atwood took the idea, and wrote the bequest, in the usual
form.
`I give and bequeath to Mildred Dutton,' he read aloud,
`daughter of Francis Dutton of the Royal Navy, the sum
of' what sum shall I fill the blank with, Sir Wycherly?
Threethreeyes, three
Hundreds or thousands, my good sir? asked Sir
Gervaise
,
a little surprised at the amount of the bequest.
Guineasthreethousandguineas,five per cents.
That 's as plain as logarithms. Give the young lady
three thousand guineas in the fives, Atwood.
`I give and bequeath to Mildred Dutton, daughter of
Francis Dutton of the Royal Navy, the sum of three
thousand
guineas in the five per cent. stocks of this kingdom.'
Will that do, Sir Wycherly?
The old man looked at Mildred and smiled benevolently;
for, at that moment, he felt he was placing the pure and
lovely girl above the ordinary contingencies of her situation,
by rendering her independent.
Whose name shall we next insert, Sir Wycherly,
resumed
the vice-admiral. There must be many more of
these guineas left.
GregoryandJameschildren of my brother
Thomas
Baron
Wychecombefive thousand guineas each,
added the testator, making a great effort to express his
meaning as clearly as possible.
He was understood; and, after a short consultation with
the vice-admiral, Atwood wrote out the devise at length.
`I give and bequeath to my nephews, Gregory and
James Wychecombe, the reputed sons of my late brother,
Thomas Wychecombe, one of the Barons of His Majesty's
Exchequer, the sum of five thousand guineas, each, in the
five per cent. funded debt of this kingdom.'
Do you approve of the devise, Sir Wycherly? if so,
make the usual sign of assent?
Sir Wycherly complied, as in all the previous cases of
his approval.
Whose name shall we next insert, in readiness for a
legacy, Sir Wycherly? asked the admiral.
Here was a long pause, the baronet evidently turning over
in his mind, what he had done, and what yet remained to do.
Spread yourselves, my friends, in such a way as to
permit the testator to see you all, continued the
vice-admiral
,
motioning with his hand to widen the circle around the
bed, which had been contracted a little by curiosity and
interest
;
stand more this way,
Lieutenant Wycherly
Wychecombe
,
that the ladies may see and be seen; and you, too,
Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, come further in front, where
your uncle will observe you.
This speech pretty exactly reflected the workings of the
speaker's mind. The idea that Wycherly was a natural
child of the baronet's, notwithstanding the Virginian story,
was uppermost in his thoughts; and, taking the supposed
fact in connection with the young man's merit, he earnestly
desired to obtain a legacy for him. As for Tom, he cared
little whether his name appeared in the will or not. Justice
was now substantially done, and the judge's property being
sufficient for his wants, the present situation of the lately
reputed heir excited but little sympathy. Nevertheless, Sir
Gervaise thought it would be generous, under the
circumstances
,
to remind the testator that such a being as Tom
Wychecombe existed.
Here is your nephew, Mr. Thomas, Sir Wycherly, he
said; is it your wish to let his name appear in your will?
The sick man smiled coldly; but he moved his head, as
much as to imply assent.
`I give and bequeath to Thomas Wychecombe, the
eldest reputed son of my late brother, Thomas, one of the
Barons of His Majesty's Exchequer,' read Atwood, when
the clause was duly written; `the sum of , in
the five per cent. stocks of this kingdom.'
What sum will you have inserted, Sir Wycherly?
asked the vice-admiral.
Fiftyfifty
pounds
, said the testator, in a voice clearer
and fuller than he had before used that day.
The necessary words were immediately inserted; the
clause, as completed, was read again, and the approval was
confirmed by a distinctly pronounced yes. Tom started,
but, as all the others maintained their self-command, the
business of the moment did not the less proceed.
Do you wish any more names introduced into your
will, Sir Wycherly? asked the vice-admiral. You have
bequeathed buta-a-ahow muchhey! Atwood?ay,
ten and three are thirteen, and fifty
pounds
, make 13,180;
and I hear you have 20,000 funded, besides loose cash,
beyond a doubt.
Ann Larder  Samuel Cork  Richard Bitts  David
BrushPhbe Keys, said Sir Wycherly, slowly, giving
time after each pause, for Atwood to write; naming his
cook, butler, groom, valet or body-servant, and housekeeper,
in the order they have been laid before the reader.
How much to each, Sir Wycherly?I see Atwood has
made short work, and put them all in the same clause
that will never do, unless the legacies are the same.
Goodgoodright, muttered the testator; 200
each1000allmoneymoney.
This settled the point, and the clause was regularly
written, read, and approved.
This raises the money bequests to 14,180, Sir
Wycherly
some
6 or 7000 more must remain to be disposed
of. Stand a little further this way, if you please, Mr.
Wycherly
Wychecombe, and allow the ladies more room.
Whose name shall we insert next, sir?
Sir Wycherly, thus directed by the eager desire of the
admiral to serve the gallant lieutenant, fastened his eyes
on the young man, regarding him quite a minute in silent
attention.
Virginian  same name  American  colonies  good
lad
brave
lad1000, muttered the sick man between
his teeth; and, yet so breathless was the quiet of the
chamber
,
at that moment, every syllable was heard by all present.
Yes1000Wycherly Wychecomberoyal navy
Atwood's pen was running rapidly over the paper, and
had just reached the name of the contemplated legatee, when
his hand was arrested by the voice of the young man himself.
Stop, Mr. Atwood  do not insert any clause in my
favour! cried Wycherly, his face the colour of crimson,
and his chest heaving with the emotions he felt it so difficult
to repress. I decline the legacyit will be useless to
write it, as I will not receive a shilling.
Young sir, said Sir Gervaise, with a little of the severity
of a superior, when he rebukes an inferior, in his manner;
you speak hastily. It is not the office of an auditor or of
a spectator, to repel the kindness of a man about to pass
from the face of the earth, into the more immediate presence
of his God!
I have every sentiment of respect for Sir Wycherly
Wychecombe, sir;every friendly wish for his speedy
recovery
,
and a long evening to his life; but, I will accept of
the money of no man who holds my country in such obvious
distaste, as, it is apparent, the testator holds mine.
You are an Englishman, I believe,
Lieutenant
Wychecombe
;
and a servant of King George II.?
I am
not
an Englishman, Sir Gervaise Oakesbut an
American; a Virginian, entitled to all the rights and
privileges
of a British subject. I am no more an Englishman,
than Dr. Magrath may lay claim to the same character.
This is putting the case strongly,hey! Atwood?
answered
,
the vice-admiral, smiling in spite of the occasion.
I am far from saying that you are an Englishman, in all
senses, sir; but you are one in the sense that gives you
national
character and national rights. You are a
subject
of
England
.
No, Sir Gervaise; your pardon. I am the subject of
George II., but in no manner a subject of
England
. I am,
in one sense, perhaps, a subject of the British empire; but I
am not the less a Virginian, and an American. Not a
shilling
of any man's money will I ever touch, who expresses
his contempt for either.
You forget yourself, young man, and overlook the
future. The hundred or two of prize-money, bought at the
expense of your blood, in the late affair at Groix, will not
last for ever.
It is gone, already, sir, every shilling of it having been
sent to the widow of the boatswain who was killed at my
side. I am no beggar, Sir Gervaise Oakes, though only an
American. I am the owner of a plantation, which affords
me a respectable independence, already; and I do not serve
from necessity, but from choice. Perhaps, if Sir Wycherly
knew this, he would consent to omit my name. I honour
and respect him; would gladly relieve his distress, either
of body or mind; but I cannot consent to accept his
money when offered on terms I consider humiliating.
This was said modestly, but with a warmth and sincerity
which left no doubt that the speaker was in earnest. Sir
Gervaise
Vol. I.  19
too much respected the feelings of the young man to
urge the matter any further, and he turned towards the bed,
in expectation of what the sick man might next say. Sir
Wycherly had heard and understood all that passed, and it
did not fail to produce an impression, even in the state to
which he was reduced. Kind-hearted, and indisposed to
injure even a fly, all the natural feelings of the old man
resumed their ascendency, and he would gladly have given
every shilling of his funded property to be able freely
to express his compunction at having ever uttered a syllable
that could offend sensibilities so noble and generous. But
this exceeded his powers, and he was fain to do the best he
could, in the painful situation in which he was placed.
Noble fellow! he stuttered out; honour to name
come hereSir Gervaisebring here
I believe it is the wish of Sir Wycherly, that you would
draw near the bed, Mr. Wychecombe of
Virginia
, said the
vice-admiral, pithily, though he extended a hand to, and
smiled kindly on, the youth, as the latter passed him in
compliance.
The sick man now succeeded, with a good deal of
difficulty
,
in drawing a valuable signet-ring from a finger.
This ring bore the Wychecombe arms, engraved on it. It
was without the bloody hand, however; for it was far older
than the order of baronets, having, as Wycherly well knew,
been given by one of the Plantagenet Dukes to an ancestor
of the family, during the French wars of Henry VI., and
that, too, in commemoration of some signal act of gallantry
in the field.
Wear thisnoble fellowhonour to name, said Sir
Wycherly.
Must
be descended  all Wychecombes
descended
him
I thank you, Sir Wycherly, for this present, which I
prize as it ought to be prized, said Wycherly, every trace
of any other feeling than that of gratitude having vanished
from his countenance. I may have no claims to your
honours or money; but this ring I need not be ashamed to
wear, since it was bestowed on one who was as much
my
ancestor, as he was the ancestor of any Wychecombe in
England.
Legitimate? cried Tom, a fierce feeling of resentment
upsetting his caution and cunning.
Yes sir,
legitimate
, answered Wycherly, turning to his
interrogator with the calmness of one conscious of his own
truth, and with a glance of the eye that caused Tom to
shrink back again into the circle. I need no
bar
, to enable
me to use this seal, which, you may perceive, Sir Gervaise
Oakes, is a
fac simile
of the one I ordinarily wear, and
which was transmitted to me from my direct ancestors.
The vice-admiral compared the seal on Wycherly's
watch-chain
with that on the ring, and, the bearings being principally
griffins, he was enabled to see that one was the exact
counterpart
of the other. Sir Reginald advanced a step, and
when the admiral had satisfied himself, he also took the two
seals and compared them. As all the known branches of the
Wychecombes of Wychecombe, bore the same arms, viz.,
griffins for Wychecombe, with three battering-rams
quartered
,
for Wycherly,he saw, at once, that the young man
habitually carried about his person, this proof of a common
origin. Sir Reginald knew very well that arms were often
assumed, as well as names, and the greater the obscurity of
the individual who took these liberties, the greater was his
impunity; but the seal was a very ancient one, and
innovations
on personal rights were far less frequent a century
since, than they are to-day. Then the character and
appearance
of Wycherly put fraud out of the question, so far
as the young lieutenant himself was concerned. Although
the elder branch of the family, legitimately speaking, was
reduced to the helpless old man who was now stretched
upon his death-bed, his own had been extensive; and it well
might be that some cadet of the Wychecombes of
Wychecombe-Regis
,
had strayed into the colonies and left
descendants
.
Secretly resolving to look more closely into
these facts, he gravely returned the seals, and intimated
to Sir Gervaise that the more important business before them
had better proceed. On this hint, Atwood resumed the pen,
and the vice-admiral his duties.
There want yet some 6 or 7000 to make up 20,000,
Sir Wycherly, which I understand is the sum you have in
the funds. Whose name or names will you have next
inserted?
Rotherhamvicarpoor St. Jamesgone; yesMr.
Rotherhamvicar.
The clause was written, the sum of 1000 was inserted,
and the whole was read and approved.
This still leaves us some 5000 more to deal with, my
dear sir?
A long pause succeeded, during which time Sir Wycherly
was deliberating what to do with the rest of his ready money.
At length his wandering eye rested on the pale features of
Mrs. Dutton; and, while he had a sort of liking, that
proceeded
from habit, for her husband, he remembered that she
had many causes for sorrow. With a feeling that was
creditable to his own heart, he uttered her name, and the
sum of 2000. The clause was written, accordingly, read
and approved.
We have still 3000 certainly, if not 4000, added
Sir Gervaise.
Millydear littleMillypretty Milly, stammered out
the baronet, affectionately.
This must go into a codicil, Sir Gervaise, interrupted
Atwood; there being already one legacy in the young
lady's favour. Shall it be one, two, three, or four thousand
pounds, Sir Wycherly, in favour of Miss Mildred, to whom
you have already bequeathed 3000?
The sick man muttered the words three thousand, after
a short pause, adding codicil.
His wishes were complied with, and the whole was read
and approved. After this, Sir Gervaise inquired if the
testator wished to make any more devises. Sir Wycherly,
who had in effect bequeathed, within a few hundred pounds,
all he had to bestow, bethought himself, for a few moments,
of the state of his affairs, and then he signified his satisfaction
with what had been done.
As it is possible, Sir Wycherly, that you may have
overlooked something, said Sir Gervaise, and it is better
that nothing should escheat to the crown, I will suggest the
expediency of your making some one residuary legatee.
The poor old man smiled an assent, and then he
succeeded
in muttering the name of Sir Reginald
Wychecombe
.
This clause, like all the others, was written, read, and
approved. The will was now completed, and preparations
were made to read it carefully over to the intended testator.
In order that this might be done with sufficient care for
future objections, the two admirals and Atwood, who were
selected for the witnesses, each read the testament himself,
in order to say that nothing was laid before the testator but
that which was fairly contained in the instrument, and that
nothing was omitted. When all was ready, the will was
audibly and slowly read to Sir Wycherly, by the secretary,
from the beginning to the end. The old man listened with
great attention; smiled when Mildred's name was
mentioned
;
and clearly expressed, by signs and words, his entire
satisfaction when all was ended. It remained only to place
a pen in his hand, and to give him such assistance as would
enable him to affix his name twice; once to the body of the
instrument; and, when this was duly witnessed, then again
to the codicil. By this time, Tom Wychecombe thought
that the moment for interposing had arrived. He had been
on thorns during the whole proceeding, forming desperate
resolutions to sustain the bold fraud of his legitimacy, and
thus take all the lands and heir-looms of the estate, under
the entail; still he well knew that a subordinate, but
important
question might arise, as between the validity of the two
wills, in connection with Sir Wycherly's competency to
make the last. It was material, therefore, in his view of the
case, to enter a protest.
Gentlemen, he said, advancing to the foot of the bed;
I call on you all to observe the nature of this whole
transaction
.
My poor, beloved, but misled uncle, no longer ago
than last night, was struck with a fit of apoplexy, or
something
so very near it as to disqualify him to judge in these
matters; and here he is urged to make a will
By whom, sir? demanded Sir Gervaise, with a severity
of tone that induced the speaker to fall back a step.
Why, sir, in my judgment, by all in the room. If not
with their tongues, at least with their eyes.
And why should all in the room do this? Am I a
legatee
?is
Admiral Bluewater to be a gainer by this will?
can
witnesses to a will be legatees?
I do not wish to dispute the matter with you, Sir
Gervaise
Oakes; but I solemnly protest against this irregular
19 *
and most extraordinary manner of making a will. Let all
who hear me, remember this, and be ready to testify to it,
when called on in a court of justice.
Here Sir Wycherly struggled to rise in the bed, in evident
excitement, gesticulating strongly to express his disgust, and
his wish for his nephew to withdraw. But the physicians
endeavoured to pacify him, while Atwood, with the paper
spread on a port-folio, and a pen in readiness, coolly
proceeded
to obtain the necessary signatures. Sir Wycherly's
hand trembled so much when it received the pen, that, for the
moment, writing was out of the question, and it became
necessary to administer a restorative in order to strengthen
his nerves.
Away  out of sight, muttered the excited baronet,
leaving no doubt on all present, that the uppermost feeling
of the moment was the strong desire to rid himself of the
presence of the offensive object. Sir Reginaldlittle Milly
poor servantsbrothersall the rest, stay.
Just be calming the mind, Sir Wycherly Wychecombe,
put in Magrath, and ye'll be solacing the body by the same
effort. When the mind is in a state of exaltation, the nervous
system is apt to feel the influence of sympathy. By
bringing
the two in harmonious co-operation, the testamentary
devises will have none the less of validity, either in reality
or in appearances.
Sir Wycherly understood the surgeon, and he struggled
for self-command. He raised the pen, and succeeded in
getting its point on the proper place. Then his dim eye
lighted, and shot a reproachful glance at Tom; he smiled
in a ghastly manner, looked towards the paper, passed a
hand across his brow, closed his eyes, and fell back on the
pillow, utterly unconscious of all that belonged to life, its
interests, its duties, or its feelings. In ten minutes, he ceased
to breathe.
Thus died Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, after a long life,
in which general qualities of a very negative nature, had
been somewhat relieved, by kindness of feeling, a passive
if not an active benevolence, and such a discharge of his
responsible duties as is apt to flow from an absence of any
qualities that are positively bad; as well as of many of
material account, that are affirmatively good.
CHAPTER XV.
Come ye, who still the cumbrous load of life
Push hard up hill; but at the farthest steep
You trust to gain, and put an end to strife,
Down thunders back the stone with mighty sweep,
And hurls your labours to the valley deep;
Thomson
.
The
sudden, and, in some measure, unlooked-for event,
related in the close of the last chapter, produced a great
change in the condition of things at Wychecombe Hall.
The first step was to make sure that the baronet was
actually
dead; a fact that Sir Gervaise Oakes, in particular, was
very unwilling to believe, in the actual state of his feelings.
Men often fainted, and apoplexy required
three
blows to
kill; the sick man might still revive, and at least be able
to execute his so clearly expressed intentions.
Ye'll never have act of any sort, testamentary or
matrimonial
,
legal or illegal, in this life, from the late Sir
Wycherly
Wychecombe of Wychecombe Hall, Devonshire,
coolly observed Magrath, as he collected the different
medicines
and instruments he had himself brought forth for the
occasion. He's far beyond the jurisdiction of My Lord
High Chancellor or the College of Physicians and Surgeons;
and therefore, ye'll be acting prudently to consider him as
deceased; or, in the light in which the human body is placed
by the cessation of all the animal functions.
This decided the matter, and the necessary orders were
given; all but the proper attendants quitting the chamber
of death. It would be far from true to say that no one
lamented Sir Wycherly Wychecombe. Both Mrs. Dutton
and Mildred grieved for his sudden end, and wept sincerely
for his loss; though totally without a thought of its
consequences
to themselves. The daughter did not even once
think how near she had been to the possession of 6000,
and how unfortunately the cup of comparative affluence had
been dashed from her lips; though truth compels us to avow
that the mother did once recall this circumstance, with a
feeling akin to regret. A similar recollection had its
influence
on the manifestations of sorrow that flowed from others.
The domestics, in particular, were too much astounded to
indulge in any very abstracted grief, and Sir Gervaise and
Atwood were both extremely vexed. In short, the feelings
usual to such occasions were but little indulged in, though
there was a strict observance of decorum.
Sir Reginald Wychecombe noted these circumstances
attentively, and he took his measures accordingly. Seizing
a favourable moment to consult with the two admirals, his
decision was soon made; and, within an hour after his
kinsman's
death, all the guests and most of the upper servants
were assembled in the room, which it was the usage of the
house to call the library; though the books were few, and
seldom read. Previously, there had been a consultation
between Sir Reginald and the two admirals, to which Atwood
had been admitted,
ex officio
. As everything, therefore, had
been arranged in advance, there was no time lost
unnecessarily
,
when the company was collected; the Hertfordshire
baronet coming to the point at once, and that in the clearest
manner.
Gentlemen, and you, good people, domestics of the late
Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, he commenced; you are
all acquainted with the unfortunate state of this household.
By the recent death of its master, it is left without a head;
and the deceased departing this life a bachelor, there is no
child to assume his place, as the natural and legal successor.
In one sense, I might be deemed the next of kin; though,
by a
dictum
of the common law I have no claim to the
succession
.
Nevertheless, you all know it was the intention
of our late friend to constitute me his executor, and I
conceive
it proper that search should now be made for a will,
which, by being duly executed, must dispose of all in this
house, and let us know who is entitled to command at this
solemn and important moment. It strikes me, Sir Gervaise
Oakes, that the circumstances are so peculiar as to call for
prompt proceedings.
I fully agree with you, Sir Reginald, returned the
vice-admiral
;
but before we proceed any further, I would
suggest
the propriety of having as many of those present as
possible, who have an interest in the result. Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe, the reputed nephew of the deceased, I do not
see among us.
On examination, this was found to be true, and the man
of Tom Wychecombe, who had been ordered by his master
to be present as a spy, was immediately sent to the latter, with
a request that he would attend. After a delay of two or
three minutes, the fellow returned with the answer.
Sir Thomas Wychecombe's compliments, gentlemen,
he said, and he desires to know the object of your request.
He is in his room, indulging in natural grief for his recent
loss; and he prefers to be left alone with his sorrows, just
at this moment, if it be agreeable to you.
This was taking high ground in the commencement; and,
as the man had his cue, and delivered his message with
great distinctness and steadiness, the effect on the
dependants
of the household was very evident. Sir Reginald's face
flushed, while Sir Gervaise bit his lip; Bluewater played
with the hilt of his sword, very indifferent to all that was
passing; while Atwood and the surgeons shrugged their
shoulders and smiled. The first of these persons well knew
that Tom had no shadow of a claim to the title he had been
in so much haste to assume, however, and he hoped that
the feebleness of his rights in all particulars, was represented
by the mixed feebleness and impudence connected with this
message. Determined not to be bullied from his present
purpose, therefore, he turned to the servant and sent him
back with a second message, that did not fail of its object.
The man was directed to inform his master, that Sir
Reginald
Wychecombe was in possession of facts that, in his
opinion, justified the course he was taking, and if Mr.
Thomas Wychecombe did not choose to appear, in order
to look after his own interests, he should proceed without
him. This brought Tom into the room, his face pale with
uncertainty, rather than with grief, and his mind agitated
with such apprehensions as are apt to beset even the most
wicked, when they take their first important step in evil.
He bowed, however, to the company with an air that he
intended to represent the manner of a well-bred man
acknowledging
his duties to respected guests.
If I appear remiss in any of the duties of a host,
gentlemen
,
he said, you will overlook it, I trust, in
consideration
of my present feelings. Sir Wycherly was my father's
elder brother, and was very dear, as he was very
near
to
me. By this melancholy death, Sir Reginald, I am
suddenly
and unexpectedly elevated to be the head of our
ancient and honourable family; but I know my own
personal
unworthiness to occupy that distinguished place, and
feel how much better it would be filled by yourself.
Although
the law has placed a wide and impassable barrier
between all of your branch of the family and ourselves, I
shall ever be ready to acknowledge the affinity, and to confess
that it does us quite as much honour as it bestows.
Sir Reginald, by a great effort, commanded himself so
far as to return the bow, and apparently to receive the
condescending
admissions of the speech, with a proper degree
of respect.
Sir, I thank you, he answered, with formal courtesy;
no affinity that can be properly and legally established,
will ever be disavowed by me. Under present circumstances,
however, summoned as I have been to the side of his
death-bed
,
by the late Sir Wycherly, himself, and named by him,
as one might say, with his dying breath, as his executor, I
feel it a duty to inquire into the rights of all parties, and, if
possible, to ascertain who is the successor, and consequently
who has the best claim to command here.
You surely do not attach any validity, Sir Reginald, to
the pretended will that was so singularly drawn up in my
dear uncle's presence, an hour before he died! Had that
most extraordinary instrument been duly signed and sealed,
I cannot think that the Doctor's Commons would sustain it;
but
unsigned
and
unsealed
, it is no better than so much
waste paper.
As respects the real estate, sir, though so great a loser
by the delay of five minutes, I am willing to admit that you
are right. With regard to the personals, a question in
equityone of clearly-expressed intentionmight possibly
arise; though even of that I am by no means certain.
No, sir; no cried Tom, a glow of triumph colouring
his cheek, in spite of every effort to appear calm; no
English court would ever disturb the natural succession to
the personals! I am the last man to wish to disturb some
of these legaciesparticularly that to Mr. Rotherham, and
those to the poor, faithful domestics,Tom saw the
prudence
of conciliating allies, at such a critical moment, and
his declaration had an instant and strong effect, as was
evident
by the countenances of many of the listeners;
and I may say, that to Miss Mildred Dutton; all of which
will be duly paid, precisely as if my beloved uncle had been
in his right mind, and had actually made the bequests; for
this mixture of reason and justice, with wild and
extraordinary
conceits, is by no means uncommon among men of
great age, and in their last moments. However, Sir
Reginald
,
I beg you will proceed, and act as in your judgment
the extraordinary circumstances of what may be called a
very peculiar case, require.
I conceive it to be our duty, sir, to search for a will.
If Sir Wycherly has actually died intestate, it will be time
enough to inquire into the question of the succession at
common
law. I have here the keys of his private secretary;
and Mr. Furlong, the land-steward, who has just arrived,
and whom you see in the room, tells me Sir Wycherly was
accustomed to keep all his valuable papers in this piece of
furniture. I shall now proceed to open it.
Do so, Sir Reginald; no one can have a stronger desire
than myself to ascertain my beloved uncle's pleasure. Those
to whom he
seemed
to wish to give, even, shall not be losers
for the want of his name.
Tom was greatly raised in the opinions of half in the
room, by this artful declaration, which was effectually
securing
just so many friends, in the event of any occurrence
that might render such support necessary. In the mean
time, Sir Reginald, assisted by the steward, opened the
secretary, and found the deposite of papers. The leases
were all in order; the title-deeds were properly arranged;
the books and accounts appeared to be exactly kept;
ordinary
bills and receipts were filed with method; two or three
bags of guineas proved that ready cash was not wanting;
and, in short, everything showed that the deceased had left
his affairs in perfect order, and in a very intelligible
condition
.
Paper after paper, however, was opened, and nothing
like a will, rough draft or copied, was to be found.
Disappointment
was strongly painted on the faces of all the
gentlemen
present; for, they had ignorantly imbibed the opinion,
that the production of a will would, in some unknown
manner
,
defeat the hopes of the
soi disant
Sir Thomas
Wychecombe
.
Nor was Tom, himself, altogether without concern;
for, since the recent change in his uncle's feelings towards
himself, he had a secret apprehension that some paper might
be found, to defeat all his hopes. Triumph, however,
gradually
assumed the place of fear, in the expression of his
countenance; and when Mr. Furlong, a perfectly honest
man, declared that, from the late baronet's habits, as well as
from the result of this search, he did not believe that any
such instrument existed, his feelings overflowed in language.
Not so fast, Master Furlongnot so fast, he cried;
here is something that possibly even your legal acumen
may be willing to term a will. You perceive, gentlemen, I
have it in my possession on good authority, as it is addressed
to me by name, and that, too, in Sir Wycherly's own
hand-writing
;
the envelope is sealed with his private seal. You
will pronounce this to be my dear uncle's hand, Furlong,
showing the superscription of the letterand this to be his
seal?
Both are genuine, gentlemen, returned the steward,
with a sigh. Thus far, Mr. Thomas is in the right.
Mr.
Thomas, sirrah!  And why not
Sir
Thomas?
Are baronets addressed as other men, in England? But, no
matter! There is a time for all things. Sir Gervaise Oakes,
as you are perfectly indifferent in this affair, I ask of you the
favour to break the seal, and to inquire into the contents of
the paper?
The vice-admiral was not slow in complying; for, by
this time, he began to feel an intense interest in the result.
The reader will readily understand that Tom had handed to
Sir Gervaise the will drawn up by his father, and which,
after inserting his reputed nephew's name, Sir Wycherly
had duly executed, and delivered to the person most interested.
The envelope, address, and outer seal, Tom had obtained
the very day the will was signed, after assuring himself of
the contents of the latter, by six or eight careful perusals.
The vice-admiral read the instrument from beginning to
end, before he put it into the hands of Sir Reginald to
examine
.
The latter fully expected to meet with a clumsy
forgery; but the instant his eyes fell on the phraseology, he
perceived that the will had been drawn by one expert in the
law. A second look satisfied him that the hand was that
of Mr. Baron Wychecombe. It has already been said, that
in this instrument, Sir Wycherly had bequeathed all he had
on earth, to his nephew, Thomas Wychecombe, son, &c.
&c. making his heir, also, his executor.
This will appears to me to have been drawn up by a
very skilful lawyer; the late Baron Wychecombe, observed
the baronet.
It was, Sir Reginald, answered Tom, endeavouring to
appear unconcerned. He did it to oblige my respected
uncle, leaving blanks for the name of the devisee, not liking
to make a will so very decidedly in favour of his own son.
The writing in the blanks is by Sir Wycherly himself,
leaving no doubts of
his
intentions.
I do not see but you may claim to be the heir of
Wychecombe
,
sir, as well as of the personals; though your claims
to the baronetcy shall certainly be contested and defeated.
And why defeated? demanded Wycherly, stepping
forward
for the first time, and speaking with a curiosity he
found it difficult to control. Is not Mr. Thomas
Sir
Thomas, I ought rather to say,the eldest son of the late
Sir Wycherly's next brother; and, as a matter of course,
heir to the title, as well as to the estate?
Not he, as I can answer from a careful examination of
proofs. Mr. Baron Wychecombe was never married, and
thus
could have
no heir at law.
Is this possible!How have we all been deceived then,
in America!
Why do you say this, young gentleman? Can
you
have
any legal claims here?
I am Wycherly, the
only
son of Wycherly, who was
the eldest son of Gregory, the younger brother of the late
baronet; and if what you say be true, the next in succession
to the baronetcy, at least.
This is Tom's words stuck in his throat; for the
quiet, stern eye of the young sailor met his look and warned
him to be prudent.This is a
mistake
, he resumed.
My uncle Gregory was lost at sea, and died a bachelor.
He can have left no lawful issue.
I must say, young gentleman, added Sir Reginald,
Vol. I.20
gravely, that such has always been the history of his fate.
I have had too near an interest in this family, to neglect its
annals.
I know, sir, that such has been the opinion here for more
than half a century; but it was founded in error. The facts
are simply these. My grandfather, a warm-hearted but
impetuous young man, struck an older lieutenant, when
ashore and on duty, in one of the West India Islands. The
penalty was death; but, neither the party injured nor the
commander of the vessel, wished to push matters to
extremity
,
and the offender was advised to absent himself from
the ship, at the moment of sailing. The injured party was
induced to take this course, as in a previous quarrel, my
grandfather had received his fire, without returning it;
frankly admitting his fault. The ship did sail without Mr.
Gregory Wychecombe, and was lost, every soul on board
perishing. My grandfather passed into Virginia, where he
remained a twelvemonth, suppressing his story, lest its
narration
might lead to military punishment. Love next sealed
his future fate. He married a woman of fortune, and though
his history was well known in his own retired circle, it
never spread beyond it. No one supposed him near the
succession, and there was no motive for stating the fact, on
account of his interests. Once he wrote to Sir Wycherly,
but he suppressed the letter, as likely to give more pain
than pleasure. That letter I now have, and in his own
hand-writing. I have also his commission, and all the other
proofs of identity that such a person would be apt to
possess
.
They are as complete as any court in Christendom
would be likely to require, for he never felt a necessity for
changing his name. He has been dead but two years, and
previously to dying he saw that every document necessary
to establish my claim, should a moment for enforcing it ever
arrive, was put in such a legal form as to admit of no
cavilling
.
He outlived my own father, but none of us thought
there was any motive for presenting ourselves, as all
believed
that the sons of Baron Wychecombe were legitimate.
I can only say, sir, that I have complete legal evidence that
I am heir at law of Gregory, the younger brother of the late
Sir Wycherly Wychecombe. Whether the fact will give
me any rights here, you best can say.
It will make you heir of entail to this estate, master of
this house, and of most of what it contains, and the present
baronet. You have only to prove what you say, to defeat
every provision of this will, with the exception of that which
refers to the personal estate.
Bravo! cried Sir Gervaise, fairly rubbing his hands
with delight. Bravo, Dick; if we were aboard the
Plantagenet
,
by the Lord, I 'd turn the hands up, and have three
cheers. So then, my brave young seaman, you turn out to
be Sir Wycherly Wychecombe, after all!
Yes, that's the way we always does, on board ship,
observed Galleygo, to the group of domestics; whenever
anything of a hallooing character turns up. Sometimes we
makes a signal to Admiral Blue and the rest on 'em, to
`stand by to cheer,' and all of us sets to, to cheer as if our
stomachs was full of hurrahs, and we wanted to get rid on
'em. If Sir Jarvy would just pass the word now, you 'd
have a taste of that 'ere custom, that would do your ears
good for a twelve-month. It 's a cheering matter when one
of the trade falls heir to an estate.
And would this be a proper mode of settling a question
of a right of property, Sir Gervaise Oakes? asked Tom,
with more of right and reason than he commonly had of his
side; and that, too, with my uncle lying dead beneath this
roof?
I acknowledge the justice of the reproof, young sir, and
will say no more in the matterat least, nothing as
indiscreet
as my last speech. Sir Reginald, you have the affair
in hand, and I recommend it to your serious attention.
Fear nothing, Sir Gervaise, answered he of
Hertfordshire
.
Justice shall be done in the premises, if justice rule
in England. Your story, young gentleman, is probable,
and naturally told, and I see a family likeness between you
and the Wychecombes, generally; a likeness that is
certainly
not to be traced in the person of the other claimant.
Did the point depend on the legitimacy of Mr. Thomas
Wychecombe, it might be easily determined, as I have his
own mother's declaration to the fact of his illegitimacy, as
well as of one other material circumstance that may possibly
unsettle even the late Baron Wychecombe's will. But this
testamentary devise of Sir Wycherly appears to be perfect,
and nothing but the entail can defeat it. You speak of your
proofs; where are they? It is all-important to know which
party is entitled to possession.
Here they are, sir, answered Wycherly, removing a
belt from his body, and producing his papers; not in the
originals, certainly; for most of
them
are matters of official
record, in Virginia; but in, what the lawyers call `
exemplified
copies,' and which I am told are in a fit state to be
read as evidence in any court in England, that can take
cognizance of the matter.
Sir Reginald took the papers, and began to read them,
one by one, and with deep attention. The evidence of the
identity of the grandfather was full, and of the clearest
nature. He had been recognised as an old schoolfellow, by
one of the governors of the colony, and it was at this
gentleman's
suggestion that he had taken so much pains to
perpetuate
the evidence of his identity. Both the marriages,
one with Jane Beverly, and the other with Rebecca
Randolph
,
were fully substantiated, as were the two births.
The personal identity of the young man, and this too as the
only son of Wycherly, the
eldest
son of Gregory, was well
certified to, and in a way that could leave no doubt as to the
person meant. In a word, the proofs were such as a careful
and experienced lawyer would have prepared, in a case that
admitted of no doubt, and which was liable to be contested in
a court of law. Sir Reginald was quite half an hour in
looking over the papers; and during this time, every eye in
the room was on him, watching the expression of his
countenance
with the utmost solicitude. At length, he finished
his task, when he again turned to Wycherly.
These papers have been prepared with great method,
and an acute knowledge of what might be required, he
said. Why have they been so long suppressed, and why
did you permit Sir Wycherly to die in ignorance of your
near affinity to him, and of your claims?
Of my claims I was ignorant myself, believing not only
Mr. Thomas Wychecombe, but his two brothers, to stand
before me. This was the opinion of my grandfather, even
when he caused these proofs to be perpetuated. They were
given to me, that I might claim affinity to the family on my
arrival in England; and it was the injunction of my
grandfather
that they should be worn on my person, until the
moment
arrived when I could use them.
This explains your not preferring the claimwhy not
prefer the relationship?
What for, sir? I found America and Americans looked
down on, in Englandcolonists spoken of as a race of
inferior
beingsof diminished stature, feebler intellects, and a
waning spirit, as compared to those from whom they had
so recently sprung; and I was too proud to confess an
affinity where I saw it was not desired. When wounded,
and expecting to die, I was landed here, at my own request,
with an intention to state the facts; but, falling under the
care of ministering angels,here Wycherly glanced his
eye at Mildred and her motherI less felt the want of
relatives. Sir Wycherly I honoured; but he too
manifestly
regarded us Americans as inferiors, to leave any wish
to tell him I was his great-nephew.
I fear we are not altogether free from this reproach, Sir
Gervaise, observed Sir Reginald, thoughtfully. We do
appear
to think there is something in the air of this part of the
island, that renders us better than common. Nay, if a
claim comes from
over water
, let it be what it may, it strikes
us as a foreign and inadmissible claim. The fate from which
even princes are not exempt, humbler men must certainly
submit to!
I can understand the feeling, and I think it honourable
to the young man. Admiral Bluewater, you and I have had
occasion often to rebuke this very spirit in our young
officers
;
and you will agree with me when I say that this
gentleman has acted naturally, in acting as he has.
I must corroborate what you say, Sir Gervaise,
answered
Bluewater; and, as one who has seen much of the
colonies, and who is getting to be an old man, I venture to
predict that this very feeling, sooner or later, will draw down
upon England its own consequences, in the shape of condign
punishment.
I don't go as far as that, DickI don't go as far as
that. But it is unwise and unsound, and we, who know both
hemispheres, ought to set our faces against it. We have
already some gallant fellows from that quarter of the world
among us, and I hope to live to see more.
20 *
This, let it be remembered, was said before the Hallowells,
and Coffins, and Brentons of our own times, were enrolled
in a service that has since become foreign to that of the land
of their birth; but it was prophetic of their appearance,
and of that of many other high names from the
colonies
,
in the lists of the British marine. Wycherly smiled
proudly, but he made no answer. All this time, Sir
Reginald
had been musing on what had passed.
It would seem, gentlemen, the latter now observed,
that, contrary to our belief, there is an heir to the
baronetcy
,
as well as to the estate of Wychecombe; and all our
regrets that the late incumbent did not live to execute the
will we had drawn at his request, have become useless. Sir
Wycherly Wychecombe, I congratulate you, on thus
succeeding
to the honours and estates of your family; and, as
a member of the last, I may be permitted to congratulate all
of the name in being so worthily represented. For one of
that family I cheerfully recognize you as its head and chief.
Wycherly bowed his acknowledgments, receiving also the
compliments of most of the others present. Tom
Wychecombe
,
however, formed an exception, and instead of
manifesting
any disposition to submit to this summary disposal
of his claims, he was brooding over the means of
maintaining
them. Detecting by the countenances of the upper
servants
that they were effectually bribed by his promise to pay
the late baronet's legacies, he felt tolerably confident of
support
from that quarter. He well knew that possession was
nine points of the law, and his thoughts naturally turned
towards the means necessary to securing this great
advantage
.
As yet, the two claimants were on a par, in this
respect; for while the executed will might seem to give him
a superior claim, no authority that was derived from an
insufficient
source would be deemed available in law; and Sir
Wycherly had clearly no right to devise Wychecombe, so
long as there existed an heir of entail. Both parties, too,
were merely guests in the house; so that neither had any
possession that would require a legal process to eject him.
Tom had been entered at the Temple, and had some
knowedge
of the law of the land; more especially as related to
real estate; and he was aware that there existed some quaint
ceremony of taking possession, as it existed under the feudal
system; but he was ignorant of the precise forms, and had
some reasonable doubts how far they would benefit him,
under the peculiar circumstances of this case. On the whole,
therefore, he was disposed to try the effect of intimidation,
by means of the advantages he clearly possessed, and of
such little reason as the facts connected with his claim,
allowed him to offer.
Sir Reginald Wychecombe, he said gravely, and with
as much indifference as he could assume; you have
betrayed
a facility of belief in this American history, that has
surprised me in one with so high a reputation for prudence
and caution. This sudden revival of the dead may answer
for the credulous lovers of marvels, but it would hardly do
for a jury of twelve sober-minded and sworn men.
Admitting
the whole of this gentleman's statement to be true,
however
,
you will not deny the late Sir Wycherly's right to
make a will, if he only devised his old shoes; and, having
this right, that of naming his executor necessarily
accompanied
it. Now, sir, I am clearly that executor, and as
such I demand leave to exercise my functions in this house,
as its temporary master at least.
Not so fastnot so fast, young sir. Wills must be
proved and executors qualified, before either has any validity.
Then, again, Sir Wycherly could only give authority over
that which was his own. The instant he ceased to breathe,
his brother Gregory's grandson became the life-tenant of
this estate, the house included; and I advise him to assert
that right, trusting to the validity of his claim, for his
justification
in law, should it become necessary. In these matters
he who is right is safe; while he who is wrong must take
the consequences of his own acts. Mr. Furlong, your
stewardship ceased with the life of your principal; if you
have any keys or papers to deliver, I advise your placing
them in the hands of this gentleman, whom, beyond all cavil,
I take to be the rightful Sir Wycherly Wychecombe.
Furlong was a cautious, clear-headed, honest man, and
with every desire to see Tom defeated, he was tenacious of
doing his duty. He led Sir Reginald aside, therefore, and
examined him, at some length, touching the nature of the
proofs that had been offered; until, quite satisfied that there
could be no mistake, he declared his willingness to comply
with the request.
Certainly, I hold the keys of the late Sir Wycherly's
papers,those that have just been seen in the search for the
will, he said, and have every wish to place them in the
hands of their proper owner. Here they are, Sir Wycherly;
though I would advise you to remove the bags of gold that
are in the secretary, to some other place; as
those
your
uncle had a right to bequeath to whom he saw fit.
Everything
else in the secretary goes with the estate; as do the
plate, furniture, and other heir-looms of the Hall.
I thank you, Mr. Furlong, and I will first use these
keys to follow your advice, answered the new baronet;
then I will return them to you, with a request that you
will still retain the charge of all your former duties.
This was no sooner said than done; Wycherly placing
the bags of gold on the floor, until some other place of
security
could be provided.
All that I legally can, Sir Wycherly, will I
cheerfully
do, in order to aid you in the assertion of your right;
though I do not see how I can transfer more than I hold.
Qui facit per alium, facit per se
, is good law, Sir Reginald;
but the principal must have power to act, before the deputy
can exercise authority. It appears to me that this is a case,
in which each party stands on his own rights, at his own
peril. The possession of the farms is safe enough, for the
time being, with the tenants; but as to the Hall and Park,
there would seem to be no one in the legal occupancy.
This makes a case in which title is immediately available.
Such is the law, Mr. Furlong, and I advise Sir
Wycherly
to take possession of the key of the outer door at
once, as master of the tenement.
No sooner was this opinion given, than Wycherly left the
room, followed by all present to the hall. Here he
proceeded
alone to the vestibule, locked the great door of the
building, and put the key in his pocket. This act was
steadily performed, and in a way to counteract, in a great
degree, the effect on the domestics, of Tom's promises
concerning
the legacies. At the same moment, Furlong
whispered
something in the ear of Sir Reginald.
Now you are quietly in possession, Sir Wycherly, said
the latter, smiling; there is no necessity of keeping us all
prisoners in order to maintain your claims. David, the
usual porter, Mr. Furlong tells me, is a faithful servant, and
if he will accept of the key as
your
agent, it may be returned
to him with perfect legal safety.
As David cheerfully assented to this proposition, the key
was put into his hands again, and the new Sir Wycherly
was generally thought to be in possession. Nor did Tom
dare to raise the contemplated question of his own legitimacy
before Sir Reginald, who, he had discovered, possessed a
clue to the facts; and he consequently suppressed, for the
moment at least, the certificate of marriage he had so
recently
forged. Bowing round to the whole company,
therefore
,
with a sort of sarcastic compliance, he stalked off to
his own room with the air of an injured man. This left our
young hero in possession of the field; but, as the condition
of the house was not one suitable to an unreasonable display
of triumph, the party soon separated; some to consult
concerning
the future, some to discourse of the past, and all to
wonder, more or less, of the present.
END OF THE FIRST VOLUME.Dear Admiral Bluewater:
Our ancient friendship, and I am proud to add, affinity
of blood, unite in inducing me to write a line, at this
interesting
moment. Of the result of this rash experiment of the
Pretender's son, no prudent man can entertain a doubt.
Still, the boy may give us some trouble, before he is
disposed
of, altogether. We look to all our friends, therefore,
for their most efficient exertions, and most prudent
co-operation
.
On
you
, every reliance is placed; and I wish I could
say as much for
every flag-officer afloat
. Some distrust
unmerited, I sincerely hopeexists in a very high quarter,
touching the loyalty of a certain commander-in-chief, who
is so completely under your observation, that it is felt
enough is done in hinting the fact to one of your political
tendencies. The king said, this morning, `Vell, dere isht
Bluevater; of
him
we are shure asht of ter sun.' You stand
excellently well
there
, to my great delight; and I need only
say, be watchful and prompt.
Yours, with the most sincere faith and attachment, my
dear Bluewater, &c., &c.  .
Rear-Admiral Bluewater
.
P. S.I have just heard that they have sent you the red
riband. The king himself, was in this.Dear Blue:
I write this in a bed big enough to ware a ninety in.
I 've been athwart ships half the night, without knowing it,
Galleygo has just been in to report `our fleet' all well, and
the ships riding flood. It seems there is a good look-out
from the top of the house, where part of the roads are visible,
Magrath, and the rest of them, have been at poor Sir
Wycherly
all night, I learn, but he remains down by the head,
yet. I am afraid the good old man will never be in trim
again. I shall remain here, until something is decided; and
as we cannot expect our orders until next day after
to-morrow
,
at the soonest, one might as well be here, as on board.
Come ashore and breakfast with us; when we can consult
about the propriety of remaining, or of abandoning the
wreck. Adieu,
Oakes
,
Rear-Admiral Bluewater.
P. S.There was a little occurrence last night,
connected
with Sir Wycherly's will, that makes me
particularly
anxious to see you, as early as possible, this morning.
O.